 
 
My little politics blog
 
 
I've been reading scads and scads of stuff about the 2008 presidential campaign and it just keeps happening that I read something, then 2-3 days later I want to refer to it but I can't retrace my steps well enough to find it. I do put a lot of links to stuff I find interesting in appropriate threads, but sometimes a given link doesn't go anywhere in particular (thematically-speaking), or I haven't yet read it thoroughly and critically and I don't necessarily want to put it someplace to support a point, if I'm not sure I can stand behind it.

So this will be a place for me to plonk things, with a brief description so I know what it is and can hopefully find it back if I want to.

I'm making this for myself, so if you're not interested in reading or commenting, that's fine! If you ARE interested in reading or commenting, that's also fine.
 
 
Hillary's "experience" lie, by Timothy Noah:

 http://www.slate.com/id/2182073 
Takes on the whole "35 years of experience" meme, with some interesting commentary on how she lost his nascent support.

Excerpt:

 
But I'd never felt the large emotions she seemed to stir in others. New York's junior senator wants to be president? Fine, I thought. Let's hear her pitch. Because she was still a relative newcomer to government service, I assumed that, more than most presidential candidates, Clinton would recognize the need to give voters a reason to vote for her. I waited expectantly to discover what that reason might be.

I never dreamed the reason would be "experience." More astonishing still, the public seems to be buying it. According to a new New York Times/CBS News poll, 79 percent of all Democratic primary voters believe that Hillary Clinton has "prepared herself well enough for the job of President," compared with only 40 percent for Obama. "Experience Counts" declared the headline of a Jan. 9 editorial in the Boston Globe about the New Hampshire victories of Hillary Clinton and Sen. John McCain, R-Ariz. "The results suggest that, at the least, New Hampshire voters put more stock in the length of a candidate's track record than Iowa voters did," the Globe said. But the paper never got around to explaining what, in Hillary's case, that experience consisted of.

Let's be clear. If you're a Democrat, experience isn't on this year's menu.
 

He then goes on to explore the differences (and similarities), between the top three candidates, experience-wise, in some detail. Last paragraph:

 
Clinton's claim to superior experience isn't merely dishonest. It's also potentially dangerous should she become the nominee. If Clinton continues to build her campaign on the dubious foundation of government experience, it shouldn't be very difficult for her GOP opponent to pull that edifice down. That's especially true if a certain white-haired senator now serving his 25th year in Congress (four in the House and 21 in the Senate) wins the nomination. McCain could easily make Hillary look like an absolute fraud who is no more truthful about her depth of government experience than she is about why her mother named her "Hillary." Dennis Kucinich has more government experience than Clinton. (He also has a better health-care plan, but we'll save that for another day.) If Clinton doesn't find a new theme soon, she won't just be cutting Obama's throat. She'll also be cutting her own.
 
 
 
Oh goodie, one more blog to add to my daily "must read" list.

Thanks!

[size=7](insert bookmark here.)[/size]
 
 
sozobe; what will you do if it comes to down to Romney and Hillary? How are you going to stump or support for Hillary after kind of talking really bad about her during the primaries? Or am I am assuming you wouldn't vote for Romney in error?
 
 
I've said several times that I'd vote for any of the top three Democrats. I really, really hope I get to vote for Obama. If he's the nominee, I'll work hard to do what I can to help him get elected. If Edwards is the nominee, I'll work for him too. If Hillary's the nominee, I'll probably just vote for her and leave it at that.

Nobody is perfect. In a less impressive field, I'd probably just kind of accept that Hillary is imperfect but the best shot. Obama isn't perfect either -- but I think he's a much better choice.
 
 
Bookmark.
 
 
I wrote this two years ago (March 2006) in the opening post of the "Obama '08" thread -- it's still about where I am now, if with a lot more info and a lot more nuance:

 
What I know for sure is that when I think of all of the possible Democratic nominees, my reaction ranges from "could be OK" to "OH LORD PLEASE NO!!!", with one exception. Obama is the only one who makes me think, "Oh man, that would be SO great!!"
 

(Remember that I've been following Obama since 2003 or so, when I lived in Chicago, so while a lot has happened since I already knew a lot about him at the time.)
 
 
OK, so continuing to clear out the backlog:

The race vs. gender war

Gary Kamiya

 http://www.salon.com/opinion/kamiya/2008/01/15/race_gender/ 

Interesting discussion of Steinem's Op-Ed, among other things.
 
 
SC's Republican Governor praises Obama candidacy:

 http://politicalticker.blogs.cnn.com/2008/01/11/scs-republican-governor-praises-obama-candidacy/ 

Excerpt:

 
 
 
 
Playing to win, by hilzoy (who, judging by his avatar, may be fishin' -- fishin', that you? ;-))

 http://obsidianwings.blogs.com/obsidian_wings/2008/01/playing-to-win.html 

This is an interesting one, hard to summarize. I agree with a lot of it, but it's one that falls into the category of haven't yet had time to read it thoroughly and critically so I don't necessarily stand behind it as "what he says, I think." Very interesting though. Here's the end:

 
I take it it goes without saying that all of this is unfair. While I think that a number of criticisms of the Clintons, and perhaps a few attacks as well, might have been warranted, I don't think it was the least bit fair that they were subjected to either the amount or the kind of vilification that they received. And everything I've said above is true precisely because Hillary Clinton was vilified. It's because of that fact that many people are inclined to believe the worst of her reflexively. And it's also because of that fact that Democrats are inclined to react to attacks on her defensively and angrily.

But fairness isn't the point when it comes to nominating a candidate for the Presidency. No one is entitled to be the Democratic nominee, and all sorts of people have lost their chance to be nominated unfairly. It's unfair that Chris Dodd and Bill Richardson had to go up against one of the strongest Democratic fields in living memory. It's unfair that Paul Tsongas looked like a dweeb. It's unfair that Richard Nixon's five o'clock shadow played any role at all in the 1960 election, hard as I find it to regret its effects. I could go on and on, and that's without getting into all the people who didn't even bother to run, or for that matter to enter politics, for unfair reasons.

If we want to, we could take this opportunity to redress the injustices done to Hillary Clinton. Personally, I'd rather win, and win in a way that makes it harder for those kinds of injustices to be perpetrated on anyone in the future.
 
 
 
 
I've said several times that I'd vote for any of the top three Democrats. I really, really hope I get to vote for Obama. If he's the nominee, I'll work hard to do what I can to help him get elected. If Edwards is the nominee, I'll work for him too. If Hillary's the nominee, I'll probably just vote for her and leave it at that.

Nobody is perfect. In a less impressive field, I'd probably just kind of accept that Hillary is imperfect but the best shot. Obama isn't perfect either -- but I think he's a much better choice.
 

Fair enough.

I just don't think McCain will get the republican nomination; he's too moderate for most conservative republicans and the evangelist; don't buy his johnny come lately smoothing up the jerry fawells after being against them. Some democrats might vote for him who don't want Hillary to win; but I just don't think Obama will get it and I don't believe it has anything to do with race; I just think Hillary has got the nomination. I could be wrong; and if I am; its ok with me either way as long as Romney; Hukabee (spell?) or Guilani (xspell) don't get president. I like them both (Hillary and Obama) and even though I am disgusted at McCain for not fighting harder on torture (the final bill after Bush's insertions) and other issues; I can live with him being president.
 
 
Weird tone-deafness from British media, I've noticed. This is one that I found back, there have been more, though.

From the Guardian:

 
A New Hampshire Clinton campaign official, Bill Shaheen, resigned last month after suggesting Democrats should be wary of nominating Obama because of his past drug use.

In what seems to have been another misjudged remark, Obama's wife, Michelle, campaigning for him in South Carolina, also brought up race. Addressing African-Americans sceptical about his ability to win, she said Iowa, which is predominantly white, voted for Obama. "Ain't no black people in Iowa," she said.

The language could alienate some white voters and the comment is also wrong: there are 75,000 African-Americans in Iowa.
 

 http://www.guardian.co.uk/uselections08/hillaryclinton/story/0,,2241051,00.html 

I haven't seen anyone complaining about that anywhere else (and look, they conflated it with the Bill Shaheen comment), partly because it's such a "no duh" sort of statement. She doesn't mean literally there is not one single black person in Iowa (the Guardian's officious "fact checking" notwithstanding), she was saying, colloquially, that Obama won in an overwhelmingly white state. And Iowa is an overwhelmingly white state. <shrug>
 
 
Interesting article in a local SC paper, calling on Clyburn to endorse Obama and give a Democrat a chance of carrying SC (in a general election) for the first time in 30 years:

 http://www.free-times.com/index.php?cat=11012501074601536&ShowArticle_ID=11461501080856437 

 
Which brings me to the point: History may be in the hands of Jim Clyburn. The powerful and respected South Carolina congressman wisely resisted urgings to sign on with the "inevitable" Clinton candidacy, leaving him now in a position to put Obama over the top if he wants to.

And surely he wants to. While it was once avowed racists who publicly smeared black candidates, now it is the Clintons and their surrogates.

[...]

Clyburn voiced strong objections to the Clinton tactics in an interview with The New York Times, using words like "denigrate" and "disrespect." He went on to say he was reconsidering his neutrality in the race.

An endorsement of Obama by Clyburn would be "game over" in South Carolina and likely a pivotal moment in the 2008 campaign.

History is calling, Congressman Clyburn. Will you answer?
 
 
 
Michael Chabon on Huffington Post about a fearmongering article by Richard Cohen, that Andrew Sullivan has also been referring to:

 http://www.huffingtonpost.com/michael-chabon/hey-louis-farrakhan-and-_b_81698.html 

It begins:

 
Writing in his regular column for the Washington Post today, Richard Cohen sought to frighten me and every other Jew in America into believing that Barack Obama at worst supports, and at best tacitly approves of, the vile ideology and racialist libels that Louis Farrakhan has variously promulgated over the course of a long and serpentine career.

Having received a number of anxious emails from fellow Jews across the country, quoting from or including the entire text of the column, I can reassure Mr. Cohen that his efforts have not gone in vain. No one could argue, however, that Mr. Cohen set himself a difficult task. As a Jew, I know how easy it is to fear an anti-Semite, in particular a rabid one who, like Farrakhan, claims to have the ear of millions.

Indeed, it is as easy to fear hatred as it is to feel it; that is precisely why I refuse to be afraid. An extremist cannot flourish without the good offices of alarmists and those whom they incite to fear.
 
 
 
An "open letter" in response:

 http://rac.org/Articles/index.cfm?id=2631&pge_prg_id=7037 

 
Rabbi David Saperstein, Director of the Religious Action Center of Reform Judaism, today joined an array of Jewish community leaders in speaking out against "hateful emails that use falsehood and innuendo to mischaracterize Senator Barack Obama's religious beliefs and who he is as a person."
 
 
 
 http://www.nytimes.com/2008/01/16/nyregion/16about.html 

About fears in the black community about Obama's safety.

While it wasn't a point of the article, reminded me that the 40th anniversary of MLK's assassination is April 4th. There are bound to be commemorations, "where I was when it happened" remembrances, etc. The bulk of the primaries will be over by then -- 11 left at that point -- and maybe the whole thing will already be decided. But made me wonder whether that date would help or harm Obama -- make people fearful, or inspire them with the possibility of a black president.
 
 
 
An "open letter" in response:
 

Actually I'm not sure if it's in response to Cohen or in response to "Obama is a Muslim"-type emails. The latter might be more likely.
 
 
Reading all political commentaries, I get the feeling that I'm not supposed to think on my own. Meaning, if I won't vote for Obama it's for a reason that I read or hear; not my own reason. For example, what if I won't vote for Obama because he was never in the military? Or, I personally prefer a President that was raised in a state that has a conservative history? Or, any number of reasons; none of them based on race.

What if I like Hillary because she already knows the 24/7 agenda of a Commander-In-Chief? Must I like her for the reasons I read or hear?(Why can't I be a male that would vote for her because she's a female?)

In other words, I stay away from all the articles, since I feel the inference in so many articles is that I don't have a brain that can make up my mind, for my own personal reasons! Or, my reasons aren't the correct reasons, so I should forget them, if they are not in some article.
 
 
Hi Foofie,

Interesting... how about if you write an article about it?

;-)

I'm only partly kidding.

That's part of what I was referring to when I mentioned not having time to read an article thoroughly and critically -- I definitely don't just go "oh, you're right!" when I read these things.

If I cite them to come back to it's usually because they have a fresh perspective, or they put something I was already thinking into words in a good clear way (saving me the effort), or because there are facts and figures that I would want to cite exactly. Some others are things I think might become important later and I want to keep tabs on. Probably more reasons than that, too.

But I definitely don't look to them to tell me what to think.
 
 
Glad to see you back in the saddle, soz. (my way of bookmarking.)
 
 
Hi Swimpy!

This is nothing special in and of itself but I'm putting it here as an example of something I see fairly often but is supposedly rare -- the "objective" news article that is pro-Hillary and anti-Obama. Here's an excerpt from it:

 
Some pundits scratched their heads when Obama was trailing Clinton among black voters. (He recently pulled even or ahead.) But it made perfect sense.

Clinton had a track record of working for African-Americans' interests. Obama was not just skirting controversies such as the "Jena Six" - the black Louisiana teen-agers punished disproportionately last year for their role in a racial fracas - but was aiming his appeals squarely at the white Iowans who he knew could make him the front-runner.

None of this is to minimise the barriers that Obama has faced and still faces because of his race.
 

So, how is that parenthetical ("he recently pulled even or ahead" -- try WAY ahead) explained by the rest? Did they discover his record (working for disenfranchised black voters and as a community organizer in black communities, for example)?

Or, could they have always been willing to support him while being wary of his ability to win -- which would fit perfectly with his surge in support among black voters and the timing of it?

Then there's this:

 
Throughout, his voice and cadences suggested that he had studied Martin Luther King Jr.'s register and rhythms, the better to subtly evoke liberalism's great lost moment of revolutionary achievement and unfulfilled promise.
 

How very calculating! Couldn't it be that the speech of both is influenced by black churches?

It's from an African newspaper but by an American writer.

 http://allafrica.com/stories/200801161049.html 
 
 
This is cool:

 
In 1985, according to The Nation magazine, Obama, after graduating with a degree in political science from Columbia University in New York City, became an organizer for the Developing Communities Project to help black people in Chicago's far south side whose lives had been upended because of the steel mill closings. He was just 24 then, made $13,000 a year, and trolled around the area in a second-hand Honda Civic getting congregations involved in transforming their neighborhoods.

"Over the past five years, I've often had a difficult time explaining my profession to folks," Obama wrote in 1990 in Illinois Issues, a publication out of Springfield, Ill. "Typical is a remark a public school administrative aide made to me one bleak January morning, while I waited to deliver some flyers to a group of confused and angry parents who had discovered the presence of asbestos in their school.

"'Listen, Obama,'" she began. "'You're a bright young man, Obama. You went to college, didn't you?'

"I nodded.

"'I just cannot understand why a bright young man like you would go to college, get that degree and become a community organizer.'

"Why's that?

"'Cause the pay is low, the hours is long, and don't nobody appreciate you." She shook her head in puzzlement as she wandered back to attend to her duties.

"I've thought back on that conversation more than once during the time I've organized with the Developing Communities Project, based in Chicago's far south side. Unfortunately, the answers that come to mind haven't been as simple as her question. Probably the shortest one is this: It needs to be done, and not enough folks are doing it."
 

The article that quoted that section goes on to say:

 
 

 http://www.blackamericaweb.com/site.aspx/sayitloud/weathersbee116 
 
 
By the way, that African article isn't meant to make a case -- too obscure -- but I do want to note that right now it's the first non-book result for "Obama" in a Google search. (It's the first news item, and the news items [3] appear before everything else.)
 
 
 
 
An "open letter" in response:
 

Actually I'm not sure if it's in response to Cohen or in response to "Obama is a Muslim"-type emails. The latter might be more likely.
 

It is a great letter and I thank them for it. But, also keep in mind the last sentence of their letter and this tidbit I found on their website about the history of their group:

1999: In honor of Rabbi David Saperstein's 25th anniversary with the RAC, President Bill Clinton gives the keynote address at a tribute to Saperstein during the RAC's Consultation on Conscience.
 
 
 
By the way, that African article isn't meant to make a case -- too obscure -- but I do want to note that right now it's the first non-book result for "Obama" in a Google search. (It's the first news item, and the news items [3] appear before everything else.)
 

FYI, that author, David Greenberg is also the one that wrote the article: "Why Obamamania? Because He Runs as The Great White Hope. Why All the Mania? He's Running as the Great White Hope."
 
 
bookmarking
 
 
Thanks for the additional info, Butrflynet, interesting.

Hi msolga!

Haven't read this yet, bet I'll like it:

 http://www.timesonline.co.uk/tol/comment/columnists/andrew_sullivan/article3137473.ece 

It's a column by Andrew Sullivan called "Obama emerges as a liberal Reagan who can reunite America."
 
 
I read it, (Sullivan's column) about what I expected but good.

 
A Barack Obama sticker decorates the bumper of Helen Quarles's car. It fit neatly over the Hillary Clinton decal Quarles, a retired auto worker from McCormick, South Carolina, displayed until recently.
 

:-)

From "Obama's Surging Black Support May Tilt South Carolina Primary":

 http://www.bloomberg.com/apps/news?pid=20601087&sid=a6aWZAnp5M08&refer=home 
 
 
Spare thought -- putting it here rather than elsewhere because it's more of a "Hmm, maybe, let me write that down before I forget it" thought than a "YES, that's it!" thought...

I do think that there was at least a little intentionality from Hillary's campaign to the whole race thing that happened. The Meet the Press appearance, especially, but lots of elements. I've kept trying to think of why they would purposely do that, if so. Lots of plausible possibilities.

But one thing I just thought of. It's long been suspected that if Obama did well in Iowa and/ or NH, that would go a long way towards energizing the black voters, such as the voters who are set to make a big difference (one way or another) in South Carolina. Obama did well in Iowa. The polls started showing the shift in SC.

Then the race thing. And what I keep seeing is that people are framing the change in SC in terms of annoyance with the Clintons, solidarity with Obama, etc. The polls seemed to indicate that the change predated that, and it might not even be because of that.

It occurred to me that it would allow Hillary to brush off a loss in SC as an unfortunate result of that unfortunate race row that wasn't even her fault, WHILE scoring long-term points by making Obama the black candidate, bouyed by black voters, and scaring off some white votes. And very handily shunting aside the inspirational, WOW aspect of an Obama win in SC. Just the race card, that's all.

I didn't get that out totally the way I wanted to and it wasn't a fully-formed thought in the first place, so I'm not necessarily standing by any of the above. Just a thought that I'd like to come back to later.
 
 
Huckabee's a goof:

 http://tpmelectioncentral.com/2008/01/huckabee_equates_homosexuality_with_bestiality.php 
 
 
"The Obama of 'Dreams'"

 http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2008/01/16/AR2008011603446.html?hpid=opinionsbox1 

The "third-culture kid" stuff is interesting. I think it's some of what I was talking about in terms of how I identify with him because of my experience as both Deaf and "hearing." Hadn't seen that term before.
 
 
bookmarking... hadnt seen this yet
 
 
 
Playing to win, by hilzoy (who, judging by his avatar, may be fishin' -- fishin', that you? ;-))

 http://obsidianwings.blogs.com/obsidian_wings/2008/01/playing-to-win.html 

This is an interesting one, hard to summarize. I agree with a lot of it, but it's one that falls into the category of haven't yet had time to read it thoroughly and critically so I don't necessarily stand behind it as "what he says, I think." Very interesting though. Here's the end:

 
I take it it goes without saying that all of this is unfair. While I think that a number of criticisms of the Clintons, and perhaps a few attacks as well, might have been warranted, I don't think it was the least bit fair that they were subjected to either the amount or the kind of vilification that they received. And everything I've said above is true precisely because Hillary Clinton was vilified. It's because of that fact that many people are inclined to believe the worst of her reflexively. And it's also because of that fact that Democrats are inclined to react to attacks on her defensively and angrily.

But fairness isn't the point when it comes to nominating a candidate for the Presidency. No one is entitled to be the Democratic nominee, and all sorts of people have lost their chance to be nominated unfairly. It's unfair that Chris Dodd and Bill Richardson had to go up against one of the strongest Democratic fields in living memory. It's unfair that Paul Tsongas looked like a dweeb. It's unfair that Richard Nixon's five o'clock shadow played any role at all in the 1960 election, hard as I find it to regret its effects. I could go on and on, and that's without getting into all the people who didn't even bother to run, or for that matter to enter politics, for unfair reasons.

If we want to, we could take this opportunity to redress the injustices done to Hillary Clinton. Personally, I'd rather win, and win in a way that makes it harder for those kinds of injustices to be perpetrated on anyone in the future.
 

 

I keep coming back to this one and wondering if blatham has seen it and what his take on it is. Are you out there, bernie?
 
 
 
"The Obama of 'Dreams'"

 http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2008/01/16/AR2008011603446.html?hpid=opinionsbox1 

The "third-culture kid" stuff is interesting. I think it's some of what I was talking about in terms of how I identify with him because of my experience as both Deaf and "hearing." Hadn't seen that term before.
 

That is pretty familiar to me, within my family. Liked the article.
 
 
bm
 
 
Your niece, Osso?

Hi Bill!

This is just plain a plonk.

 http://mediamatters.org/items/200801170010?f=h_latest 
 
 
Another plonk (closing windows)

 http://politicalticker.blogs.cnn.com/2008/01/17/clinton-edwards-campaigns-blast-radio-ads-backing-obama/ 

Burton's response worries me a bit -- he has a point or two, but Edwards decried the 527 ads that attacked Hillary and Obama in Iowa. Burton's response doesn't seem to be saying "that's unfortunate, we'll ask them to stop." He does say "discourages," I guess, but that's not very strong.
 
 
 
It occurred to me that it would allow Hillary to brush off a loss in SC as an unfortunate result of that unfortunate race row that wasn't even her fault, WHILE scoring long-term points by making Obama the black candidate, bouyed by black voters, and scaring off some white votes. And very handily shunting aside the inspirational, WOW aspect of an Obama win in SC. Just the race card, that's all.
 

Another way to put it:

 
Okay, let him carry South Carolina, as long as he is tagged with Afrocentrism.
 

 http://cdobs.com/archive/our-columns/why-the-clintons-play-the-race-card706/ 
 
 
Really, really good Op-Ed by David Brooks:

 http://www.nytimes.com/2008/01/18/opinion/18brooks.html 

It's depressing in a few ways, but I really agree with him.
 
 
Its kinda like a cricket match.

It goes on and on and on, is a boring as hell unless your really into it, and you don't know who is winning until it is nearly all over.
 
 
Heh!

Pretty much. :-)

(And if you are really into it it's terribly exciting!) (Never said I wasn't a dweeb.)
 
 
Obama (from what little i have seen) would get my vote.

However I suspect Joe public would vote Hillary as a safer option.

I don't think your a dweeb.
 
 
Soz, I just found your thread. I am interested that you reacted the same way as I did to Hillary's "experience" which seems pretty unremarkable for a presidential candidate.

Did you read the piece by William Crystal in the NYTimes a few days ago, called "The Democrats' Fairy Tale"? He stirred up a hornet's nest of commentary and many of the letters were bickering about the surge. Now I see that Obama is being criticized for saying he wouldn't have voted for the war in 2002 and 2003 while now he has voted in the Senate to support bills to fund the war.

The Iraq invasion can be seen as akin to the situation of a woman who gets pregnant because of an ill-considered, and life-changing, error on her part. She decides not to add a second mistake to her first and dedicates herself to carrying the baby to full term and then bringing it up as best she can.

We who opposed the war in every way available to us might have added a second mistake to our Administration's awful first error by continually demanding that US troops be withdrawn from the chaos created by our invasion. It might seem illogical to some observers when legislators who opposed the war from the beginning vote to continue payments for ammunition, armor, and support to protect our soldiers on the ground, but their actions are the only reasonable ones under the circumstances. Their votes are not inconsistent with their unsuccessful attempts to stop the war before it began

If -- sometime down the line and perhaps many years hence -- we can rally assistance from our own countrymen and from abroad in overseeing any kind of stability in Iraq, then we will be as lucky as the woman who gave birth to that child if she can somehow rally support from family, friends, or institutions whose warnings she previously eschewed. Until we get that lucky, we'd better stick to the path that is becoming every day more painfully difficult than any of the "visionaries" could have imagined and try to raise this child as best we can.
 
 
Hi Kara! Welcome.

I like your metaphor re: Iraq, and I agree that not wanting the war to start at all but wanting to fund it once it's started are consistent positions.

I just saw Hillary say someplace, again, that Obama had promised not to vote to fund it -- I'd seen that debunked somewhere but I don't remember where. (Maybe I posted it here? I'll go back and look, just here for a second now.) Anyway, that's a note to myself to keep an eye out for the debunking if I haven't already posted it.

Interesting article about Michelle Obama here, although it repeats the weird assertion that her "ain't no black people in Iowa" comment is, ya know, not completely accurate.  

 http://www.guardian.co.uk/uselections08/barackobama/story/0,,2243386,00.html 
 
 
OK, I looked back through and the debunking thing isn't here. Shoot. Will keep an eye out for it, or for any repetitions since Hillary seems to keep hitting that point (that Obama promised not to fund the war if he was elected, which doesn't seem to be the case).
 
 
This wasn't what I had in mind but seems a bit more thorough yet:

 http://www.motherjones.com/mojoblog/archives/2008/01/6786_desperate_in_nh_1.html 

 
Yesterday, in an interview with CNN, Clinton said:

If someone is going to claim that by their very words they are making change, then if those words say... I'm against the war in Iraq and I'll never vote for funding and then, when they go to the Senate, they vote for 300 billion dollars' worth of funding [for the war], I think it's time for people to say, "Wait a minute, let's get real here." There's a big difference between talking and acting, between rhetoric and reality. Just this week, when I was asked, would I have voted for the $87 billion dollars [in a war funding], I said no. I said no unequivocally because, at a certain point, we have to say no to George Bush. If we keep on getting steamrolled, we are not going to stand a chance.

Is it possible to read that statement as a promise never to vote for Iraq war funds? Not by any reasonable interpretation. In fact, during Obama's Senate campaign, he explained his opposition to this particular war funding bill in detail. From a September 29, 2003 Obama press release:

Obama challenged the Congress to 'stand up to the misplaced priorities of this Administration' by delaying the $87 billion for Iraq until the President provides a specific plan and timetable for ending the U.S. occupation, justifies each and every dollar to ensure it is not going to reward Bush political friends and contributors, and provides 'investment in our own schools, health care, economic development and job creation that is at least comparable' to what is going to Iraq. 'It's not just Iraq that needs rebuilding. It's America, too,' Obama said. I looked at the quote [you cited]. He was clearly speaking about the $87 billion package. But what Sen. Clinton told CNN was that Obama said, "I'll never vote for [Iraq war] funding." He doesn't say that in the quote. Was she accurately quoting him?

I received no response.

As Hillary Clinton was leaving Dover, I attempted to put the question to her. She had just finished the interview with Fox and another with a local station. Inside the gym, I was two feet away from her. "Can I ask you one question about Iraq and Senator Obama?" I inquired. She looked at me for a nanosecond and walked away.

During her speech to supporters at Dover, Clinton said, that it's important to disseminate information on all the candidates "so voters can make a well-informed decision.... I will do whatever I can to make sure voters have the information they need." But ascertaining that this information is accurate is apparently not on her to-do list.
 
 
 
 
 
It occurred to me that it would allow Hillary to brush off a loss in SC as an unfortunate result of that unfortunate race row that wasn't even her fault, WHILE scoring long-term points by making Obama the black candidate, bouyed by black voters, and scaring off some white votes. And very handily shunting aside the inspirational, WOW aspect of an Obama win in SC. Just the race card, that's all.
 

Another way to put it:

 
Okay, let him carry South Carolina, as long as he is tagged with Afrocentrism.
 

 http://cdobs.com/archive/our-columns/why-the-clintons-play-the-race-card706/ 
 

First paragraph from a news item in the Boston Globe:

 
Hillary Clinton's support among black Democrats has cratered as racial politics emerged in the nomination fight, a new poll suggested today.
 

As opposed to "Barack Obama's support among black Democrats has surged as his win in Iowa and close second in New Hampshire demonstrated his ability to win."

 http://www.boston.com/news/politics/politicalintelligence/2008/01/clinton_loses_s.html 
 
 
Stanley Crouch on Michelle Obama (he's impressed):

 http://seattlepi.nwsource.com/opinion/347944_crouch20.html 
 
 
 
Just this week, when I was asked, would I have voted for the $87 billion dollars [in a war funding], I said no. I said no unequivocally because, at a certain point, we have to say no to George Bush. If we keep on getting steamrolled, we are not going to stand a chance.
 

He said no before he said yes  
 
 
I don't think so -- he wasn't in the U.S. Senate yet at that point.

This seems to be the transcript of the interview Crouch links to (YouTube):

 http://www.msnbc.msn.com/id/21771034/ 
 
 
Plonk:

 http://blog.washingtonpost.com/the-trail/2008/01/18/for_both_clinton_and_obama_nuc.html?hpid=topnews 
 
 
This is an interesting article. Some good insight from David Axelrod, I think:

 
"We came into New Hampshire on a high," said David Axelrod, Obama's senior adviser. "The iconic rallies, combined with the polling, conveyed a sense that we were taking it for granted. She [Clinton] looked like she was working for it, scraping for it." He added, "This is a long process, and this is how you learn."
 

I also tend to agree with this:

 
Watching the new course Obama has taken, some campaign insiders like to think the New Hampshire loss was not the worst outcome for a candidate who is relatively new to the national stage, compared with Clinton, and followed a relatively easy path to the Senate. Had Obama won in New Hampshire, said one prominent Democrat, he might have become the prohibitive favorite for the nomination, "but he wouldn't be ready for the general election, he wouldn't be ready for the White House."
 

Well not so much "wouldn't have been ready" as "will be more ready as a result of this than if the path to the nomination had been a cakewalk."

The article also has a pretty good collection of debunkings -- what Clinton alleged vs. the truth. (For example the mailings about Obama voting "present" on some abortion votes indicating that he was iffy about abortion rights, while Pam Sutherland, head of Planned Parenthood in IL said that the votes were a purposeful strategy; ""The facts are the facts -- he helped us with a winning strategy.")

"When Attacked, Obama's Now Hitting Back"

 http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2008/01/18/AR2008011803765_2.html?sid=ST2008011900229 
 
 
My concern -- rock and a hard place. Clinton keeps up the steady barrage of attacks -- whether they're true or not -- and Obama has to keep staying above the fray or else respond. The problem with responding is that it becomes this whole "they're squabbling" thing, with too many voters reacting as if it is something coming from both of them equally.

How about if Edwards wins Nevada (I'm not going so far as to predict but I'm really not ruling it out) and then Clinton trains her sights on him...
 
 
Sozobe, I'm pasting this in its entirety because I find often that links to WSJ pieces don't work.

I often disagree with Chris Hitchins but he's always a good read.

The Perils of Identity Politics
By CHRISTOPHER HITCHENS
January 18, 2008; Page A13

Let us give hearty thanks and credit to Rudy Giuliani, who has never by word or gesture implied that we would fracture any kind of "ceiling" if we elected as chief executive a man whose surname ends in a vowel.

Yet actually, it would be unprecedented if someone of Italian descent became the president of the United States and there was a time -- not long ago at that -- when the very idea would have aroused considerable passion. Now that it doesn't, is it not possible to think that that very indifference is the real "change"?

I recall thinking, when Geraldine Ferraro became the first woman on a major-party ticket in 1984, that she would also, if elected, be the first vowel-ending Veep. Indeed, in San Francisco for the Democratic convention that year, I listened to the poet Lawrence Ferlinghetti muse over drinks on the possibility of a future Cuomo-Ferraro "all wop" ticket.

The fact that these were now joking words and not fighting words struck me as happily suggestive. (I also thought that a President Walter Mondale would be a very high price to pay for having the first female vice president, and that President Mario Cuomo would be an even higher price to pay to prove that we no longer held any rooted prejudice against the descendants of Mediterranean immigrants.)

People who think with their epidermis or their genitalia or their clan are the problem to begin with. One does not banish this specter by invoking it. If I would not vote against someone on the grounds of "race" or "gender" alone, then by the exact same token I would not cast a vote in his or her favor for the identical reason. Yet see how this obvious question makes fairly intelligent people say the most alarmingly stupid things.

Madeleine Albright has said that there is "a special place in hell for women who don't help each other." What are the implications of this statement? Would it be an argument in favor of the candidacy of Mrs. Clinton? Would this mean that Elizabeth Edwards and Michelle Obama don't deserve the help of fellow females? If the Republicans nominated a woman would Ms. Albright instantly switch parties out of sheer sisterhood? Of course not. (And this wearisome tripe from someone who was once our secretary of state...)

Those of us who follow politics seriously rather than view it as a game show do not look at Hillary Clinton and simply think "first woman president." We think -- for example -- "first ex-co-president" or "first wife of a disbarred lawyer and impeached former incumbent" or "first person to use her daughter as photo-op protection during her husband's perjury rap."

One might come up with other and kinder distinctions (I shall not be doing so) but the plain fact about the senator from New York is surely that she is a known quantity who has already been in the White House purely as the result of a relationship with a man, and not at all a quixotic outsider who represents the aspirations of an "out" group, let alone a whole sex or gender.

Mrs. Clinton, speaking to a black church audience on Martin Luther King Day last year, did describe President George W. Bush as treating the Congress of the United States like "a plantation," adding in a significant tone of voice that "you know what I mean..."

She did not repeat this trope, for some reason, when addressing the electors of Iowa or New Hampshire. She's willing to ring the other bell, though, if it suits her. But when an actual African-American challenger comes along, she rather tends to pout and wince at his presumption (or did until recently).

Here again, the problem is that Sen. Obama wants us to transcend something at the same time he implicitly asks us to give that same something as a reason to vote for him. I must say that the lyricism with which he does this has double and triple the charm of Mrs. Clinton's heavily-scripted trudge through the landscape, but the irony is still the same.

What are we trying to "get over" here? We are trying to get over the hideous legacy of slavery and segregation. But Mr. Obama is not a part of this legacy. His father was a citizen of Kenya, an independent African country, and his mother was a "white" American. He is as distant from the real "plantation" as I am. How -- unless one thinks obsessively about color while affecting not to do so -- does this make him "black"?

Far from taking us forward, this sort of discussion actually keeps us anchored in the past. The enormous advances in genome studies have effectively discredited the whole idea of "race" as a means of categorizing humans. And however ethnicity may be defined or subdivided, it is utterly unscientific and retrograde to confuse it with color. The number of subjective definitions of "racist" is almost infinite but the only objective definition of the word is "one who believes that there are human races."

For years, I declined to fill in the form for my Senate press credential that asked me to state my "race," unless I was permitted to put "human." The form had to be completed under penalty of perjury, so I could not in conscience put "white," which is not even a color let alone a "race," and I sternly declined to put "Caucasian," which is an exploded term from a discredited ethnology. Surely the essential and unarguable core of King's campaign was the insistence that pigmentation was a false measure: a false measure of mankind (yes, mankind) and an inheritance from a time of great ignorance and stupidity and cruelty, when one drop of blood could make you "black."

I remember going to several of the mass events generated by Colin Powell's memoirs a few years ago, and being very touched by the eagerness with which young and old "white" people hoped he would give them the chance to elect (what would in fact have been) our first West Indian president. It was all book-tour hype as it turned out -- I could have told you that then -- but now it has resurfaced in a similarly naïve way.

Not to dampen any parade, but if one asks if there is a single thing about Mr. Obama's Senate record, or state legislature record, or current program, that could possibly justify his claim to the presidency one gets... what? Not much. Similarly lightweight unqualified "white" candidates have overcome this objection, to be sure, but what kind of standard is that?

I shall not vote for Sen. Obama and it will not be because he -- like me and like all of us -- carries African genes. And I shall not be voting for Mrs. Clinton, who has the gall to inform me after a career of overweening entitlement that there is "a double standard" at work for women in politics; and I assure you now that this decision of mine has only to do with the content of her character. We will know that we have put this behind us when -- as with the vowel -- we have outgrown and forgotten the original prejudice.

Mr. Hitchens is a columnist for Vanity Fair and the author of "No One Left To Lie To: The Triangulations of William Jefferson Clinton" (Verso, 2000).
 
 
One more spare thought -- as I research more of these allegations and find the fact-checks, I get more and more impatient with Hillary. A lot of them could conceivably fall in the "honest mistake" category -- something looks bad in some way and her campaign doesn't know all of the details and makes a mistaken but understandable misreading -- but so many of them have already come up and have already been debunked, but she just keeps on saying it.
 
 
Interesting, Kara. I'm not sure I agree with this, though:

 
What are we trying to "get over" here? We are trying to get over the hideous legacy of slavery and segregation. But Mr. Obama is not a part of this legacy. His father was a citizen of Kenya, an independent African country, and his mother was a "white" American. He is as distant from the real "plantation" as I am. How -- unless one thinks obsessively about color while affecting not to do so -- does this make him "black"?
 

He's American. He listened to his high school basketball coach call an opposing team "niggers," and explain why that was so. He "is" -- in the sense of what he looks like -- black. That gets reactions on a day-to-day basis in America, still, whether it's in terms of hailing a cab or electing a president.

I don't think anyone doubts that, Hitchens notwithstanding, there ARE people in America who won't vote for Obama simply because he's black.

And that there are black people who don't want to vote for him because, based on their own experience, they don't think there is any way that America will elect a black president; or that if a black president is elected, he'll be assassinated soon enough.

That's what Michelle is asking people to get over. I think that's valid.
 
 
You'll be interested in this one, Soz.

 http://blog.washingtonpost.com/the-trail/2008/01/18/trying_to_heal_a_rift_in_new_h_1.html 

An excerpt:

Trying to Heal a Rift in New Hampshire
By Alec MacGillis
Three New Hampshire Democratic leaders who signed a letter two days before the state's primary at the request of Hillary Clinton's campaign, attacking Barack Obama as soft in his support for abortion rights, are asking Obama supporters in the state to put the rifts of the primary campaign behind them and praising Obama for being "strongly pro-choice."

Of the two dozen prominent women who signed the critical letter, e-mailed by the Clinton campaign to a list of supporters and undecided voters, three have now signed their names to another missive asking abortion rights supporters in the state to come together and take comfort in the fact that all of the Democratic presidential candidates are firmly pro-choice. One of the three Clinton supporters went even further, saying in an interview Thursday that signing the letter attacking Obama was a "mistake."

Katie Wheeler, a former state senator, said the Clinton campaign had not given her background information about Obama's record on abortion rights when it asked her to sign the letter calling him weak on the issue, and said that, as a result, she did not understand the context of the votes that the letter was attacking him over.

"It should never have gotten to the point where anyone thought Obama was not pro-choice," said Wheeler, a founder of the New Hampshire chapter of NARAL Pro-Choice America. "I don't think the Clinton campaign should have done that. It was divisive and unnecessary...I think it was a mistake and I've spoken to the national [Clinton campaign] and told them it caused problems in New Hampshire, and am hoping they won't do it again."
 
 
Yep, thanks.

Clarence Page, again:

 http://www.chicagotribune.com/news/opinion/chi-08119page-column,0,5294737.column 
 
 
 http://factcheck.barackobama.com/ 
 
 
Soz
I thought you were one of the people on this site whose word could be believed but when I went to your site I found that it wasn't fact check but a political ad posted by someone who is a Obama supporter. I went to fact check to verify the article and couldn't find it there. When I tried to access your political article I couldn't get it up again. Strange.
 
 
Which article? The one above?

That's Barack Obama's own site -- not a supporter.

It has cites within it. (Blue font, click on it and it takes you to the sources.)

I just clicked on it and it worked fine.

Were you talking about something else?

By the way I'm not claiming anything in particular (in terms of "word could be believed,") I just saw that site and plonked it here so I could find it back if I wanted to. See my first post on this thread. Haven't read the whole thing yet, but what I've read so far seems on the up-and-up.
 
 
Hillary's "Meet the Press" transcript from January 13th, 2008 -- keeps coming up and I have to keep hunting it down, so a plonk:

 http://www.msnbc.msn.com/id/22634967/ 
 
 
So why didn't you say it was a Obama politicel ad instead of intimating it was Fact check.
 
 
I didn't intimate anything. I copied and pasted an url. On a thread specifically opened to be a repository of various sites I find that I want to save in some way to come back to.

Geez.
 
 
Another one to add to your reading list, Soz.

 http://www.tpmcafe.com/blog/specialguests/2008/jan/21/understanding_leadership_and_organizing_for_change 

Psst... tpmcafe.com is a website not a place that advertises coffee. :wink:
 
 
 
 
One more:

 http://blogs.tnr.com/tnr/blogs/the_plank/archive/2008/01/21/obama-the-electable.aspx 
 
 
 
So why didn't you say it was a Obama politicel ad instead of intimating it was Fact check.
 

I've noticed a few sites trying to hitch a ride on the good reputation that factcheck.org has developed. It's p!ssed me off more than once to discover that I'd been led to a specific site's fact check, not actually factcheck.org.

Live and learn.
 
 
 http://pollingreport.com/l-o.htm#Obama 

(Referred to in the last article I posted, about Obama's favorable vs. unfavorable ratings. Interesting that only 3% don't know who he is, now, and only 6% are unsure. 59% favorable, 32% unfavorable in last poll, taken 1/10-13/08.) (Hillary's ratings, by contrast, are 50% favorable, 46% unfavorable, 4% unsure.)
 
 
I found this interesting:

 http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2008/01/21/AR2008012101864.html?hpid=opinionsbox1 
 
 
Thanks, Swimpy. I found that interesting too. Eugene Robinson wasn't on my radar until recently, I keep finding interesting columns by him, though.

Some others (closing windows)

Bennie Thompson's endorsement, Tom Daschle's comments re: Bill Clinton, more:
 http://thecaucus.blogs.nytimes.com/2008/01/22/obama-continues-duel-with-b-clinton/ 

This probably isn't anything but is the sort of thing I can imagine wanting to find back (Edwards and Hillary meet privately):
 http://politicalticker.blogs.cnn.com/2008/01/22/clinton-edwards-hold-private-post-debate-meeting/ 

More on what Obama is saying today about the Clintons:
 http://weblogs.baltimoresun.com/news/politics/blog/2008/01/obama_clintons_will_say_anythi.html 

Interview with James Clyburn, with some good insights and quotes:
 http://abcnews.go.com/Politics/story?id=4163442&page=1 

Interesting long article about the whole Reagan flap, with transcripts and other good stuff:
 http://www.nytimes.com/2008/01/21/us/politics/21web-seelye.html 
 
 
One more:

This is a page on the Barack Obama site that has facts to debunk various email smears going around. Got the link in an interesting email from John Kerry.
 http://my.barackobama.com/page/content/factcheckactioncenter/ 
 
 
ONE more and I'm done for the day...

 http://www.thenation.com/blogs/campaignmatters?bid=45&pid=273904 
 
 
 http://online.wsj.com/article/SB120105705756408791.html?mod=googlenews_wsj 

Very long article, but very insightful regarding the contrasting organizing tactics being used in SC by both campaigns.

Excerpt:

In early voting states such as Iowa and New Hampshire, campaigns use rallies and personal appearances to get votes. Now, the nominating races have moved to bigger states, including much of the South. Candidates here rely on endorsements from powerful politicians and preachers. It is a tradition that has evolved since the 1960s to garner support among poor blacks who look to their preachers for both spiritual and political guidance. And it is the way Mrs. Clinton, like countless Democratic politicians before her, is running her campaign in South Carolina.

Mr. Obama, in contrast, is trying something many observers say has never been done here: He is circumventing entrenched local leadership and building a political machine from scratch. His staff consists largely of community organizers -- many from out of state or with no political experience -- who are assembling an army of volunteers. It is a strategy often used by labor organizations and in neighborhood and town politics.
 
 
Looks good, Butrflynet, thanks.

Re: the most recent debate, factcheck.org (yes, actually factcheck.org) has weighed in:

 http://www.factcheck.org/elections-2008/clinton-obama_slugfest.html 
 
 
The Chicago Tribune has a good report regarding Obama/Rezko here:
 http://www.chicagotribune.com/news/nationworld/chi-obama-rezko-clinton-080122,0,5430503.story?coll=chi_tab01_layout 

(You have to register)
 
 
Thanks, Swimpy!

 
Former President Clinton, who has been campaigning in South Carolina this week, sought Wednesday to lower expectations for his wife in the primary while raising them for Obama. He told crowd of about 100 people Charleston he was proud of the Democratic Party for having a woman and a black candidate and he understands why Obama is drawing support among blacks, who are expected to makeup at least half the primary turnout.

"As far as I can tell, neither Senator Obama nor Hillary have lost votes because of their race or gender. Clinton said. "But that's understandable because people are proud when someone who they identify with emerges for the first time."
 

 http://ap.google.com/article/ALeqM5isOFwdbq0tsqatW6vJpkDRTI1gMgD8UBPJ880 

Grrr....

That (bolded) is why Hillary was way ahead of Obama in SC until a month or so ago, of course...

It's the long-expected "so the black candidate wins South Carolina because he's black, big whoop" strategy.
 
 
Yup,
That's looks like the plan. Dick Morris makes it sound considerably more heinous:
***********
January 23, 2008
How Clinton Will Win the Nomination by Losing S.C.
By Dick Morris

 
Hillary Clinton will undoubtedly lose the South Carolina primary as African-Americans line up to vote for Barack Obama. And that defeat will power her drive to the nomination.

The Clintons are encouraging the national media to disregard the whites who vote in South Carolina's Democratic primary and focus on the black turnout, which is expected to be quite large. They have transformed South Carolina into Washington, D.C. -- an all-black primary that tells us how the African-American vote is going to go.

By saying he will go door to door in black neighborhoods in South Carolina matching his civil rights record against Obama's, Bill Clinton emphasizes the pivotal role the black vote will play in the contest. And by openly matching his record on race with that of the black candidate, he invites more and more scrutiny focused on the race issue.

Of course, Clinton is going to lose that battle. Blacks in Nevada overwhelmingly backed Obama and will obviously do so again in South Carolina, no matter how loudly former President Clinton protests. So why is he making such a fuss over a contest he knows he's going to lose?

Precisely because he is going to lose it. If Hillary loses South Carolina and the defeat serves to demonstrate Obama's ability to attract a bloc vote among black Democrats, the message will go out loud and clear to white voters that this is a racial fight. It's one thing for polls to show, as they now do, that Obama beats Hillary among African-Americans by better than 4-to-1 and Hillary carries whites by almost 2-to-1. But most people don't read the fine print on the polls. But if blacks deliver South Carolina to Obama, everybody will know that they are bloc-voting. That will trigger a massive white backlash against Obama and will drive white voters to Hillary Clinton.

Obama has done everything he possibly could to keep race out of this election. And the Clintons attracted national scorn when they tried to bring it back in by attempting to minimize the role Martin Luther King Jr. played in the civil rights movement. But here they have a way of appearing to seek the black vote, losing it, and getting their white backlash, all without any fingerprints showing. The more President Clinton begs black voters to back his wife, and the more they spurn her, the more the election becomes about race -- and Obama ultimately loses.

Because they have such plans for South Carolina, the Clintons were desperate to win in Nevada. They dared not lose two primaries in a row leading up to Florida. But now they can lose South Carolina with impunity, having won in Nevada.

But don't look for them to walk away from South Carolina. Their love needs to appear to have been unrequited by the black community for their rejection to seem so unfair that it triggers a white backlash. In this kind of ricochet politics, you have to lose openly and publicly in order to win the next round. And since the next round consists of all the important and big states, polarizing the contest into whites versus blacks will work just fine for Hillary.

Of course, this begs the question of how she will be able to attract blacks after beating Obama. Here the South Carolina strategy also serves its purpose. If she loses blacks and wins whites by attacking Obama, it will look dirty and underhanded to blacks. She'll develop a real problem in the minority community. But if she is seen as being rejected by minority voters in favor of Obama after going hat in hand to them and trying to out-civil rights Obama, blacks will even likely feel guilty about rejecting Hillary and will be more than willing to support her in the general election.

Morris, a former political adviser to Sen. Trent Lott (R-Miss.) and President Bill Clinton, is the author of "Outrage." To get all of Dick Morris's and Eileen McGann's columns for free by email, go to  www.dickmorris.com. 
 

 http://www.realclearpolitics.com/articles/2008/01/how_clinton_will_win_the_nomin.html 
 
 
Btw, I particularly enjoyed the factcheck.org demonstrating Hillary's obvious BS. I especially liked where they exposed Obama's fib about not liking a single payer system. I can see why he'd want to distance himself from that; but I like him more for liking it in the first place. :wink:
 
 
Soz, that's their effort to diminish the Oprah effect. They've been sending emails with links to all the "Oprah Is A Traitor" stories quoting one three-month old post on Oprah's message board in the press today. Someone is even sending an email around saying that there were so many complaints about Oprah's endorsement of Obama that Hearst Co. stepped in and that's why she made no appearance in Nevada for Obama.

First we had stories about Obama being the Great White Hope, then stories about Obama and White Guilt, then stories about Obama Not Black Enough, and now it has turned into Obama's Black Female Traitors.
 
 
Thanks for that link, Bill. Interesting discussion going on in the comments section of that article.
 
 
 
Btw, I particularly enjoyed the factcheck.org demonstrating Hillary's obvious BS. I especially liked where they exposed Obama's fib about not liking a single payer system. I can see why he'd want to distance himself from that; but I like him more for liking it in the first place. :wink:
 

Bill, regarding Obama and the misquote about single payer system, have you seen this? Any thoughts after reading?

 http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20080123/ap_on_el_pr/health_care_fact_check_2 

That Fact Check.org piece glosses over the very nuance that makes the difference. Being a proponent is not synonymous with saying you'd try to implement single-payer. Senator Obama has tempered that with pragmatism, admitting that the momentum and influence of the entrenched interests make the "ideal" unattainable in practical terms in any reasonable time-frame.

Barack Obama knows how to make progress rather than becoming bogged down in the "all or none" mindset that has the partisans in Washington frozen in place. He could've grown cynical working in Washington but Obama's hope for change has survived and flourished; he knows how to get things done in a legislative setting, which has not seemed a high priority in Washington lately.
 
 
This is interesting. Anecdotal, not representative, and lots of other disclaimers, but interesting and a tiny bit heartening:

 
I am a mid-forties Democratic leaning (occasionally Republican voting) college-educated working mom. This label would neatly apply to most of my friends. I am admittedly an Obama supporter, but not antagonist to Hillary. I've been surprised by the affinity amongst other similarly situated women out here to Hillary's candidacy. They have been generally excited about prospect of a female president, regardless of my arguments that Hillary does not represent a self-made women in the mold of say Margaret Thatcher. Many of my politically-minded girlfriends watched the nationally televised d, ebate from New Hampshire (apparently we don't go out on Saturday nights any more) and I could have told you that the backlash amongst women and the rallying to Hillary was in full force, even while the media missed it until the votes were in.

However, something funny has happened the last couple of days that was crystallized amongst those watching highlights of last night's debate. Around the office today, a number of women who were definitely in the Hillary camp are starting to feel a little sick to their stomach about the role Bill Clinton's is playing. One remarked that she thought she would be voting for the first women president, not a trojan horse for Bill Clinton's overactive ambition. Another friend I thought last week would definitely vote for Hillary labeled them the "Dynastic Duo" this morning and said she may switch to Obama. And finally, my best friend, who already sent in her absentee ballot says, she's got serious "buyer's remorse" saying she thought she had voted for the first women president, but now she's not so sure she's advanced or hurt women everywhere by voting for Hillary.

I think the media is missing the point like they did in NH. Bill's role as of late is undermining the very strength derived from her seeming historic candidacy. Suddenly it doesn't look so historic, but simply a repeat of history. Again, I'm speaking from the anecdotal perspective from women like myself here in So Cal, but this tactic seems to backfiring amongst my peer group in a significant way.
 

 http://www.politico.com/blogs/bensmith/0108/Dissent_of_the_Day_Bills_role.html 

(The bolded line is just one that I found particularly interesting/ well-stated.)

Thanks for the Dick Morris stuff, Bill, though it's scary as hell. I'm not sure about his last paragraph, the guilt thing.
 
 
 
 
Btw, I particularly enjoyed the factcheck.org demonstrating Hillary's obvious BS. I especially liked where they exposed Obama's fib about not liking a single payer system. I can see why he'd want to distance himself from that; but I like him more for liking it in the first place. :wink:
 

Bill, regarding Obama and the misquote about single payer system, have you seen this? Any thoughts after reading?

 http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20080123/ap_on_el_pr/health_care_fact_check_2 
 
Great peice. After reading that one I would say it may not have even been a fib but an incomplete explanation. Either way; I think it is an extremely sleazy tactic because there's little doubt in my mind they'd both endorse a single payer system if they thought it realistic. At the end of the day; a single payer system is nothing more than a more progressive version of Universal Health Care. That's not something I would expect one Democrat to beat another over the head with.
 
 
From Soz's last piece:
 
Dynastic Duo
 
  Heh. I do hope that lady is indicative of her peers... but I wish she were 10 or 20 years older...
 
 
 
If Hillary loses South Carolina and the defeat serves to demonstrate Obama's ability to attract a bloc vote among black Democrats, the message will go out loud and clear to white voters that this is a racial fight. It's one thing for polls to show, as they now do, that Obama beats Hillary among African-Americans by better than 4-to-1 and Hillary carries whites by almost 2-to-1. But most people don't read the fine print on the polls. But if blacks deliver South Carolina to Obama, everybody will know that they are bloc-voting. That will trigger a massive white backlash against Obama and will drive white voters to Hillary Clinton.
 

First off, I cant believe we're going on Dick Morris now. Sullivan was one thing, but Morris - yuck.

But, OK, lemme push that out of the way. I gotta admit that, for just this one time, he seems to have a point.

There is, however, one potential snag that could get in the way of the Clintons' racial strategy. As of this moment, there's only a small chance of it happening - but it's a chance. And it would, if the media arent too much asleep at the wheel (a big if I admit), disrupt the narrative they're going for here. That's if Hillary doesnt just lose the black vote to Obama -- but loses the white vote to Edwards.

Throughout this month, Edwards has been polling 26-31% of the white vote in SC. Obama's been stuck at 17-22% since his post-Iowa bounce disappeared. But Hillary has been ahead since the same time - apparently the same white people who had gone to Obama after Iowa went (back?) to Hillary afterwards, cause she went up to 40+% and stayed there.

But there is one latest poll out, from Reuters/C-Span/Zogby, which dissents. It's the only poll that was at least partially done after the brawling debate, and not just does it shows Hillary's black support in SC down at an almost record-breaking low of 16%; it also suddenly shows her white support down to 33%. Which was just one point more than Edwards got.

So there is just this faint possibility that this is not just statistical noise, but that the brawl of the last week(s), culminating in the debate where Edwards seemed the wiser of the three battlers, has not just chased blacks towards Obama, but is starting to chase whites to Edwards too. Its hard to say, cause there's no previous Zogby poll to compare this one too, no remotely recent one anyhow. So who knows.

But if Hillary ends up losing SC not just because Obama got the black vote, but because Edwards trumped her among whites, surely that would change the narrative here?

Just idle speculation for now, of course... but it could be another way in which Edwards is actually helping Obama. Imagine how racialised a polarisation the race might yield if it was really just a pure one-to-one between Obama and Hillary, and he wasnt there to kind of muddy the waters (in a good way, I mean)?
 
 
Dick Morris might be on to something.

 Bill Bill Clinton Accuses Obama Camp of Stirring Race Issue 
 
 
I've long thought Dick Morris was on something, but I doubt he's on to anything at all but whatever sliver of controversy he can peddle on Faux news.
 
 
Damn it Nimh. Why do you always have to make so damn much sense when it comes to these things? I so don't want to believe racism can sideline any candidate, let alone Obama, that I'm probably guilty of willful ignorance myself. (Shrugs)(sure wouldn't be the first time...)

  If Edwards is coming close to splitting the bigot vote, than I guess I may have to place a moratorium on calling him out for being... what you know I think he is... for a spell. As dangerous as the dynastic duo may be, bigotry's desire for a white male strikes me as worse. I reserve the right to change my mind...
 
 
The Associated Press fact-checks Obama's "present" votes:

 http://ap.google.com/article/ALeqM5gG60xsyt9Bdrdl6YUwhu0CYeBqTwD8UC4MA00 
 
 
 
There is, however, one potential snag that could get in the way of the Clintons' racial strategy. As of this moment, there's only a small chance of it happening - but it's a chance. And it would, if the media arent too much asleep at the wheel (a big if I admit), disrupt the narrative they're going for here. That's if Hillary doesnt just lose the black vote to Obama -- but loses the white vote to Edwards.
 

 Here we go... 
 
 
The great speech Obama gave at Ebenezer Baptist last Sunday has been linked a few places now -- here's a transcript and a YouTube video for anyone who hasn't seen it yet.

 http://www.barackobama.com/2008/01/20/remarks_of_senator_barack_obam_40.php 
 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Kf0x_TpDris 

One thing that did jump out at me (I think I said "yes!" aloud when reading the transcript) was this:

 
And yet, if we are honest with ourselves, we must admit that none of our hands are entirely clean. If we're honest with ourselves, we'll acknowledge that our own community has not always been true to King's vision of a beloved community.

We have scorned our gay brothers and sisters instead of embracing them. The scourge of anti-Semitism has, at times, revealed itself in our community. For too long, some of us have seen immigrants as competitors for jobs instead of companions in the fight for opportunity.
 

I mention it because I'm seeing some coverage of it today, especially the "gay brothers and sisters" part.

That also goes with the "toughness" thing we were talking about on BPB's thread, but I'll keep it here for now.
 
 
Eek:

 
Meanwhile, a little to the east, former president Bill Clinton was also feeling a little distracted.

A CNN reporter, Jessica Yellin, asked Mr Clinton after a function in Charleston about comments from a former Democratic Party figure, who accused the Clinton campaign of focusing on race.

A testy Mr Clinton rounded on the journalist, saying that the public never raised the issue, only the press.

As Mr Clinton's staff tried to end things by turning up the music, he shouted out to the press: "One more story. Shame on you. Shame on you, you want another story  You wanna make this about words and name calling. I hate it."
 

 http://www.theage.com.au/news/world/obama-woos-his-heartland/2008/01/24/1201157559804.html 
 
 
 
Eek:

 
Meanwhile, a little to the east, former president Bill Clinton was also feeling a little distracted.

A CNN reporter, Jessica Yellin, asked Mr Clinton after a function in Charleston about comments from a former Democratic Party figure, who accused the Clinton campaign of focusing on race.

A testy Mr Clinton rounded on the journalist, saying that the public never raised the issue, only the press.

As Mr Clinton's staff tried to end things by turning up the music, he shouted out to the press: "One more story. Shame on you. Shame on you, you want another story  You wanna make this about words and name calling. I hate it."
 

 http://www.theage.com.au/news/world/obama-woos-his-heartland/2008/01/24/1201157559804.html 
 

Is this different then the last time this happened, with the CNN reporter?

Go Bill Go! Keep shouting at the press!

If they didn't want to be questioned about the racial strategy they are employing, they never should have brought it up in the first place!

Cycloptichorn
 
 
More about it:

 http://blog.washingtonpost.com/the-trail/2008/01/23/bill_clinton_unloads_on_press.html 
 
 
Soz,

 http://www.dailykos.com/storyonly/2008/1/23/213221/309/346/442059 

 
Lorna Brett Howard, who apparently used to be the President of the Chicago chapter of NOW, has taped a pretty devastating account of why she recently switched from supporitng Hillary Clinton to Barack Obama.

The woman in the video is the past president of the Chicago chapter of NOW, has done extensive work with NARAL and Planned Parenthood, and currently works for some unnamed major pro-choice organization in New York (thus she has heavy connections in both IL and NY, appropriately enough).

She says that she was supporting Hillary up through Iowa and New Hampshire; in Iowa she personally witnessed Hillary's people lying flat-out to young women about Obama's record on choice issues, telling them that Obama was "weak" on choice issues.

She says she worked closely with Obama in Illinois while he was a state Senator in the '90's, and knows for a fact that he had a 100% record with every pro-choice organization there is.

She then says that even after the Iowa incidents, she stuck with Hillary through New Hampshire--where she saw the flyer being passed around by the Hillary camp once again accusing Obama of being "weak" on choice; this was the final straw for her, so she switched over to supporting Obama.

Her final statement was what really cuts to the core: She said that she's supporting Obama now because he's 100% pro-choice AND 100% honest.

Fade to black, and to a title card with the  http://women.barackobama.com  link.

UPDATE #2: Per request, here's the second video clip of Ms. Howard, in which she describes how Obama was the ONLY U.S. Senator to help out the pro-choice cause during the South Dakota abortion ban brouhaha:
 
 
 
Whoa.

Good to see that via Kos, too.

Interesting column by Gail Collins on what Bill's been doing -- here's the last half or so:

 
 

 http://www.nytimes.com/2008/01/24/opinion/24collins.html 
 
 
This is not new -- it's from March 2007 -- but I came across it while researching something else and I really like it.

Eugene Robinson on the power of "both-and":

 http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2007/03/12/AR2007031200983.html 
 
 
That idea - about Bill's predominance in her campaign foreshadowing how much he might influence her administration - really jumped out at me the first time I heard it the other day. It was one of those things that's right there, but I hadn't considered it. Who can deny that the man's ego blurs even his own judgement, and let run amok, could very well taint things writ large?
 
 
Beginning of an email from Michelle Obama, subject line "What we didn't expect":

 
In the past week or two, another candidate's spouse has been getting an awful lot of attention.

We knew getting into this race that Barack would be competing with Senator Clinton and President Clinton at the same time.

We expected that Bill Clinton would tout his record from the nineties and talk about Hillary's role in his past success. That's a fair approach and a challenge we are prepared to face.

What we didn't expect, at least not from our fellow Democrats, are the win-at-all-costs tactics we've seen recently. We didn't expect misleading accusations that willfully distort Barack's record.

Barack Obama isn't relying on a former President of the United States to campaign for him.
 
 
 
 
That idea - about Bill's predominance in her campaign foreshadowing how much he might influence her administration - really jumped out at me the first time I heard it the other day. It was one of those things that's right there, but I hadn't considered it. Who can deny that the man's ego blurs even his own judgement, and let run amok, could very well taint things writ large?
 

Worst case scenario should the Clinton Twins Gain the Presidency:

I can see the country going through another four year old series of battles culminating with impeachment hearings, this time the issue of violations of the presidential term limit law, if Bill continues with this much involvement and vested interest in the White House.

Is the country ready to put the boundaries of those term limit laws to the test with a Hillary Clinton presidency?
 
 
Oy, Butrflynet. I don't know if I think that'd happen or not but it's certainly not pleasant to contemplate.

This is a "no comment" plonk -- lots of links within it so I want to save it:

 http://2parse.com/?p=210 

It's called "Why Hillary Clinton Should Withdraw From the Race Today."

This is good!

 
If people including the Clintons "are making false assertions," [Obama] said, he will aggressively set the record straight.

As for the campaign's overall tone, Obama said, "I don't feel like the candidates are getting bloodied up. This is good practice for me, so when I take on those Republicans I'll be accustomed to it."
 

 http://ap.google.com/article/ALeqM5i9VRMevycLjQJp8Y2KbMGAUZAV8QD8UCD15O1 

Very smart way to approach it.
 
 
This is a bit of a wow, from Robert Reich:

 http://robertreich.blogspot.com/2008/01/bill-clintons-old-politics.html 

 
I write this more out of sadness than anger. Bill Clinton's ill-tempered and ill-founded attacks on Barack Obama are doing no credit to the former President, his legacy, or his wife's campaign. Nor are they helping the Democratic party. While it may be that all is fair in love, war, and politics, it's not fair - indeed, it's demeaning - for a former President to say things that are patently untrue (such as Obama's anti-war position is a "fairy tale") or to insinuate that Obama is injecting race into the race when the former President is himself doing it. Meanwhile, the attack ads being run in South Carolina by the Clinton camp which quote Obama as saying Republicans had all the ideas under Reagan, is disingenuous. For years, Bill Clinton and many other leading Democrats have made precisely the same point - that starting in the Reagan administration, Republicans put forth a range of new ideas while the Democrats sat on their hands. Many of these ideas were wrong-headed and dangerous, such as supply-side economics. But for too long Democrats failed counter with new ideas of their own; they wrongly assumed that the old Democratic positions and visions would be enough. Clinton's 1992 campaign - indeed, the entire "New Democratic" message of the 1990s - was premised on the importance of taking back the initiative from the Republicans and offering Americans a new set of ideas and principles. Now, sadly, we're witnessing a smear campaign against Obama that employs some of the worst aspects of the old politics.
 
 
 
She finally pulled the ad. But I think she is conceding SC to Obama and pulled the ad to focus more on California. She is saturating the radio and TV airwaves with ads on every channel here. You can't change channels without seeing her or hearing her voice.

This is one of the times I am glad I use my main telephone line for my dial-up modem so all the political calls get my answering service.

 http://blog.washingtonpost.com/the-trail/2008/01/24/clinton_pulls_negative_sc_ad.html 

Clinton Pulls Negative S.C. Ad
By Anne E. Kornblut
GREENVILLE, S.C. -- Under fire for airing misleading attacks on Sen. Barack Obama, the Clinton campaign has pulled a radio ad that quoted the Illinois senator calling Republicans "the party of ideas" and suggesting he thought those ideas superior to Democratic ones. But the Obama campaign has already counter-punched, launching a new radio spot saying Sen. Hillary Rodham Clinton will "say anything" to get elected.

The Clinton campaign did not immediately explain why it had pulled its radio spot, which had triggered a furious response from the Obama campaign and touched off a wave of criticism from Democrats who said the Clinton campaign has grown excessively aggressive in recent days. The Obama ad was no less fierce. It reminded voters that Clinton had voted to authorize the war in Iraq, saying she "voted for George Bush's war," and accused her of making "false attacks" on Obama.

"Hillary Clinton: She'll say anything and change nothing," the ad says.

Clinton tried to rise above the fray, delivering remarks on the economy here. She focused her public statements on President Bush, saying he had failed to confront a slipping economy during most of his presidency. Her aides, meanwhile, are downplaying expectations for how she will do here on Saturday, in the fourth nominating contest. Even though she has campaigned here at length and deployed her husband, described as her most effective surrogate, extensively, her advisers said they expect her to lose.
 
 
Good from Reich...
 
 
Andrew Sullivan* has this to say, I agree:

 
Is Obama winning the spin war?

Greg Sargent  thinks so . I think the spin war itself is a distraction from Obama's core message - of unifying change - and distracting from that is central to the Clintons' strategy. It seems to me that Obama needs to focus back on the case for his own candidacy, in particular, providing explicit concrete policy detail in his public presentation. The Clintons are running as prosaic general managers. Obama should not downplay his transformational potential or his broader themes. But in the battle for base voters, many people are not hearing specifics - on the economy, on healthcare, on taxes, on climate change. He has them. He needs to repeat them. With the same mind-numbing repetitiveness that the Clintons always deploy.
 

 http://andrewsullivan.theatlantic.com/the_daily_dish/2008/01/is-obama-winnin.html 

(Sorry nimh! I've only been reading him for the past few weeks or so and he just keeps making sense... not that familiar with his history.)
 
 
Very interesting article in the New Yorker:

 http://www.newyorker.com/reporting/2008/01/28/080128fa_fact_packer 

It will be off the site in a few days (Monday) and New Yorker articles tend to be hard to find online, so I'm going to quote from it pretty liberally even though I encourage people to read the whole thing -- one thing I like about it is the depth/ balance. (I don't agree with it completely, but I think it's a good article and unusually thorough.)

 
 

 
 

 
Peter Wehner served in the Bush White House until August, 2007, working for Karl Rove, the Administration's chief strategist. Wehner, who is now a senior fellow at the Ethics and Public Policy Center, in Washington, said that, as a candidate, Hillary Clinton would provide a "much more target-rich environment" than Obama. Republicans wouldn't need to uncover new scandals; they would simply remind voters of the not so distant Clinton wars. "Certain regions of your brain are latent," Wehner said. "But if there's a word or a sound or a memory that you hear, that region of your brain lights up again. And I have a feeling that, with Bill and Hillary Clinton, there are latent regions of the brain that will light up, and, if the Democrats don't light it up, the Republicans will. And that is going to be Clinton fatigue." As for Obama, Wehner's only complaint is that he's a liberal: "I find him to be very impressive. He would be much more difficult for Republicans to handle. He has much more breakout potential."
 

(A-ha, I just found another source for my long electability post on the Obama '08 thread... ^^^)

 
 

 
 

 
A former Clinton Administration official explained his decision to support Obama by urging me to read the two candidates' autobiographies side by side. Obama's "Dreams from My Father," unlike Clinton's "Living History," he said, reveals a narrator who has struggled through difficult questions of identity and resolved them, and who, as a result, is comfortable not just with himself but with the complexity and contradiction of the world. "When I'm with her, I feel she wants to impress me," the former official said. "When I'm with him, I feel he wants to know what I have to offer him."
 

 
Pietrafesa said that Hillary's fear of public exposure was connected to those early years in Arkansas. "To be so humiliated, and ruthlessly," Pietrafesa said. "In Arkansas, she went to a place she wasn't welcomed, big time. Everything was wrong with her. She didn't paint her toenails when she wore sandals, she didn't look like a cocktail waitress when she dressed up. Everybody really felt they could insult her with impunity."

 

 
 

 
 

 
 

(It goes on for a while more in that vein, won't copy and paste it all. Here's one more line from that section, though -- "It was a summons to reasonableness, yet Obama made it sound thrilling.")

 
A few hours before Clinton's rally in Hampton, I watched John McCain's masterly presentation before a packed middle-school gym in Salem, which included many skeptics and independents. An accountant challenged him on his willingness to make Bush's tax cuts permanent while claiming to be a deficit hawk, telling McCain, "You're in Purgatory." The candidate shot back playfully, "Thank you very much. It's a step up from where I was last summer." He was witty, combative, humble, and blunt (while embracing Republican orthodoxy on almost every position). Unlike Clinton, he engaged questioners in lengthy back-and-forths that showed he was capable of a respectful disagreement. After hearing Clinton that evening, I thought that she might have a hard time beating McCain in November.
 

 
"Hillary needs to connect two things," Myers said. "What's in her heart and what she wants to accomplish and why. There are many reasons to think she'd be a good President. She knows what she wants to do, she understands how the process works, she's shown an ability to work with Congress, she's become more incrementalist. But the Presidency isn't all that powerful, except as the bully pulpit. It comes down to your ability to get people to follow you, to inspire. You have to lead. Can she get people to come together, or does she remain such a polarizing figure? That's what the campaign will be about." In other words, winning the Presidency might require Clinton to transcend her own history.
 

Again, I encourage you to read the whole thing -- people who do might complain that I leave out good stuff about Hillary. It's a good, sympathetic article. I copied and pasted the stuff that I thought I would have the most reason to come back to later, when it's no longer online. (Copying and pasting is so much easier than getting my paper version and hand-typing it all...)
 
 
Michelle Obama Finds Her Voice Too:

 http://www.time.com/time/politics/article/0,8599,1706706,00.html?imw=Y 

Obviously I like Obama a lot but I've been really impressed with Michelle as well.
 
 
This is from Rekha Basu of the Des Moines Register:
 http://www.desmoinesregister.com/apps/pbcs.dll/article?AID=/20080125/OPINION01/801250355/1036/OPINION 
 
 
That's a good one. I like the tone. (Iowans are good people.)

I'm closing some windows... (Translation -- I tend to open up something interesting in a new window, and then if it's interesting enough I just leave it there because I don't want to lose it, then open another window... I now have something like 12 windows open so will plonk the stuff I don't want to lose here.)

Joe Klein joins Robert Reich and Rekha Basu; "Are You Kidding Me?":

 http://www.time-blog.com/swampland/2008/01/are_you_kidding_me.html 

Republican perspective, interesting in a few different ways; "Where is the Republican Obama?"

 http://www.forbes.com/opinions/2008/01/25/james-republican-obama-oped-cx_pja_0125james.html 

Interesting series of interviews with black Americans (some celebrities, some not) re: Obama:

 http://www.guardian.co.uk/uselections08/barackobama/story/0,,2246802,00.html 
 
 
Very, very good (post? article? column?) from Hilzoy, again (the fishin'-avatar-guy).

 http://obsidianwings.blogs.com/obsidian_wings/2008/01/lies-and-democr.html 

It has a really good collection of debunkings, along with analysis. I thought this was particularly good/ well-stated:

 
But when candidates tell the kinds of lies that the Clintons have been telling, they place citizens in a position in which the only way to know what is going on is to become political junkies. Being merely informed is not enough: you have to be the sort of person who actually remembers the article from 2004 that Bill Clinton was referring to when he said that Obama had changed his position on the war, and so forth.

It's like the tobacco companies' attempts to confuse people by coming up with research that seemed to show that smoking was harmless. The strategy is to sow enough doubt that people who are not willing to slog through the science, the interminable debates about the methodological deficiencies of this or that study, etc., etc., etc., are likely to come away with a vague sense that the case that smoking is bad isn't all it's cracked up to be. It is designed to leave people with two options: either spend an awful lot of time working through the science, or be misled. In so doing, it asks a lot of ordinary people who have lives to lead: it prevents them from just reading stuff, forming a more or less correct view, and acting accordingly. And it is deeply wrong.

Likewise here: the Clintons' strategy seems to be designed to leave people with two options: either become political junkies, follow every tiny detail of all these stories, and make up your minds on the merits, or not, in which case you will be left with a vague sense that Obama is not all he should be -- a sense that is wholly unsupported by the facts.
 

This is also sort of what I was getting at in the "polls" thread about "safer." It's not about intelligence per se (and I was uncomfortable with where Cycloptichorn was going, there), but how much patience people have to wade through stuff vs. going the safer route.
 
 
 
This is also sort of what I was getting at in the "polls" thread about "safer." It's not about intelligence per se (and I was uncomfortable with where Cycloptichorn was going, there), but how much patience people have to wade through stuff vs. going the safer route.

 

Why are people afraid to discuss the reality of Identity politics?

Cycloptichorn
 
 
 
Very, very good (post? article? column?) from Hilzoy, again (the fishin'-avatar-guy).

 http://obsidianwings.blogs.com/obsidian_wings/2008/01/lies-and-democr.html 

It has a really good collection of debunkings, along with analysis. I thought this was particularly good/ well-stated:

Hilzoy adds later:

 
All I want to say is if Hillary gets the nomination, the democrats will lose the election. I just want the Clintons to go away, they had their turn and it is time for somebody new

Also I am disgusted that an ex-president is campaigning this way, generally they deserve respect but Bill Clinton is changing that, he does not have my respect.

 

I couldn't agree more, especially the last part.
 
 
 
That wasn't about identity politics, it was that it was swerving close to "poor people are stupid."

I'll go into it more there, though.
 
 
 
That wasn't about identity politics, it was that it was swerving close to "poor people are stupid."

I'll go into it more there, though.
 

That's a pretty liberal reading of what I wrote, I must say.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
OK, I took it back to the "Polls..." thread:

 http://www.able2know.org/forums/viewtopic.php?p=3058696#3058696 
 
 
Reihan Salam blasts the New York Times' endorsement of Hillary -- lots of good points and entertaining too!

 http://theamericanscene.com/2008/01/25/deranged-clinton-syndrome 

(One line that made me laugh:)

 
 
 
 
This and that:

The Economist on Bill and his effect on this whole election -- depressing reading:

 http://www.economist.com/world/na/displaystory.cfm?story_id=10566914 

Carpetbagger on how hard Hillary has tried to win SC:

 http://www.thecarpetbaggerreport.com/archives/14372.html 

Fun story at the end:

 http://cbs4.com/campaign08/campaign.2008.primary.2.638588.html 
 
 
 
Republican perspective, interesting in a few different ways; "Where is the Republican Obama?"

 http://www.forbes.com/opinions/2008/01/25/james-republican-obama-oped-cx_pja_0125james.html 
 

"The Republican Party is infected with shifting and contradictory messages. [..] But people do not get excited about the moving target created in that way."
Sounds like the Dems back in the 80s...

I'm still not counting out a Republican win in the generals, though. I've been feeling a little quizzical about all those analysis presuming an oncoming, large victory in '08. This at a time that McCain beats all three leading Democrats in match-up polls.
 
 
After this week's performance, you are probably right, Nimh. There are many additional people now saying they will either not vote or vote for a republican if Hillary is the democratic choice.

I'll be wishing Ralph Nader would consider running again.
 
 
 
Carpetbagger on how hard Hillary has tried to win SC:

 http://www.thecarpetbaggerreport.com/archives/14372.html 
 

Here's excerpts from a memo distributed by Clinton campaign communications director Howard Wolfson: "[..] Despite efforts by the Obama campaign to ignore Floridians, their voices will be heard loud and clear across the country, as the last state to vote before Super Tuesday on February 5th."
This from the same campaign who blasted Obama just days ago for broadcasting an ad on national network TV that would be seen by Floridians as well? Where do these people get this kind of chutzpah from? I swear, to succeed as campaign operative you must really be scum...
 
 
 http://www.thenation.com/blogs/campaignmatters?bid=45&pid=276186 

TED KENNEDY PREPARES TO PASS THE MANTLE TO OBAMA

 
Barack Obama is not so in need of celebrity assistance as was the charisma-challenged Kerry. But, as Obama takes his campaign on the road to "Super Tuesday" states such as California and New York, Obama will be making the Kennedy connection.

The Democratic presidential candidate who won a landslide victory in South Carolina Saturday got a taste of Camelot Sunday, when Caroline Kennedy indicated that she saw something of her father, former President John Fitzgerald Kennedy, in the young senator from Illinois.

 

 
Caroline Kennedy, as JFK's relatively apolitical daughter, brings a piece of the mantle to the Obama campaign. Ted Kennedy, as JFK's very political brother, brings the rest of it. Even if other members of the clan back the campaign of Hillary Clinton -- as Robert Kennedy Jr., did in November -- the combination of endorsements from Caroline and Ted effectively delivers the family name to Obama.

That delivery is expected to be completed Monday morning in Washington, where Senator Kennedy and Caroline Kennedy plan to appear with Obama at a rally at American University.

Of all the endorsements that Obama has received, these two may be the most important. And they come at precisely the right moment. "The America of Jack and Bobby Kennedy touched all of us. Through all of these decades, the one who kept that flame alive was Ted Kennedy,'' says Massachusetts Congressman Bill Delahunt, an Obama backer with close ties to Kennedy. "So having him pass on the torch is of incredible significance. It's historic."
 

 
Word from the Kennedy camp is that, after delivering his endorsement, the Massachusetts senator will hit the campaign trail. In particular, Kennedy will concentrate on winning union members and Latinos for Obama. With the campaign of former Democratic front-runner Hillary Clinton relying heavily on strong support from Hispanics to renew her run for the presidency, the targeting of Kennedy's campaigning could be even more of a blow to Clinton than is his decision to endorse her foe.

 
 
 
The Kennedy thing might be big, especially in terms of resources/ connections.

Another from hilzoy, who I think I've referred to as a guy but apparently is a girl (I was wondering -- she reminds me of FreeDuck a bit). At any rate, quickly becoming a favorite. The whole thing is good, but here's the end:

 
Taylor Marsh has, as far as I'm concerned, long since forfeited any reputation for fairness she might ever have had. But yesterday, as far as I'm concerned, she gave up whatever claim she might have had to being a feminist:

"And now some bloggers seem to want to paint Clinton as they bad guy, er, girl. So to Josh I say, yes way. But of course, as usual, it's all Hillary Clinton's fault! Your daily whine brought to you by the Obamabots and the sanctimonious side of the Always Eager to Lose Wing of the Democratic Party."

News Flash: when someone comes up with the idea of changing the rules [delegates in MI and FL] out of the blue, that person is responsible for his or her actions. If those actions are bad, we say that they are his or her fault, even if that person is Hillary Clinton. The alternative is to say that that person is not a responsible moral agent -- that she didn't know what she was doing, or is too weak or mentally unstable to be held responsible for her actions, or was forced to do what she did by something too strong for her to resist, or for some similar reason is just not accountable for what she does. When one of these conditions is met, of course the person in question is not responsible for what she does. Moreover, in some circumstances -- e.g., the rape of a young adult woman while she was intoxicated -- feminists ought to protest when there is too great a focus on the woman's responsibility for being drunk, as opposed to the man's responsibility for raping her.

But nothing like that is the case here. No one came close to forcing Hillary Clinton to do what she did. She is a grownup, and a pretty powerful one at that, and she is solely responsible for this decision. And feminists, of all people, should recognize that the idea that women are not responsible for their actions in a case like this is just a way of saying that we are not autonomous agents at all.
 

 http://obsidianwings.blogs.com/obsidian_wings/2008/01/changing-the-ru.html 
 
 
From the AP:

 
Aboard her plane, Clinton's aides admitted they had seen the rout coming, but styled it as an aberration, on territory -- with half of the Democratic electorate made up of African Americans -- favorable for her foe.

One aide said campaign strategists had argued the former first lady should bypass the state altogether.

But Clinton decided she needed to put up at least a token fight, to show she would wage a 50 state campaign for the presidency.
 

 http://afp.google.com/article/ALeqM5i-W8_9luvkT_RMN_DeplOsj4Nnlw 

Oh bullshit. "A token fight"? It was more than a token fight, she just lost it.
 
 
From that carpetbagger blog I already referred to and that nimh quotes from above:

 
The good news for Clinton is, it makes the Obama campaign's accusations that Clinton was ignoring the state look pretty silly. The bad news for Clinton is, if she loses, she won't be able to say, "I wasn't seriously trying to compete there anyway."
 

You'd THINK. But lookee, she is anyway.
 
 
This article is overall fairly critical of Obama -- though it seems to contradict other accounts I've read in terms of his relationship with the press -- but I thought this was interesting:

 
One media narrative that seems to be taking root is of Obama as the candidate of lofty rhetoric and Clinton as the maven of pedestrian policy talk. At a rally at Furman University here Tuesday, Obama brought the audience to several peaks, raising his voice over the applause while describing how his days as a community organizer "taught me that ordinary people can do extraordinary things" and how "the dream that so many generations fought for feels like it is slipping away."

But the address was saturated with proposals. Obama called for tax rebates; a one-time boost in Social Security checks; extending unemployment insurance; mortgage aid for those facing foreclosure; raising the minimum wage; protecting pensions; and college tuition credits. And that was before he got to his support for solar and wind power and biodiesel fuel. (There was no discussion of how he would pay for all this, other than to say his health-care plan would be partly financed by ending the Bush tax cuts for the wealthiest 1 percent of Americans.)

How, then, has Obama been saddled with an image of being long on inspiration and short on details? The answer is that journalists are not accustomed to covering a candidate who moves crowds the way Obama does, who uses speech cadences and rhythm like Martin Luther King Jr. without making his talk explicitly about race. Sen. Clinton already owned the policy-wonk slot, so by default, Obama was cast as the poetic one.
 

 http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2008/01/27/AR2008012702160_2.html 
 
 
 
From the AP:

 
Aboard her plane, Clinton's aides admitted they had seen the rout coming, but styled it as an aberration, on territory -- with half of the Democratic electorate made up of African Americans -- favorable for her foe.

One aide said campaign strategists had argued the former first lady should bypass the state altogether.

But Clinton decided she needed to put up at least a token fight, to show she would wage a 50 state campaign for the presidency.
 

 http://afp.google.com/article/ALeqM5i-W8_9luvkT_RMN_DeplOsj4Nnlw 

Oh bullshit. "A token fight"? It was more than a token fight, she just lost it.
 

Must be why she had her husband camped out in SC pointing to himself as the token Black president to anyone who would listen.
 
 
The Nation waxes eloquently about Hillary and Florida

 http://www.thenation.com/blogs/thebeat?pid=276341 

 
The Clinton campaign claims that the senator from New York is abiding by the no-campaigning pledge because Sunday's two Florida events were technically closed to the public. But the stops were treated as major news events in a state where many Democrats have expressed anger over the absence of the party's presidential candidates during a period when Florida is overrun by Republican contenders.

The truth of the Clinton strategy was writ large in a memo from top strategist Howard Wolfson, who announced on the day of the campaign's dismal showing in South Carolina that, "Regardless of today's outcome, the race quickly shifts to Florida, where hundreds of thousands of Democrats will turn out to vote on Tuesday. Despite efforts by the Obama campaign to ignore Floridians, their voices will be heard loud and clear across the country, as the last state to vote before Super Tuesday on February 5."

"Efforts by the Obama campaign to ignore Floridians"?

Obama's just abiding by the pledge. Admittedly, it's a foolish pledge. None of the campaigns should have taken it, and they all should have agreed to drop it. But in the absence of such an agreement, Obama is not ignoring Floridians. He is remaining true to his word.

Of course, Obama is surging, while Clinton is desperate.

 

 
Clinton is now rejecting that politeness along with the no-campaigning pledge.

"I will try to persuade my delegates to seat the delegates from Michigan and Florida," she declared before arriving in Florida. "Democrats have to win Michigan and have to try to win Florida and I intend to do that. The people of Florida deserve to be represented in the process of picking a candidate for president of the United States."

That may sound like a high-minded embrace of democracy -- or at least realism regarding the fall campaign -- but it's really nothing more than the latest political gambit from a Clinton campaign that is developing a reputation for playing fast and loose with the rules. Having "secured" Michigan, Clinton is now playing her Florida card. If she wins big in the Sunshine state and then succeeds in qualifying delegations from Michigan and Florida for the convention, the senator will get the bulk of the close to 350 delegates from the two states. That's more than Iowa, New Hampshire, Nevada and South Carolina combined will send to the convention.

 
 
 
That looks good, Butflynet.

Here's something that talks about Obama's unorthodox strategy to pay attention to small, red states:

 http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2008/01/28/AR2008012802558_2.html 

Quote I liked:

 
"People are generally very surprised to hear from us," Obama volunteer Cori Allen said as she made calls in Lawrence [KS] that night. "When you call back in Kansas, people will say literally, 'You want to talk to me?' Even the Republicans stay on the line longer."
 

This is fabulous, Richardson on Obama:

 
"I had just been asked a question -- I don't remember which one -- and Obama was sitting right next to me. Then the moderator went across the room, I think to Chris Dodd, so I thought I was home free for a while. I wasn't going to listen to the next question. I was about to say something to Obama when the moderator turned to me and said, 'So, Gov. Richardson, what do you think of that?' But I wasn't paying any attention! I was about to say, 'Could you repeat the question? I wasn't listening.' But I wasn't about to say I wasn't listening. I looked at Obama. I was just horrified. And Obama whispered, 'Katrina. Katrina.' The question was on Katrina! So I said, 'On Katrina, my policy...' Obama could have just thrown me under the bus. So I said, 'Obama, that was good of you to do that.'"
 

 http://blog.washingtonpost.com/the-trail/2008/01/29/richardsons_choice.html 
 
 
Heh. Reminds you of high school days...
 
 
Soz, what a great story.

I'm proud to be an Obama supporter no matter what happens from this point.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
Yep, me too.

I'm still hopeful but I'm also still very concerned about whether he'll actually be able to get the nomination. But what I'm getting happier about is the idea that he's no flash in the pan, that he's building up some real political power that he'll be able to put to good use whether he gets this nomination or not.

I still think that 2008 is a unique opportunity and it was a good idea for him to run no matter what -- and that even if he doesn't win this time, a strong showing this year could translate to a better chance in some other year. Even Reagan didn't get the nomination on his first try.

Anyway, that's just stuff I've been thinking about, but I'm sure hoping he can win this thing.

Gobama!
 
 
 
More than 80 volunteer lawyers for Guantanamo Bay detainees today endorsed Illinois Senator Barack Obama's presidential bid.

The attorneys said in a joint statement that they believed Obama was the best choice to roll back the Bush-Cheney administration's detention policies in the war on terrorism and thereby to "restore the rule of law, demonstrate our commitment to human rights, and repair our reputation in the world community." The attorneys are representing the detainees in habeas corpus lawsuits, which are efforts to get individual hearings before federal judges in order to challenge the basis for their indefinite imprisonment without trial.
 

 http://www.boston.com/news/politics/politicalintelligence/2008/01/lawyers_for_git.html 
 
 
Still reading along with interest.

(Good for those volunteer lawyers working at Guantanamo making their voices heard, soz! If Obama is their choice he's just gained a few extra points from me! :wink: )
 
 
Hi msolga, glad you're finding interesting stuff here! Again, if you have any specific questions, feel free to ask.

"Obama's Ground Game Advantage":

 http://blog.washingtonpost.com/the-trail/2008/01/29/obamas_ground_game_advantage.html 

Excerpt:

 
Obama staffers first appeared in Kansas in October, four months before the Feb. 5 caucus and three months before the first Clinton organizers arrived in the state. There are now 18 Obama workers in Kansas, or six times the number of Clinton staffers. All this for a state that will choose 32 delegates on Tuesday, compared with 370 in California and 232 in New York.

"Showing the ability to perform well across the country, particularly against Senator Clinton, who was the inevitable national front-runner for most of the campaign, has great value," Plouffe said in an earlier interview with The Trail. "If Barack Obama is the Democratic nominee, the night of Novermber 3, we're going to be talking about a lot more states in play than Senator Clinton."

Thirteen Kansas legislators gathered in the ornate statehouse rotunda in Topeka on Jan. 17 to endorse Obama. They said the Clinton and Edwards campaigns had done almost nothing to reach out to them, while the Obama staff had called repeatedly -- often after organizing groups of activists in the legislators' districts.

By saying voters in their districts were supporting Obama, the campaign workers persuaded the legislators to take a closer look.

"It's a response to voters who are telling us whom we should support," said Sen. Anthony Hensley, the senate minority leader.
 
 
 
I commented on this before, re: the Ebenezer Baptist speech, but this is more thorough (lots of links in the original):

 
Obama and The Gays

If you're a Democrat, it isn't really a contest. We all know the record of the Clintons on gay equality. In the words of Melissa Etheridge, they "threw us under the bus" when it was politically expedient for them (after they'd bled the gay community financially dry). Here are a few YouTubes of Obama's public, proud and often risky defenses of gay and lesbian equality - in front of non-gay audiences and not prompted by questions. The Ebenezer sermon, when he called on black congregants in MLK's church not to condemn or ostracize their "gay brothers and sisters" (after the 9 minute mark). The AU speech (around the 9 minute mark again). His stump speech, "Countdown To Change." Obama was the only Democratic candidate to mention gay and lesbian equality in his announcement address. In South Carolina, he spoke of the importance of gay outreach to religious voters.

I've had two core principles in my own work in defense of gay equality: supporting the simple equality of gays and straights under the law; opposing the toxins of identity politics and a balkanized gay identity. The way Obama transcends his own multiple identities, the way he both embraces his difference and yet seeks a common political discourse: this is the model that makes the most sense to me. Neither denying difference nor being defined by it is a path all minorities would be better off pursuing. And Obama's call for self-empowerment rather than self-defeating victimology is particularly apposite for gays and lesbians.
 

 http://andrewsullivan.theatlantic.com/the_daily_dish/2008/01/obama-and-the-g.html 

I really like this aspect of Obama, especially what I bolded.
 
 
Another in the same vein -- I like the list of specifics:

 http://www.westsidetoday.com/article.php?articleid=395 

 
Rosendahl said he was impressed with Obama's track record on issues of importance to the LGBT community. He specifically noted the following:

·Obama supports the repeal of the entire federal Defense of Marriage Act, and has done so ever since he was a candidate for U.S. Senate in 2004.

·Obama has taken stronger positions on dismantling "Don't Ask, Don't Tell," and on fully inclusive workplace protections, than any candidate in the presidential race.

·Obama is a strong supporter of every major piece of LGBT legislation in Congress today.

·Obama supports fair tax treatment for gay and lesbian couples.

·Obama supports equal immigration rights for gay and lesbian couples.

·Obama supports domestic partner benefits for federal workers.

·Obama, while in the Illinois Senate, sponsored a fully inclusive anti-discrimination law that included both sexual orientation and gender identity.

·Obama sponsored the Microbicide Development Act to fund research critical to combating HIV/AIDS in the United States and around the world.

·Obama spoke out on World AIDS Day to an audience of evangelical leaders at Saddleback Church, publicly disagreeing with the leaders in attendance who opposed condom distribution.

·Obama, in Illinois, worked to enact a law that authorizes licensed pharmacists to provide clean needles in small, controlled numbers, a reform that is credited with achieving dramatic declines in the spread of HIV among intravenous drug users.

·Obama, in the U.S. Senate, supported efforts to lift the ban on federal funding for regulated needle exchange programs that are proven to work in the fight against HIV/AIDS.

·Obama has continued to raise the issue of LGBT civil rights in forums and town halls nationwide. During a high-profile speech on Martin Luther King Jr. Day at King's Ebenezer Baptist Church, he challenged his audience to support gay and lesbian rights with the same fervor they brought to their own struggle for civil rights.

"The more I have listened to Barack Obama," Rosendahl said, "the more convinced I have become that his commitment to our civil rights is deep and heartfelt. I am impressed that he continually raises the issue of gay civil rights, even in front of audiences hostile to our issues. I look forward to a Democratic administration that takes up our cause, instead of taking us for granted.

"I strongly urge my fellow LGBT voters in California and across the country to vote for Barack Obama for President."
 
 
 
This is entertaining reading -- Glenn Beck and Michelle Malkin talk about how horrible McCain is:

 http://www.glennbeck.com/content/articles/article/198/5261/ 
 
 
Interesting article by Joe Klein, "The Spoiler":

 http://www.time.com/time/nation/article/0,8599,1708386-2,00.html 
 
 
 
This is entertaining reading -- Glenn Beck and Michelle Malkin talk about how horrible McCain is:

 http://www.glennbeck.com/content/articles/article/198/5261/ 
 

Very amusing  

You gotta love an interview that starts off with the opening question, "Have you ever seen such an audacious slap in the face to the American people as this?"  

This one is pretty vivid about how far into wingnuttery they are too:

 
GLENN: If John McCain would get into office and this stuff would happen, I really honestly think, Michelle, and talk me down from this tree, I think John McCain is more dangerous even than Hillary Clinton because at least Hillary Clinton has Bill Clinton to make her triangulate eventually. There will be no stopping between John McCain and the Progressives of going down a road that is massive internationalists. Right or wrong?
 
 
 
Yeah, I loved "talk me down from this tree..."  

Interesting article from Allegra Goodman on how Hawaii has a lot to do with who Obama is:

 http://www.tnr.com/politics/story.html?id=37a6334e-8c5c-46c6-ac30-1bfdcdce758a 

 
Honolulu is no utopia; its socioeconomic climate is far from Edenic. However, Honolulu's complexity and diversity are great gifts for a reflective future leader. To grow up in Hawaii is to see the United States from the inside and the outside. The inside view comes from pride in statehood and military tradition. Long before September 11, residents of Hawaii knew what foreign attack was like and valued American protection--Pearl Harbor remains a vital piece of Hawaiian history. The outside view of the United States comes from geographic distance. The Hawaiian islands stand as tiny meeting points for immigrants from Japan, China, Korea, the Philippines, and the far reaches of Polynesia. Hawaii is an outpost among many nations, not a state connected by highways to other states. As a meeting place, the islands are cosmopolitan. As an isolated island chain, the islands are also parochial. The haves in Hawaii travel and see the world. The have-nots, many of them native Hawaiians, lack the means to get away. To grow up in Hawaii is to envision the future of a multiracial society, and also to view up close the disappointment of those left behind.
 
 
 
In her comments on the Kodak debate, Arianna Huffington refers to this post from May 28th, 2007 that contains a lot of info about how Hillary did not read the full NIE before voting to authorize the Iraq war, plus other info about Hillary and Iraq:

 http://www.huffingtonpost.com/arianna-huffington/her-way-hillary_b_49733.html 
 
 
"Why Republicans Like Obama"

 http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2008/02/01/AR2008020102663.html 
 
 
"Mom, Obama, and Me"

 http://www.latimes.com/news/opinion/sunday/commentary/la-oe-munoz2feb02,0,1138667.story 

Good article, with a few interesting elements. (Name recognition vs. name recognition ; generational aspect of Obama support; Latino support.)
 
 
Giuliani had a weird ad at the end there called "Not endorsed." It was about all the liberal papers who endorsed McCain instead.

McCain can maybe do something similar with all the far-right weirdos who are endorsing Romney lately -- Sean Hannity, Laura Ingraham, Glenn Beck, Michelle Malkin, Rick Santorum, etc.
 
 
Mostly a pure plonk. Interesting info about Obama in CA.

 http://www.huffingtonpost.com/mayhill-fowler/obama-hot-on-hillarys-he_b_84577.html 
 
 
Soz, the feeling at the Obama rally I went to yesterday was electric. I shouted myself hoarse and had a tough time finishing work that day!

Over on the polls thread Nimh has some nice ones showing Edwards supporters coming our way!

FIRED UP

READY TO GO!!!

Cycloptichorn
 
 
Oh, you went to a rally!! That's awesome.

Tell me all about it!
 
 
Want to grab this in case it comes up -- Hillary's "simplistic and misleading" description of the Levin measure at the last debate:

 http://www.nytimes.com/2008/02/02/us/politics/02check.html 
 
 
 
Oh, you went to a rally!! That's awesome.

Tell me all about it!
 

Tell ya? Hell, I'll do better then that!

It was on the UC Berkeley campus (where I work) and there were about 500 people in attendance. This pic is actually before it got at all crowded. Mostly college students though there were some community activists and organizers present and a large contingent of our regular anti-war and anti-torture protesters as well.

 

The event started off with musical entertainment by some of the members of Blackalicious who had written several songs just for the occasion. One of the best and most progressive rap groups out there, Blackalicious has a very positive message so I wasn't surprised to see that they are strong Obama supporters! This is one of many rallies they have appeared at.

 

They got the crowd pretty fired up. Speaking at the event were some local Obama organizers, Dean Chris Edley from Boalt Hall law school (where I work) who had a great speech about how he used to teach Obama at Harvard law, and said he was one of the most intelligent people that he had ever met. Dean Edley's wife is a Senior Advisor to Hillary, and he said he's been sleeping on the couch lately.   The tall fellow behind him was the MC of the event and may I say that he has a future as an announcer, quite gifted and great at exciting the crowd

 

We also heard some local writers and activists speak, including Craig from Craigslist. That guy was actually really good, b/c it turns out that he's been a Republican for most of his life. He gave a pretty passionate speech about how for the first time in a long time, he thought he could trust and believe in a politician. He said it made him feel better about himself as a person, that he could have this kind of hope in gov't again. Inspiring!

There were some guys from a local advertising agency holding up big Obama signs. They did all sorts of tricks with them and it was actually quite entertaining. I spoke with them, and they had come out on their day off to support Obama, working for free.

 

The event only lasted about an hour, and wasn't anywhere near the size of most of the rallies I've seen and read about. But it was important to us. I've never done this before. Never shouted a politicians' name till my throat hurt, or put in time and effort to see him elected. That's what Obama means to me - finding a better part of myself.

Cheers

Cycloptichorn
 
 
Thanks, Cycloptichorn!

Great pics and descriptions.

Very Berkeley crowd -- I've been to that square I think. (I have family in Berkeley.)
 
 
Interesting, Cyclopticorn! I would have loved to be there.

Did anyone listen to Thursday's Talk of the Nation on NPR? It was broadcast from Morgan State University and was a discussion of the politics of race. You can listen to it here:

 http://www.npr.org/templates/rundowns/rundown.php?prgId=5&prgDate=01-31-2008&view=storyview 

An interesting comment was made by several participants that African-Americans are hesitant to be too outspoken in there support of Obama because they are afraid he will be labeled the "black candidate" and will scare white folks away from his campaign.
 
 
 
BOISE, Idaho - This is a geographically big state. But despite its rapid growth in recent years, there are just 1.5 million people (and a lot fewer Democrats).

Still, Sen. Barack Obama brought his presidential campaign here Saturday morning, drawing what his campaign said was about 15,000 to the Taco Bell Arena on the campus of Boise State University.

That's about three times as many people who participated in the state's Democratic caucuses in 2004, when Idaho was not among early and important contests.
 

 http://www.swamppolitics.com/news/politics/blog/2008/02/obama_draws_some_15000_in_red.html 
 
 
Amy Goodman or Michael Savage? Who better, of the two, represents this thead?
 
 
Very, very good Op-Ed from Frank Rich:

 http://www.nytimes.com/2008/02/03/opinion/03rich.html 

A swath from the middle though I recommend the whole thing:

 
 
 
 
One of the pleasures for me when the NY Times reversed its pay for columnists' columns policy has been to be able to read Frank Rich again.
 
 
 http://www.huffingtonpost.com/linda-hansen/i-am-womanmisogyny-am_b_84555.html 

I Am Woman...Misogyny, Ambivalence and the Clinton Campaign
Posted February 1, 2008 | 08:18 PM (EST)
Linda Hansen

Excerpts:

 
Hillary tells us, in no uncertain terms, she's smart enough and tough enough to serve as our first female president. From Day One. And she's absolutely right. Nobody knows the issues any better and nobody seeking the nomination, on either side, is quicker with a sharp comeback or an equally sharp elbow to the ribs. Like the low blow or not, "This is politics, not bean bag..." as the HRC team likes to say.

Point taken. But she can't have it both ways and here's where Clinton campaign ambivalence kicks in. The gender game is in play, and HRC won't pick a side.

 

 
We have loathsome, mindless misogyny on one side of the bell curve and gender ambivalence on the far side. We have woman-bashing "Get thee to the kitchen, wench!" on the one hand and "I'm as tough as you are, buster, get out of my way!" coupled with "I'm vulerable, too--and that ain't no way to treat a lady!" on the other. Both are destructive and dishonest. Both are bad for the process and bad for the country. Intellect, strength, character and capability know no gender. There's no logical or practical reason a woman can't run this nation as well as any man. Better than most.

That said, a strong, smart woman who's well-qualified to serve as president doesn't need to play the game on both sides of Gender Street. If she does, she gets the disrespect she's got coming, adds momentum to the misogynist movement. The Clinton campaign cannot control the knuckle-dragging misogynist. What they can control is an unfortunate pattern of ambivalent behavior that feeds the beast-- and take their campaign setbacks on the chin, like the other guy has always had to do.

In the Promised Land of enlightenment and gender parity, what's good for the goose is, after all, good for the gander.

 
 
 
Great pictures and description, Cyclo!
 
 
Matthew Yglesias:

 
Here's an  interesting tidbit  from Mark Penn's latest strategy memo: "No one believes that if Hillary had been president she would have started the war."

I don't have an incredibly firm view on the counterfactual here. After all, it's a bit hard to specify a scenario in which Hillary Clinton would have been president in the spring of 2003. But when Bush did start the war, Hillary surely could have said that despite her vote to authorize him to start a war she believed he was making a mistake in doing so. She didn't do that. She didn't say that in March of 2003, and she didn't say it in April of 2003 and she didn't say it in May of 2003. To the best of my knowledge, she didn't start saying anything of the sort until years after the invasion had happened. So I hardly think it's wildly unreasonable to take her statements, actions, and silences at face value and say she thought Bush was more-or-less doing what she would have done in his position.

Or maybe not. I lot of people I know are convinced that Hillary did, in fact, all along believe that Bush was committing a huge strategic blunder but that she pretended not to believe that because she thought it was important to her presidential ambitions. I don't think I really buy that. Among other things, I don't think Clinton would have thought that backing a huge strategic blunder would help her presidential ambitions. Insofar as she thought the war was politically savvy, that would almost certainly have been related to a view that the war wasn't a huge substantive error. But either way, if Mark Penn thinks his candidate was only pretending to approve of Bush's conduct he ought to say so plainly. Clearly, she wasn't a major critic of his conduct at the time.
 

 http://matthewyglesias.theatlantic.com/archives/2008/02/nobody.php 

I recommend the "interesting tidbit," too. I think if (IF) Hillary loses this, there will be a fair amount of blame to go around but a lot of it will (rightfully) affix itself to Mark Penn.
 
 
Profile of Obama in Vanity Fair (I haven't read it yet):

 http://www.vanityfair.com/politics/features/2008/03/obama200803?printable=true&currentPage=all 
 
 
It's good! One notable omission -- the role that luck played in his successful 2004 Senate bid as scandals claimed opponents. Some good anecdotes and quotes from family members, though.
 
 
 
"Mom, Obama, and Me"

 http://www.latimes.com/news/opinion/sunday/commentary/la-oe-munoz2feb02,0,1138667.story 
 

That was a great article! Absolutely a must-read.

In the polls thread, all the numbers about young vs old, polling among Latinos, the persistent popularity of Hillary among older women, all of that can easily come to seem abstract, like you're just talking about categories of people. It's easy to come to generalised impressions of those categories too. This column makes the story comes alive, tells the story behind the numbers.

Plus, it's funny  

The Rich column was good too. It nicely summarises some of the main arguments that pulled me off the fence.
 
 
I really liked that writer, yeah. Great voice.
 
 
As Obama vs. McCain in the general election becomes more possible I keep thinking back to that spat they had in 2006 and how well Obama handled it. Here's a post I made about it:

 http://www.able2know.org/forums/viewtopic.php?p=1923896#1923896 

The photo from the post:

 

Some more background from that whole episode:

 http://www.guardian.co.uk/uselections08/story/0,,2252418,00.html 

(The last one is a new article.)
 
 
Good post (what the heck do you call individual blog entries? I haven't gotten the hang of that yet) from Matt Bai on the positives and negatives of Obama and Hillary accepting their "Change vs. Experience" pigeonholes at the beginning of the race:

 http://thecaucus.blogs.nytimes.com/2008/02/05/the-change-vs-experience-pitfall/#more-4118 

I especially agreed with this:

 
What's more, while Mr. Obama's advisers were right to think voters valued change over experience, they ignored the fact that a change candidate still has to put to rest questions about his experience if he wants voters to take a chance on him. Had they more forcefully challenged Mrs. Clinton's initial contention that she alone was ready to govern, they might not have had to spend the rest of the campaign trying to get past the idea that Mr. Obama isn't.
 
 
 
 
Good post (what the heck do you call individual blog entries? I haven't gotten the hang of that yet) from Matt Bai on the positives and negatives of Obama and Hillary accepting their "Change vs. Experience" pigeonholes at the beginning of the race:

 http://thecaucus.blogs.nytimes.com/2008/02/05/the-change-vs-experience-pitfall/#more-4118 

I especially agreed with this:

 
What's more, while Mr. Obama's advisers were right to think voters valued change over experience, they ignored the fact that a change candidate still has to put to rest questions about his experience if he wants voters to take a chance on him. Had they more forcefully challenged Mrs. Clinton's initial contention that she alone was ready to govern, they might not have had to spend the rest of the campaign trying to get past the idea that Mr. Obama isn't.
 

 

Diaries, is what you call them, on a lot of the sites.

Obama's camp should say this:

 
Do you know how you can tell who is a tough guy, and who isn't?

Tough guys don't need to remind you that they are tough.

Clinton's constant mantra of '35 years of experience' is a ploy to convince people that she actually has experience.

If she was really experienced, to the degree that she claims, she wouldn't need to mention it once.
 

Cycloptichorn
 
 
"Feminist Ultimatums: Not In Our Name"

 http://www.huffingtonpost.com/kimberle-crenshaw-and-eve-ensler/feminist-ultimatums-not-_b_85165.html 

The end:

 
For us, the choice at hand is actually quite simple. It is not about the woman candidate vs. the Black male candidate. It is about the candidate who works to dismantle the bomb, rather than drop it; the candidate who works to abolish the old paradigm of power, rather than covet and rise to its highest point; the candidate who seeks solutions and dialogue rather than retaliation and punishment.

As feminists our freedoms have been hard won and we'd like to think that we have learned from our mistakes along the way. The feminism we fought so hard for and benefited from was not to make us blind to the complexity, but to help us see beyond simple formulas and body politics.
 
 
 
Makes me want to email my latina LA friends but I can predict how they'll vote.. lessee: M. Luisa, I figure she'll pick Huckabee; L & M, I figure both EW for Obama, or maybe a split, with one sister for Hillary. (I'll report back next time I visit.)
 
 
Haven't clicked the link yet. Is that from the petition of 70 prominent feminists in New York who declared endorsement for Obama a few days ago?
 
 
This one is just Eve Ensler and Kimberle Crenshaw (I don't know the latter).

I think Osso is referring to the "Mom, Obama and Me" one...
 
 
I was. Dunno how that EW showed up!!!! I've been misspelling all day long. Must be that biocycles phenomenon so popular in the seventies...
 
 
Now that I have a decent connection again (for now anyway... nice connection, good connection, here have a cookie...) I'll start this up again:

 
Gutierrez, an early Obama supporter, said the Obama campaign "didn't commit'' the level of resources to capture the Latino vote that it should have.

"That is a failure of running a national campaign. The person that we came to know that is on the cover of Newsweek and national magazines many times does not get to the household table where people are dealing with how you pay the mortgage," he said.

"At least 4 out of 10 Latinos do not get their opinion of public officials from English-speaking media," he pointed out.

"I do not go out there and hear Latinos using any kind of racism against Barack Obama," Gutierrez said. "That just didn't happen. Why don't we just assume that it was a failure of the campaign to see the need to communicate."
Forced to examine our views

To prove his point, Gutierrez pointed to New Mexico, where 43 percent of the registered voters are Latino. Late Wednesday, Obama was still in a dead heat with Clinton as votes were tallied.

In pondering how difficult it has been for Obama to attract the Hispanic vote, both Rangel and Gutierrez brought up Mayor Harold Washington's primary race against Jane Byrne and Richard Daley in 1983.

"Latinos did not come out in big numbers and vote for Harold Washington in the primary," Rangel noted. "But when the general election came around, Latinos backed the Democratic nominee. I would venture if Obama wins the nomination, Latinos will come out in big numbers for Barack."

Gutierrez also noted that when Washington ran in the general election, white voters moved to vote for Republican Bernie Epton, blacks rallied for Washington, and Latinos stayed with the Democratic Party, boosting Washington's Latino tally from 10 percent to 60 percent.

"They rejected the bigotry," Gutierrez said. "Those leaders who inspire hope allow us to overcome our innate bigotry and prejudices."
 

 http://www.suntimes.com/news/mitchell/781607,CST-NWS-mitch07.article 

I'm not sure about the opinionating around it, but grabbing it for the point about the Latino vote and Harold Washington. (Didn't do so well in the nominating round, but once he was the Dem nominee he did way better.)
 
 
Feingold's not ready to endorse anyone -- but he's giving them road maps:

 http://www.madison.com/tct/news/271406 
 
 
Individual opinions are individual opinions... their value when making large-scale predictions are pretty limited. But I see this stuff over and over and over and over and over again:

 
That's part of Obama's crossover appeal, said George Kobitz of Covington, who drove across Lake Pontchartrain before dawn with his wife and a sign reading "Obamacan," signifying an Obama Republican. Obama has talked about trying to appeal to Republicans much the same way President Ronald Reagan garnered support from whole blocs of Democratic voters.

"I've been a Republican all my life and this Bush thing didn't go over very well. If it was just Clinton, I would stay a Republican and vote for (Arizona Sen. John) McCain, but Obama's about change," said Kobitz, who has sent several donations to Obama's campaign. "The Bush-Clinton era is over. We're sick of it."
 

 http://www.nola.com/news/index.ssf/2008/02/crowd_packs_obama_rally_many_l.html 
 
 
Good speech at Tulane, I saw some of it live and there was at least some ad-libbing that departed from these prepared remarks:

 http://www.nola.com/news/index.ssf/2008/02/barack_obamas_speech.html 

Lots to like but I'll semi-randomly select this:

 
We can't gamble every hurricane season. When I am President, we will finish building a system of levees that can withstand a 100-year storm by 2011, with the goal of expanding that protection to defend against a Category 5 storm. We also have to restore nature's barriers - the wetlands, marshes and barrier islands that can take the first blows and protect the people of the Gulf Coast.
 

I became convinced of the importance of that last part after Katrina.
 
 
Cute headline from The Swamp:

 
Obama ads target both young, formerly young
 

:-P
 
 
 
Good speech at Tulane, I saw some of it live and there was at least some ad-libbing that departed from these prepared remarks:

 http://www.nola.com/news/index.ssf/2008/02/barack_obamas_speech.html 

Lots to like but I'll semi-randomly select this:

 
We can't gamble every hurricane season. When I am President, we will finish building a system of levees that can withstand a 100-year storm by 2011, with the goal of expanding that protection to defend against a Category 5 storm. We also have to restore nature's barriers - the wetlands, marshes and barrier islands that can take the first blows and protect the people of the Gulf Coast.
 

I became convinced of the importance of that last part after Katrina.
 
But that's really just so much nonsense. Cat-5 protection isn't economically viable. Katrina proved this, more than anything else. While it is true that beefed up levies would have survived that storm; had the storm struck slightly further to the west; those beefier levies would have resulted in 100 times more carnage as the storm surge filled the city like the bowl it is. Galveston is the same way and it's no coincidence that it's also the home of two of the nations worst disasters.
 
 
 
 
Good speech at Tulane, I saw some of it live and there was at least some ad-libbing that departed from these prepared remarks:

 http://www.nola.com/news/index.ssf/2008/02/barack_obamas_speech.html 

Lots to like but I'll semi-randomly select this:

 
We can't gamble every hurricane season. When I am President, we will finish building a system of levees that can withstand a 100-year storm by 2011, with the goal of expanding that protection to defend against a Category 5 storm. We also have to restore nature's barriers - the wetlands, marshes and barrier islands that can take the first blows and protect the people of the Gulf Coast.
 

I became convinced of the importance of that last part after Katrina.
 
But that's really just so much nonsense. Cat-5 protection isn't economically viable. Katrina proved this, more than anything else. While it is true that beefed up levies would have survived that storm; had the storm struck slightly further to the west; those beefier levies would have resulted in 100 times more carnage as the storm surge filled the city like the bowl it is. Galveston is the same way and it's no coincidence that it's also the home of two of the nations worst disasters.
 

Actually Galveston ain't so bad anymore; after the big hurricaine they raised the level of the island 19 feet!   Using mules and hand labor! The whole island! Couldn't do that today if we tried.

You're right tho, a cat 5 storm is going to screw anything that comes its' way. As for the levies, we can always blow a few open to drain water out if it comes to that; I'd rather have them be strong to begin with!
 
 
 
While it is true that beefed up levies would have survived that storm; had the storm struck slightly further to the west; those beefier levies would have resulted in 100 times more carnage as the storm surge filled the city like the bowl it is. Galveston is the same way and it's no coincidence that it's also the home of two of the nations worst disasters.
 

But that's what the part about the wetlands and marshes was about. Those areas act as buffers to the storm surge.
 
 
 
 
While it is true that beefed up levies would have survived that storm; had the storm struck slightly further to the west; those beefier levies would have resulted in 100 times more carnage as the storm surge filled the city like the bowl it is. Galveston is the same way and it's no coincidence that it's also the home of two of the nations worst disasters.
 

But that's what the part about the wetlands and marshes was about. Those areas act as buffers to the storm surge.
 
I gather you're none too familiar with Hurricanes. New Orleans was very, very lucky that Katrina lost steam before making landfall (CAT-3) and didn't hit directly. Don't get me wrong; Katrina was a killer among killers with a storm surge of over 25 feet; but she could have been worse. Much worse. The topography of the ocean there lends itself to huge storm surges, which are by far the most deadly of Hurricane effects. At peak CAT-5 strength; Katrina could have hit New Orleans like a 50 foot tall bulldozer, and destroyed EVERYTHING in it's path. Believe it. The record deadliest Tropical cyclone killed 500,000 people in India... and if memory serves; that was a CAT-3 at landfall as well. We've been seeing more CAT-5s lately and it's only a matter of time until one of these killers strikes.

Events like Hurricane Katrina are essentially the finger of God and can hardly be helped. While I'm sure those clever Dutch could feasibly build a defense system; the cost would so far beyond reason that it would never happen. And even the Dutch have contingency plans for failure. New Orleans will never be equipped to handle a CAT-5 storm. Nor will anywhere else, really but the combination of the ocean's topography, the Mississippi River and Lake Pontchartrain all on top of the fact that the city lies on average 6 feet below sea level will forever make it an absolute Death Trap during large storm events. Wanna survive a Hurricane in New Orleans? Get the hell out of New Orleans.

(And you'd best not evacuate to Galveston, either.)(A CAT-5 will chuckle at 19 ft, Cyclo, as it washes the city away.)(Again.)
 
 
 
I gather you're none too familiar with Hurricanes.
 

Born in raised on the east coast of Florida, in a riverfront house. We had a lovely little buffer from the storm surge -- the beach side. Those outlying areas take the first hit. Of course we still got storm surge, but not nearly what those outlying areas got.

Of course we would evacuate anything close to a CAT-5 hurricane, but that doesn't mean that the buffer zones didn't help us. A lot.
 
 
David Brooks, "Questions for Dr. Retail":

 http://www.nytimes.com/2008/02/08/opinion/08brooks.html 

A bit out of character for him, but interesting. Plus a dig at the "Yes We Can" video. :-D
 
 
I love this photo. It should go over well in Texas.  

 
 
 
Another very, very good Sunday column from Frank Rich:

 http://www.nytimes.com/2008/02/10/opinion/10rich.html 

Plus this was instructive, on superdelegates ("Superdelegates, Back Off":

 http://www.nytimes.com/2008/02/10/opinion/10devine.html 

Especially, it sounds like they weren't really supposed to start endorsing as early as they did. They're supposed to hang back and wait to see where voters are going, then ratify anything close (if there's a narrow leader, make that person a decisive leader).
 
 
Obama and Clinton on 60 Minutes last night, transcripts here:

 http://www.swamppolitics.com/news/politics/blog/2008/02/hillary_clinton_barack_obama_t.html#more 

(There was some substance -- not a ton -- but this one made me smile:)

 
BARACK OBAMA:

You know I-- I-- I've held up pretty good. But I've been religious about getting my exercise. You know, so I've been working out every morning. That helps.

STEVE KROFT:

Playing some basketball?

BARACK OBAMA:

Played a little basketball. We realized that we had played basketball before Iowa and before South Carolina. We didn't play basketball before New Hampshire and Nevada. And so now, we've made a clear rule that on election day, I have to play basketball.

STEVE KROFT:

Did you play basketball on-- on Super Tuesday?

BARACK OBAMA:

Absolutely.
 
 
 
Matt Yglesias

 
Obama and the Details
11 Feb 2008

One anti-Obama meme that I notice has gotten a lot of support even among people sympathetic to his cause is the notion that he's somehow shallow or insufficiently well-versed in policy matters. Obviously, I can't crawl into either candidate's brain and take a look around, but this idea doesn't seem to me to be especially well-supported by the evidence. Instead, it seems to draw support from a kind of implicit Law of Conservation of Virtues -- the pretty girl can't be smart, the not-so-good-looking guy must be really nice -- that has people notice that Clinton is well-versed in policy but isn't a charismatic figure, and Obama is charismatic so it "must" be that he's not well-versed in policy. He's cool and she's the nerd.

This suits the media's taste for parallels and lazy narratives into which events can be squeezed. But there's really not much basis for it...
 
 http://matthewyglesias.theatlantic.com/ 

psst...krugman has a column this morning for anyone who's interested
 
 
I'm sure you can guess my opinion of the Krugman column. If anyone wants a counterpoint I'm willing (just two teeny points to start: #1)Krugman may be attracting the creepier Obama supporters because of his obvious anti-Obama bias, but I have seen many, many, MANY creepy Hillary supporters out there; and #2) nimh has shown that when it comes to plain old regular non-trolly voters, people are happy with either Obama or Hillary. There isn't nearly as much vitriol out there in general as Krugman implies. OK just one more: #3) Obama is the one who HAS been taking the lead with assurances that he respects his opponent and would support her in the general election. When accusations were flying fast and furious, the day after Hillary spent her entire hour on "Meet the Press" attacking Obama in one way or another, Obama is the one who called the press conference to say that Bill and Hillary are "good people." He's the one who calmed things down.)

Ahem.

Loved the Yglesias article, thanks.
 
 
Well, I've extracted myself from candidate vs candidate discussions, here or at home. But where I find data and viewpoints that seem careful and revelatory, I'll pass them on.
 
 
'K.

This is a bit startling:

 
Texas and Ohio Won't Decide the Democratic Race

Floating around coverage of the Democratic primary is this notion that nothing really matters until Texas and Ohio. Or, at least, to the extent that Barack Obama's victories in the primaries that precede Ohio and Texas matter, it's only to help him build momentum for Ohio and Texas, when all the real delegates are at stake. Here's an entirely typical passage from today's Washington Post:

Hillary Clinton, effectively tied with Obama in delegates and facing difficult races the rest of this month, is looking to gain any possible advantage to slow her rival's momentum until March 4, when the campaign reaches what her aides believe will be friendlier territory in the Ohio and Texas primaries.

What you'd never get from reading this coverage is that Ohio and Texas aren't that much more important than other states.The states that Obama won over the weekend had a total of 185 pledged delegates. Tomorrow's primary states have 168. That's a total of 353 delegates. Ohio and Texas, meanwhile, combine for 224 delegates. (That's my back of the envelope calculation from the numbers at wikipedia.)

And Obama won enormous blowout victories over the weekend, and is up by double digits Tuesday. So even if Clinton wins Texas and Ohio, it will be impossible for her to make up just the delegate advantage Obama has won and should win over these few days.

--Jonathan Chait
 

 http://blogs.tnr.com/tnr/blogs/the_plank/archive/2008/02/11/texas-and-ohio-won-t-decide-the-democratic-race.aspx 
 
 
Love that photo too, butrflynet.

Thanks all for continuing links and the comments that go with them.
 
 
Just got the new New Yorker. I've been wondering what Hendrik Hertzberg thinks about Obama vs. Hillary -- his earlier "comments" seemed rather pro-Hillary, but the New Yorker in general seems to be trending towards Obama.

Anyway, here's Hertzberg's take:

 http://www.newyorker.com/talk/comment/2008/02/11/080211taco_talk_hertzberg 

Excerpts:

 
The anger was mostly directed at Senator Clinton, her husband, and her campaign, for a series of what have come to be known, redundantly, as "negative attacks." The most egregious, because so coldly premeditated, was a radio spot that took as its hook a snippet of audio from an Obama interview in which he said, "The Republicans were the party of ideas for a pretty long chunk of time there over the last ten, fifteen years." A smooth-voiced announcer then adds:

Really? Aren't those the ideas that got us into the economic mess we're in today? Ideas like special tax breaks for Wall Street? Running up a nine-trillion-dollar debt? Refusing to raise the minimum wage or deal with the housing crisis? Are those the ideas Barack Obama's talking about?
 

 
 

 
Obama's Democratic critics worry that his soaring rhetoric of reconciliation is naïve. But, as Mark Schmitt has argued in The American Prospect, Obama's national-unity pitch should be viewed as a tactic as well as an ideal. It might lengthen his coattails, helping Democratic candidates for the House and the Senate in marginally red districts and states. It would not protect him from attack, of course, but it would enable him to fire back from the high ground. And, as a new President elected with a not quite filibuster-proof Senate, he would be in a better position to peel off the handful of Republican senators he would need to make meaningful legislative progress than someone who started from a defensive crouch. Hillary Clinton would make a competent, knowledgeable, and responsible President. Barack Obama just might make a transformative one.
 
 
 
 
Obama and Clinton on 60 Minutes last night, transcripts here:

 http://www.swamppolitics.com/news/politics/blog/2008/02/hillary_clinton_barack_obama_t.html#more 

(There was some substance -- not a ton -- but this one made me smile:)

 
BARACK OBAMA:

You know I-- I-- I've held up pretty good. But I've been religious about getting my exercise. You know, so I've been working out every morning. That helps.

STEVE KROFT:

Playing some basketball?

BARACK OBAMA:

Played a little basketball. We realized that we had played basketball before Iowa and before South Carolina. We didn't play basketball before New Hampshire and Nevada. And so now, we've made a clear rule that on election day, I have to play basketball.

STEVE KROFT:

Did you play basketball on-- on Super Tuesday?

BARACK OBAMA:

Absolutely.
 

 

That 60 Minutes interview was frustrating to watch. Steve Kroft made a point of stating that one of Obama's weaknesses was that he was light on substance in his speeches. Obama replied that in the beginning people were criticizing him for being too professorial and too heavy on the details and now that he switched to speeches with more idealism people are saying they are light on substance. Obama says okay, let's address some of those issue details now. So Kroft asks him about Iraq and they edit the interview after one sentence and go on to the next question.
 
 
Does anyone ever comment on the messanic nature of Krugman's fans?
 
 
 
Does anyone ever comment on the messanic nature of Krugman's fans?
 

It's been mentioned several times before in other contexts. He makes up his mind first and then finds data/reports to support his positions and pretends that any that don't agree with him, don't exist. He's used the same sort of tactics in pushing healthcare reform for the last year or two but people his followers seem to get that glassy-eyed look and stutter "But Krugman said..." when you point that sort of thing out to them.
 
 
Hilzoy, again (hey fishin, have you seen her avatar?):

 http://obsidianwings.blogs.com/obsidian_wings/2008/02/more-news-about.html 

An excerpt, again I recommend the whole thing:

 
Moreover, the Obama campaign arguably had more reason than the Clinton campaign to focus on the earliest contests and slight the later ones. Obama, after all, was coming from behind. He had to win some of the early contests. If he had lost every state through Super Tuesday, it would have been all over for him. He therefore had a pretty strong reason to put everything he had into those states, and hope that whatever momentum he got would carry him through in places like Maine and Nebraska. Clinton, by contrast, only had to anticipate that Obama might win enough states to keep going to know that she had to focus on the post-Super Tuesday states. She has a lot less excuse for making this misjudgment than Obama did. But she made it, and he did not. That tells me something.

I also found this account fascinating:

"Initially, Clinton's former White House chief of staff, Maggie Williams, was brought in to run the campaign even though Solis Doyle was still there. The result was confusion and awkwardness for the staff, who weren't sure who was really in charge. But even more problematic was the campaign's money crunch. Over the last seven years, Clinton had raised $175 million for her reelection and her presidential campaign. But Solis Doyle didn't tell Clinton that there was next to no cash on hand until after the New Hampshire primary. "We were lying about money," a source said. "The cash on hand was nothing." In turn, Clinton didn't tell Solis Doyle that she was lending her own money to keep the campaign afloat. Solis Doyle found out third-hand. And when she asked Clinton about it, the senator told her she couldn't understand how the campaign had gotten to such a point."

Did they actually burn through all that money? Without creating strong organizations in post-Super Tuesday states? And did they lie about it? How, and when? I'd love to see some more reporting on this.
 
 
 
Nothing really new here but I liked the last line. :-)

 
Obama's recent successes, in fact, don't just speak to his popularity as a Democratic candidate. A close look at his victories show a fundamental shift not just in who's winning but in who is voting for the winner. Obama's victory in Louisiana could be, if one were especially cynical, written off as success with "black voters." But what of Nebraska, just to take one example? Obama won the state 68 to 32; he won Nebraska's second congressional district 77 to 23. And while it's true that this district (my home district, by the way) encompasses the University of Nebraska and the capital (pointy-headed academics and whatnot), it's also 80% white, with a mean household income of about $50,000. These are not latte liberals. They are just barely caffeinated.
 

 http://www.time.com/time/nation/article/0,8599,1711755,00.html?imw=Y 
 
 
That's something I could never figure out with the demographics the exit polls are producing...

How can Obama's supporters be both affluent and highly educated while being mostly young students?

Students are rarely affluent, they survive on Cup-o-Noodles.
 
 
 
That's something I could never figure out with the demographics the exit polls are producing...

How can Obama's supporters be both affluent and highly educated while being mostly young students?

Students are rarely affluent, they survive on Cup-o-Noodles.
 

You can't combine the demographics in the polls. For example, Obama won 59% of the vote in NJ amongst those aged 18-29 but they only make up 13% of all the voters in the Dem primariy there.

It isn't "affluent, well educated young people" that he's doing well with. He's doing well with "the affluent", "the young" and the "well educated" - they aren't necessarily the same people.

(I haven't seen a poll yet that breaks the demographics down to a level that would combine all 3 of those factors. Even if they did, I don't know that the sampling size would be enough to tell anyone anything. "Affluent" also seems to refer to those making between $75K and $150K/year. Once you get up into the $200K+/year range the polls seem to favor Clinton - but the % of the population in that range is much smaller.)
 
 
 
 
Does anyone ever comment on the messanic nature of Krugman's fans?
 

It's been mentioned several times before in other contexts. He makes up his mind first and then finds data/reports to support his positions and pretends that any that don't agree with him, don't exist. He's used the same sort of tactics in pushing healthcare reform for the last year or two but people his followers seem to get that glassy-eyed look and stutter "But Krugman said..." when you point that sort of thing out to them.
 

I lost a lot of respect for Krugman when he swallowed the Clinton narrative about Obama's Reagan comments -- his column sounded like the precursor to the ad mentioned in the New Yorker piece that soz posted. Now I just read his columns and wonder what his angle is. It's too bad.
 
 
I keep seeing more about how the Clinton campaign put all of its eggs in one basket, and that basket was "wrap up nomination on or before Super Tuesday":

 http://www.nytimes.com/2008/02/14/us/politics/14clinton.html 

Not just that, though, also a lot about superior organizational effort from Obama in general.
 
 
This looks useful -- a superdelegate primer:

Oops, the below was what was on my clipboard when I tried to paste. Will include it anyway. From "First Read" (which also pointed me to the primer):

 
 

Now, the primer:

 http://www.msnbc.msn.com/id/23147072/ 
 
 
 
I keep seeing more about how the Clinton campaign put all of its eggs in one basket, and that basket was "wrap up nomination on or before Super Tuesday":

 http://www.nytimes.com/2008/02/14/us/politics/14clinton.html 

Not just that, though, also a lot about superior organizational effort from Obama in general.
 

Given how relatively short the period of time has been for Obama's campaign to get up and organized (in contrast with Hillary's campaign) somebody deserves serious kudos. And we ought to acknowledge that this says some pretty good things about Obama's ability to spot and then utilize high-quality executive talent.
 
 
Posting here, b/c cj got the Obama thread locked.

Linc Chaffee endorses Obama. This is interesting. I think that Obama will say, 'this is EXACTLY what I mean when I say disaffected Republicans. Those who are willing to help, even though we don't share all the same opinions. Senator Clinton cannot do this.'

Cycloptichorn
 
 
Oh, that's cool about Chaffee! Didn't know that, thanks. Certainly makes sense.
 
 
 
Oh, that's cool about Chaffee! Didn't know that, thanks. Certainly makes sense.
 

Just happened, lol

Also, Rassmussen has Obama +12 in their latest national poll.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
If Chaffee endorsed Obama rather than Hillary, then I think it is safe to say that Coulter will express disagreement.
 
 
 http://www.swamppolitics.com/news/politics/blog/2008/02/ris_lincoln_chafee_endorses_ba.html 

"Fortitude." I like that word, good for Obama.
 
 
Heh..!

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=XE3jLCC_rwo 
 
 
no, you can't

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=gI7WwY4a9ro&eurl=http://www.salon.com/politics/war_room/ 
 
 
See, now THAT'S funny!

Cycloptichorn
 
 
The (real) nastiness is ramping up...

 
Fox News Radio's Tom Sullivan aired "side-by-side comparison" of speeches by Hitler and Obama
Fox News Radio host Tom Sullivan took a call from a listener who stated that when listening to Barack Obama speak, "it harkens back to when I was younger and I used to watch those deals with Hitler, how he would excite the crowd and they'd come to their feet and scream and yell." Sullivan then played a "side-by-side comparison" of a Hitler speech and an Obama speech. Sullivan later said he wouldn't play it again, then begged: "Can I, please, one more time? Just one more time? Then I won't do it again.... Until the next time."
 
 http://mediamatters.org/ 
 
 
and you'll see on the same page...

 
Fox News host Banderas called Obama a "Halfrican"
 

 
Laura Ingraham on Al Sharpton's visit to the White House: "I hope they nailed down all the valuables"
 
 
 
Ezra Klein's on MI/FL, again:

 
OUT FOR THEMSELVES.

The New York Times reports:

With every delegate precious, Mrs. Clinton's advisers also made it clear that they were prepared to take a number of potentially incendiary steps to build up Mrs. Clinton's count. Top among these, her aides said, is pressing for Democrats to seat the disputed delegations from Florida and Michigan, who held their primaries in January in defiance of Democratic Party rules.

Put another way: If Hillary Clinton does not win delegates out of a majority of contested primaries and caucuses, her aides are willing to rip the party apart to secure the nomination, to cheat in a way that will rend the Democratic coalition and probably destroy Clinton's chances in the general election. Imagine the fury in the African-American community if Barack Obama leads in delegates but is denied the nomination because the Clinton campaign is able to change the rules to seat delegates from Michigan, where no other candidates were even on the ballot, and from Florida, where no one campaigned. Imagine the anger among the young voters Obama brought into the process, and was making into Democratic voters. Imagine the feeling of betrayal among his supporters more generally, and the disgust among independents watching the battle take place on the convention floor. Imagine how statesmanlike John McCain will look in comparison, how orderly and focused the Republican convention will appear.

This demonstrates not only a gross ruthlessness on the part of Clinton's campaign, but an astonishingly cavalier attitude towards the preservation of the progressive coalition. To be willing to blithely rip it to shreds in order to wrest a nomination that's not been fairly earned is not only low, but a demonstration of deeply pernicious priorities -- namely, it's an explicit statement that the campaign puts its own political success above the health of the party and the pursuit of progressive goals, and one can't but help assume that's exactly the attitude they would take towards governance, too.
 

 http://www.prospect.org/csnc/blogs/ezraklein_archive?month=02&year=2008&base_name=out_for_themselves 
 
 
SEIU and UFCW national unions to endorse Obama tonight!

Lots of union workers in Ohio...

Cycloptichorn
 
 
 
The (real) nastiness is ramping up...

 
Fox News Radio's Tom Sullivan aired "side-by-side comparison" of speeches by Hitler and Obama
Fox News Radio host Tom Sullivan took a call from a listener who stated that when listening to Barack Obama speak, "it harkens back to when I was younger and I used to watch those deals with Hitler, how he would excite the crowd and they'd come to their feet and scream and yell." Sullivan then played a "side-by-side comparison" of a Hitler speech and an Obama speech. Sullivan later said he wouldn't play it again, then begged: "Can I, please, one more time? Just one more time? Then I won't do it again.... Until the next time."
 
 http://mediamatters.org/ 
 

CNN continues to swim in the nastiness pool too:

 http://mediamatters.org/items/200802120007 

 
On the February 11 edition of CNN's The Situation Room, in a report
about presidential candidates' "body language" and "why... they
point" when addressing crowds, national news correspondent Jeanne Moos
said, "[S]ince we usually can't see who the candidates are pointing
at, we'll just have to use our imagination." Moments later, as noted
on the websiteblip.tv, video of Sen. Barack Obama (D-IL) pointing was
followed by a zoomed-in still of Osama bin Laden. Moos also suggested
that Sen. Hillary Rodham Clinton (D-NY) was pointing to Monica
Lewinsky and that Sen. John McCain (R-AZ) was pointing to right-wing
pundit Ann Coulter.

As Media Matters for America noted, on the December 11, 2006, edition
of The Situation Room, Moos said that "[o]nly one little consonant
differentiates" Obama and Osama. She then added, "[A]s if that
similarity weren't enough. How about sharing the name of a former
dictator? You know his middle name, Hussein." Additionally, on the
December 11, 2006, edition of The Situation Room, then CNN senior
political analyst Jeff Greenfield compared the similarity of Obama's
"business casual" clothing to Iranian President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad's
"jacket-and-no-tie look." Greenfield concluded the segment by saying:
"Now, it is one thing to have a last name that sounds like Osama and a
middle name, Hussein, that is probably less than helpful. But an
outfit that reminds people of a charter member of the axis of evil,
why, this could leave his presidential hopes hanging by a thread." He
later explained on the CNN website that he was making "a joke."

A December 19, 2007, post on The New York Times' Caucus blog,
headlined "CNN's Obama/Osama Habit" noted several instances in 2007 in
which CNN personalities or on-screen text "confused" Obama with bin
Laden:
 

The link above has more examples from CNN and a transcript of the latest video they created to make a spoof of it all.
 
 
 
The (real) nastiness is ramping up...

 
Fox News Radio's Tom Sullivan aired "side-by-side comparison" of speeches by Hitler and Obama
Fox News Radio host Tom Sullivan took a call from a listener who stated that when listening to Barack Obama speak, "it harkens back to when I was younger and I used to watch those deals with Hitler, how he would excite the crowd and they'd come to their feet and scream and yell." Sullivan then played a "side-by-side comparison" of a Hitler speech and an Obama speech. Sullivan later said he wouldn't play it again, then begged: "Can I, please, one more time? Just one more time? Then I won't do it again.... Until the next time."
 
 http://mediamatters.org/ 
 

The real nastiness on A2K is ramping up too.

What a sad day for A2K.
 
 
 
 
The (real) nastiness is ramping up...

 
Fox News Radio's Tom Sullivan aired "side-by-side comparison" of speeches by Hitler and Obama
Fox News Radio host Tom Sullivan took a call from a listener who stated that when listening to Barack Obama speak, "it harkens back to when I was younger and I used to watch those deals with Hitler, how he would excite the crowd and they'd come to their feet and scream and yell." Sullivan then played a "side-by-side comparison" of a Hitler speech and an Obama speech. Sullivan later said he wouldn't play it again, then begged: "Can I, please, one more time? Just one more time? Then I won't do it again.... Until the next time."
 
 http://mediamatters.org/ 
 

The real nastiness on A2K is ramping up too.

What a sad day for A2K.
 

Lots of threads have been blocked here before, if that's what you refer to.

Or, if you are referring to the debates among folk on the left, there's passion and there's disagreement (and strains on friendships perhaps) but I don't see how we might have avoided that given the unique specifics of this nomination battle and the importance we each acknowledge of this general election. And if we compare voices here to many other sites, I find us pretty tame.
 
 
Nope, not just referring to the one locked thread. That was rather tame compared to others today.

Passion and disagreement I have no problem with.
 
 
I'm not sure what you refer to then. Send me a pm if you care to. Or we could just carry on and trust folks will settle themselves in time.
 
 
Barbara Ehrenrich -- she's more optimistic than I am, but it's an interesting read:

 http://www.huffingtonpost.com/barbara-ehrenreich/unstoppable-obama_b_86677.html 
 
 
Crossposted on Obama '08?:

Just got back from the Michelle Obama rally!

SO fun.

It was a similar crowd to when I saw Barack Obama last October. In fact, I recognized some of the same people. One of them was a staff member who I've seen several times in the NYT. She was in a video about how the SC campaign was doing a barbershop/ beauty shop tour very early on (probably a full year or so ago) and then also was just on the front page a couple of days ago, as one of several people in the audience at, again, a SC event. She saw me looking at her so I went up and said the above -- that I remember her from the October event and that I keep seeing her in the NYT. She smiled and then introduced herself -- "Hi, I'm [didn't catch]." I introduced myself in turn and then said "Keep up the great work!" and then moved on.

After I was already in the main room for the event I realized that I think she said "Hi, I'm Ashley." Wonder if she's THE Ashley?? ("I'm here because of Ashley." Which speech was that?) I looked for her afterwards but didn't see her again. Will try to figure it out later.

Anyway... I'd been trying to set up an interpreter but I didn't find out about this until very recently and there were a few levels to get an interpreter. I asked a volunteer whether the interpreter happened, he didn't know but said he'd go check. Then he said no, there wasn't, but that he could get me to the very front so I had a hope of lipreading. (The room [a very big one] was already very full at this point -- no chairs, just people standing.)

So he led me to some VIP area, with chairs, about 20 feet from the podium. Awesome.

The VIP area was a cool collection of people. There were a lot of very well-dressed black people (as I mentioned in my account of the October rally -- not just dressed up like for a business meeting or something, but opera-worthy ensembles), some local politicians I recognized, a Sudanese woman in full veil etc., and a bunch of other people.

I especially liked the self-proclaimed "bouncer" who was guarding the corner of the rope separating people from the podium area. She was about 4' 8" and grandmotherly, with a hand-made (she informed us) sweatshirt with an Ohio "O" and "Yes we can!" underneath it.

After I was settled in, an apologetic-looking staffer came up and asked for my name and number so that they could be sure to get an interpreter for next time Barack comes to town. This includes letting me know personally the details of his visit as soon as they find out. Excellent! (I accidentally kept the guy's pen and found him afterwards to give it back, he reiterated that they'll make absolutely sure everything's taken care of next time, so nice!)

Then right on time, Mayor Coleman and his wife came out to introduce Michelle. Looked like a nice speech but it was hard to understand.

Then Michelle! Definitely one of those people who look even better in person than in pictures though she was eminently recognizable. She started right out with a tentative "O H...?" (body language was a purposeful "uh, am I doing this right?" for comic effect) and got a rousing "I O!!" in response. She did a few more, picking up in volume each time, then laughed at herself and got down to business.

Great speech. I didn't catch all of it and sure hope that there will be a transcript somewhere. I also caught sections but because of how it works when I lipread for a long time haven't retained it. (I remember committing to memory the fact that "comeback" was a big applause line but I don't remember context.) At one point Mayor Coleman had to wipe tears from both eyes, and an older, very dignified black lady in front of me -- who Michelle made frequent eye contact with -- wiped her eyes a few minutes later. I don't have a firm grip on what that was about.

Michelle is so natural. She's really, really good at just starting to talk, connecting with the crowd, going this way and that but speaking clearly and in a way that got people fired up. No teleprompter, no notecards. I saw her play off the people around me a few times -- a head would start nodding and she'd look at that person and build on the point until the whole room was applauding.

She kept talking about how the bar has been raised -- it was about how much more complicated things are, how you can do everything right but still not be able to keep your head above water. Every time she came back to that point she made the exact same gesture with her left hand. She was generally very easy to understand, very expressive with both her hands and her face. Very Midwestern phrasings and accent as far as I could tell.

Another refrain was "Barack gets it."

Anyway, she obviously did a great job, both from what I saw and from the reactions of the crowd.

After the speech she did the hand-shaking rounds -- I got to shake her hand, and I said "You're better than Bill..." ;-) At first she was kind of uh-huh then got it and gave me a big crinkly-nosed grin. I turned to go but it wasn't so easy, lots of people trying to press towards her. A bunch were thrusting things at her to autograph and I realized that the New Yorker I'd brought to read if it was a long wait was eminently autographable -- the Obama-and-Hillary-as-Eustace-Tilley cover -- so I thrust that over too and got her autograph on it. Yay!

Very fun.
 
 
Hey, here's a picture of the bar:

 

 http://blog.cleveland.com/openers/2008/02/michelle_obama_predicts_ohio_w.html 
 
 
the bar?
 
 
 
She kept talking about how the bar has been raised -- it was about how much more complicated things are, how you can do everything right but still not be able to keep your head above water. Every time she came back to that point she made the exact same gesture with her left hand. She was generally very easy to understand, very expressive with both her hands and her face. Very Midwestern phrasings and accent as far as I could tell.
 

(The photo is from the rally today.)
 
 
Want to grab this, on Obama's substance -- lots of links within.

 http://andrewsullivan.theatlantic.com/the_daily_dish/2008/02/obama-and-subst.html 

This from Hilzoy in 2006:

 
...my little data point is: while Obama has not proposed his Cosmic Plan for World Peace, he has proposed a lot of interesting legislation on important but undercovered topics. I can't remember another freshman Senator who so routinely pops up when I'm doing research on some non-sexy but important topic, and pops up because he has proposed something genuinely good. Since I think that American politics doesn't do nearly enough to reward people who take a patient, craftsmanlike attitude towards legislation, caring as much about fixing the parts that no one will notice until they go wrong as about the flashy parts, I wanted to say this.
 
 
 
Milwaukee Journal Sentinel and Houston Chronicle endorse Obama:

 http://www.swamppolitics.com/news/politics/blog/2008/02/barack_obama_endorsed_by_milwa.html 
 
 
'K.
 
 
Read this paper today:

 

(Local Columbus paper.)

Pretty discouraging reading.

 
 

 http://www.theotherpaper.com/top2-14/coverstory.htm 

I find the Redfern stuff especially annoying, for obvious reasons presumably. (Gonna write to him.)

The last paragraph is annoying too, though -- Obama has actually done quite well in rural areas. And they're conflating several different demographics there.

Then there was an interview with Bill Bradley -- this one isn't online (or at least I couldn't find it):

 
"I divide politicians into two categories," he [Bradley] said. "One is a politician who knows a lot of small things and then a politician who knows one big thing."

Obama, he said, is in the second category.
 

Bradley was trying to help and does say more helpful things elsewhere, but the upshot is again the wonk vs. the inspirer, and wonk is safer. Even though Obama is a wonk, too!

Anyway, if I didn't know much about Obama before reading this issue I wouldn't be very impressed with him after reading it. As a snapshot of what the chances are of a win in Ohio, not very encouraging. But we'll see.
 
 
('K?)
 
 
Groupies eh? What can anybody say?

At least it's authentic.
 
 
Loved your recounting of the Michelle Obama event. I'll post a link to a transcript for you if I find one.

Good luck on the job app at Obamahio HQ! It probably won't count for much, but, I'd be willing to write a letter or be a reference for you if it will help.
 
 
Thanks Butrflynet!

This is cool:

 http://www.cnn.com/ELECTION/2008/map/ 
 
 
I'm really worried that Edwards is going to endorse Clinton!

 http://thecaucus.blogs.nytimes.com/2008/02/17/obama-and-edwards-meet/ 
 
 
Sullivan's on vacation, hilzoy's a guest blogger on the Daily Dish, yay! (The more I read of her, the more I like her.)

 
Competence

From the Washington Post (emphasis added, and stolen from publius):

Supporters of Sen. Hillary Rodham Clinton are worried that convoluted delegate rules in Texas could water down the impact of strong support for her among Hispanic voters there, creating a new obstacle for her in the must-win presidential primary contest. Several top Clinton strategists and fundraisers became alarmed after [b]learning[/b] of the state's unusual provisions during a closed-door strategy meeting [b]this month[/b], according to one person who attended. What Clinton aides [b]discovered[/b] is that in certain targeted districts, such as Democratic state Sen. Juan Hinojosa's heavily Hispanic Senate district in the Rio Grande Valley, Clinton could win an overwhelming majority of votes but gain only a small edge in delegates. At the same time, a win in the more urban districts in Dallas and Houston -- where Sen. Barack Obama expects to receive significant support -- could yield three or four times as many delegates. "What it means is, she could win the popular vote and still lose the race for delegates," Hinojosa said yesterday. "This system does not necessarily represent the opinions of the population, and that is a serious problem."

When I read this, I dissolved in giggles after the first sentence. It was that part about the Texas delegate selection rules "creating a new obstacle for her" that got me. In what sense are the Texas rules a "new obstacle?" Were they only recently passed? Not as far as I can tell -- here, for instance, is a pdf about them from August 2007, which should have given the Clinton campaign ample time to get up to speed. While I was having fun thinking of possible analogies -- would I describe the existence of the Pacific Ocean as "creating a new obstacle" for my plan to walk from Baltimore to Beijing? or the fact that five is a prime number as "creating a new obstacle" to my proving that it is a multiple of two? --my co-blogger publius was actually writing the post I might have written, only funnier:

Good lord, let's see if I have this right. The Clinton campaign decides to cede every post-Super Tuesday state to Obama under the theory that Texas and Ohio will be strong firewalls. After - after - implementing this Rudy-esque strategy, they "discovered" that the archaic Texas rules will almost certainly result in a split delegate count (at best). While they were busy "discovering" the rules, however, the Obama campaign had people on the ground in Texas explaining the system, organizing precincts, and making Powerpoints. I know because I went to one of these meetings a week ago. I should have invited Mark Penn I suppose. (ed. Maybe foresight is an obsolete macrotrend.)

Note to self: If I ever run for office and base my campaign on the idea that I am ready to lead from day one, I must remember to actually run an effective campaign.
 

 http://andrewsullivan.theatlantic.com/the_daily_dish/2008/02/competence.html 

(Emphasis in original.) (Many links in original.)
 
 
Found the Michelle speech in Columbus on YouTube -- just 4 minutes of it but gives you a flavor:

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=jscnylbyE9c 

(I'm not in the video, though I recognize some of the people.)
 
 
Michelle was on Larry King afew nights ago. I just caught a few minutes of the rerun last night. Here it is on YouTube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=pyBc33UjvDU 
 
 
Competence, again:

 
Pennsylvania Governor Ed Rendell ordered a special extension of the deadline to help Hillary Clinton have the time she needed to put together a full slate of delegates for th state, but despite that she still fell short by about ten people. Marc Ambinder calls it "more evidence that the Clinton campaign simply did not envision a delegate hunt until it was much too late." But why didn't they plan for this? Sam Boyd, an unusually bright college student, figured it out so one would think an entire campaign full of veteran political professionals might have noticed what was happening.
 

 http://matthewyglesias.theatlantic.com/archives/2008/02/the_competence_campaign.php 

Links in original.
 
 
Lots of discussion of this article by Roger Simon, "Clinton targets pledged delegates":

 http://dyn.politico.com/printstory.cfm?uuid=2EC0F60E-3048-5C12-00410E5BC5CFBB24 

Beginning:

 
Hillary Clinton's presidential campaign intends to go after delegates whom Barack Obama has already won in the caucuses and primaries if she needs them to win the nomination.

This strategy was confirmed to me by a high-ranking Clinton official on Monday. And I am not talking about superdelegates, those 795 party big shots who are not pledged to anybody. I am talking about getting pledged delegates to switch sides.

What? Isn't that impossible? A pledged delegate is pledged to a particular candidate and cannot switch, right?

Wrong.
 
 
 
 
Lots of discussion of this article by Roger Simon, "Clinton targets pledged delegates":

 http://dyn.politico.com/printstory.cfm?uuid=2EC0F60E-3048-5C12-00410E5BC5CFBB24 
 

I was stunned by this story, but apparently the Clinton camp has now  adamantly denied it .
 
 
Thanks! Yeah, just saw Wolfson's statement on the Swamp. Definitely interested in where this will go.
 
 
Fab post from hilzoy on why she's voting for Obama -- long, and with a gazillion links.

 http://obsidianwings.blogs.com/obsidian_wings/2008/02/obama-actually.html 

Not new, but she refers back to it in this post, which I also like (no surprise I'm sure!):

 http://andrewsullivan.theatlantic.com/the_daily_dish/2008/02/no-surprises.html 

 
As I see it, there are good reasons for Democrats to vote for Obama, and good reasons to vote for Clinton. Personally, I think that there are more good reasons to vote for Obama, but that reasonable people can differ on this score. But there is one argument in favor of Clinton that I've seen around lately, and that I think does not hold water: that the Republicans have already thrown everything they have at Clinton, and so we already know what's out there and what effect it's likely to have. Or, as Clinton herself put it:

"I've been tested. I've been vetted. I have been in the political arena in our country very intensely for 16 years. There are no surprises."

I have no particular reason to think that there are any surprises out there. But I also don't think there is any good reason to think that there aren't. In particular, the fact that the Republicans threw everything they had at the Clintons while Bill Clinton was President would only imply that there was nothing left for them to throw if we assume that no new dirt has come into existence since 2000.

In thinking about this, it might help to read this NYT story, about Bill Clinton helping a mining company get a contract in Kazakhstan, after which the head of the mining company gave $31.3 million to Clinton's charitable foundation, and pledged $100 million more. Alternately, one might peruse TNR's list of Clinton's shadiest donors, and reflect on Clinton's failure to make her tax returns public. One might also ask oneself: if the Republicans knew about some scandal that had developed since 2000, would they be more likely to use it during one of Clinton's Senate campaigns, when she was virtually certain to win regardless of what they came up with, or to hold it in reserve in case she ran for President?

Again: I absolutely do not want to suggest that there is any actual dirt on the Clintons for the Republicans to dig up. Nor am I trying to argue against voting for Clinton. As I said above, I think there are good reasons to vote for her. I just don't think that this is one of them.
 

(Links in original.)
 
 
A find from Patrick Appel, circa 2004:

 
"It's a science to know where to look, what to look for, and how to look for it," David Bossie told me recently. Bossie, who was forced off the Burton Committee for being too aggressive, is now the president of the conservative organization Citizens United and an independent researcher, though no less committed to the cause. When I visited his Capitol Hill townhouse not long ago, he was surrounded by stacks of Kerry files, busily scrutinizing Kerry contributors' business dealings for a forthcoming book.

Kerry was clearly not Bossie's first choice of nominee. In his basement he proudly showed me dozens, perhaps hundreds, of boxes marked "HILLARY: WHITEWATER" or "HILLARY: TRAVELGATE." He called them the "Sierra Madre of Hillary oppo," regretfully adding that what could have been "ready to roll in twenty-four hours" will now have to wait until 2008.
 

 http://www.theatlantic.com/doc/200406/green 
 
 
Re: superdelegates and momentum, I thought this factoid was interesting:

 
NOTE: This is one more [superdelegate] for Obama than the last update. The addition comes because of the endorsement of Obama today by DNC Member Carol Ann Campbell (D-PA), a former Philadelphia City Councilwoman. This brings Obama's post-Feb. 5 superdelegate count to 15 to minus-3 for Clinton.
 

 http://firstread.msnbc.msn.com/archive/2008/02/19/681727.aspx 
 
 
Soz,

 http://demconwatch.blogspot.com/ 

These guys seem on top of it.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
Yep, I like that site. (Swimpy pointed me to it first I think.) I was emphasizing the part about how Obama has gotten 15 delegates after super Tuesday (as of that writing) while Hillary has lost 3. Seems telling, momentum-wise. Hillary racked up most of her superdelegates early on, when she was the safe choice.

Meanwhile, came here to post this comment from Marc Ambinder's post about the Teamsters endorsing Obama:

 
I'm reminded of an episode of the Simpsons where Homer is chasing a roasted pig improbably rendered airborne, all the time saying "It's still good! It's still good!" as the pig makes one narrow miss after another. I believe Homer finally gives up after the pig, at long last, lands in a reservoir.

In fact, the whole Clinton campaign kind of reminds me of that.
 
 
 
Congrats, guys! Impressive.
 
 
Some window-closing plonks.

hilzoy kicks butt again:

 http://andrewsullivan.theatlantic.com/the_daily_dish/2008/02/dear-chris-matt.html 

End of it:

 
I did this because I had heard one too many people like Chris Matthews talking about Obama's alleged lack of substance, and I thought: I know that's not true, since I have read about Obama's work on non-proliferation, avian flu, and a few other issues. And if people are saying he lacks substance, then surely I, as a citizen, should try to find out whether I just hallucinated all this interesting legislation, or whether this talking point was, in fact, completely wrong. So I sat down with Google and Thomas and tried to find out.

But I'm just an amateur. I have a full-time job doing something else. Chris Matthews, by contrast, is paid large sums of money to provide political commentary and insight. I assume he has research assistants at his disposal. He could have done this work a lot more easily than I did. But he didn't. He was more interested in gotcha moments than in actually enlightening the American people.

So here's a challenge for Chris Matthews, or anyone else in the media who wants to take it up. Go over Clinton and Obama's actual legislative records. Find the genuine legislative accomplishments that each has to his or her name. Report to the American people on what you find. Until you do, don't accept statements from either side about who has substance and who does not, or who traffics in "speeches" and who offers "solutions". That's lazy, unprofessional, and a disservice to your audience.

Do your jobs. Don't leave it to bloggers like me to do it for you.
 

(Tons of links and info in original, many of the links already be-linked here though.)

Jake Tapper on Hillary's alleged "facts":

 http://blogs.abcnews.com/politicalpunch/2008/02/clinton-campa-2.html 

Saw various accounts of an apparently impressive conference call featuring Susan Rice, Obama foreign policy advisor, will plonk this one by Matt Yglesias:

 http://matthewyglesias.theatlantic.com/archives/2008/02/conference_calling_on_mccain.php 
 
 
A pro-Hillary 527 is iffy, rules-wise:

 http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2008/02/20/AR2008022002950.html?nav%3Dhcmodule&sub=AR 

 
Though the independent ads could help bring greater parity on television for the Clinton campaign in Texas and Ohio, where they are set to air, they may carry a steep price for the entity behind them. Such a group faces tight federal restrictions on how it can operate and what it can say in advertising. A 527 cannot have as its primary purpose the election of a candidate, and the law limits it to running ads about issues, not ones that plainly advocate for Clinton's election or defeat. The group cannot have any contact with the Clinton campaign. Violations could subject organizers and donors to stiff fines.

Campaign finance reform experts said there are troubling aspects in the American Leadership Project's mission. The group is not part of an established effort to exert political influence in Washington, and it first officially surfaced in filings with the Internal Revenue Service on Feb. 15. It is advertising only in states where Clinton faces competitive primary contests. And the content of its first ad strongly hints that its purpose is to support her candidacy and oppose Obama's.

"This pop-up 527 group clearly has been created to spend unlimited soft money to influence the presidential election," said Fred Wertheimer, of the group Democracy 21, after reviewing the ad. "As far as the duck test goes: It looks like a campaign ad; it sounds like a campaign ad; it's a campaign ad."
 
 
 
Hillary's Texas ground game is evidently in trouble:

 http://www.huffingtonpost.com/mayhill-fowler/clintons-texas-ground-ga_b_87723.html 

Beginning:

 
Although the Clinton Campaign has been telling the press that they have the ground operations to pull off a win in Texas, those ground operations have not been in evidence when I've traveled to small towns to see how Bill Clinton is doing on the Texas stump. Wednesday evening in Victoria, down in the southeastern part of the state, incipient chaos threatened to overwhelm the "Early Vote" Rally precisely because there was no ground operation. The well-oiled, beautifully constructed state-level HRC campaign machine, focused and determined in Iowa, Nevada and California, is beginning to break down.

"It's a clusterfuck! Just a clusterfuck!" the Corpus Christi producer for a local news affiliate shouts into his cell phone. He's telling his boss that there will be no coverage of Bill Clinton's visit to Victoria for the 6 o'clock news. "Who's running this campaign anyway?" the producer asks, of no one in particular. "And now five hundred people have stomped away mad." He shakes his head. At that moment, twenty well-dressed elderly and middle-aged dignitaries and politicians exit the back of the local arts center and walk slowly for the intersection of Goodwin and Main. Presumably, they are Hillary Clinton supporters; however, given their dazed faces, they look more like commissars who have been turned out by the NKVD and cannot believe how suddenly their fortunes have changed.
 
 
 
 
Hillary's Texas ground game is evidently in trouble:

 http://www.huffingtonpost.com/mayhill-fowler/clintons-texas-ground-ga_b_87723.html 

Beginning:

 
Although the Clinton Campaign has been telling the press that they have the ground operations to pull off a win in Texas, those ground operations have not been in evidence when I've traveled to small towns to see how Bill Clinton is doing on the Texas stump. Wednesday evening in Victoria, down in the southeastern part of the state, incipient chaos threatened to overwhelm the "Early Vote" Rally precisely because there was no ground operation. The well-oiled, beautifully constructed state-level HRC campaign machine, focused and determined in Iowa, Nevada and California, is beginning to break down.

"It's a clusterfuck! Just a clusterfuck!" the Corpus Christi producer for a local news affiliate shouts into his cell phone. He's telling his boss that there will be no coverage of Bill Clinton's visit to Victoria for the 6 o'clock news. "Who's running this campaign anyway?" the producer asks, of no one in particular. "And now five hundred people have stomped away mad." He shakes his head. At that moment, twenty well-dressed elderly and middle-aged dignitaries and politicians exit the back of the local arts center and walk slowly for the intersection of Goodwin and Main. Presumably, they are Hillary Clinton supporters; however, given their dazed faces, they look more like commissars who have been turned out by the NKVD and cannot believe how suddenly their fortunes have changed.
 

 

Snap, what an article!!!

Cycloptichorn
 
 
Hey Soz,

Here's a link to the debate transcript if you need it.

 http://www.cnn.com/2008/POLITICS/02/21/debate.transcript/index.html 
 
 
Thanks much, Butrflynet!
 
 
It's been a running joke on several blogs I read how the Clinton campaign spins various races that she is about to lose or has already lost as "not counting." This one's a bit of a gobsmacker:

 
"I'd love to carry Texas, but it's usually not in the electoral calculation for the Democratic nominee. Florida and Michigan are,"  Hillary Clinton , laying the groundwork for why Texas doesn't count.
 

 http://andrewsullivan.theatlantic.com/the_daily_dish/2008/02/quote-for-th-10.html 
(Patrick Appel, AS is still on vacation, how dare he!)
 
 
Good overview of the McCain/ FEC situation, which I've had a hard time wrapping my head around (I think I get it and then try to explain it to someone else and find myself stuttering):

 http://tpmmuckraker.talkingpointsmemo.com/2008/02/mccains_fec_problem.php 
 
 
 
It's been a running joke on several blogs I read how the Clinton campaign spins various races that she is about to lose or has already lost as "not counting." This one's a bit of a gobsmacker:

 
"I'd love to carry Texas, but it's usually not in the electoral calculation for the Democratic nominee. Florida and Michigan are,"  Hillary Clinton , laying the groundwork for why Texas doesn't count.
 

 http://andrewsullivan.theatlantic.com/the_daily_dish/2008/02/quote-for-th-10.html 
(Patrick Appel, AS is still on vacation, how dare he!)
 

lmao Texas doesn't matter now? I guess "not in the electoral calculation" could be right... if you ignore that whoever won the TX Dem Primary has been the party's nominee for Pres. every election since at least 1984 that is.

FL, with 210 delegates, and MI, with 157 delegates (assuming they counted!) matter but the 228 delegates from TX don't? Please!  
 
 
Yep...

This is plonkish, the kind of thing that may come up at some point and I'd want the rebuttal at hand. Saw this yesterday:

"Warner to Obama: Bring Me Your Captain"
 http://thecaucus.blogs.nytimes.com/2008/02/22/warner-to-obama-bring-me-your-captain/ 

It's about the Army captain Obama quoted in the debate. People were skeptical. Captain was unearthed, and confirmed the story. Conclusion:

 
 

hilzoy has a thorough blog on this (though it doesn't include the above), which I wanted to grab:

 http://andrewsullivan.theatlantic.com/the_daily_dish/2008/02/honor.html 
 
 
 
Attorney and Barack Obama supporter Subodh Chandra has filed a complaint with the Federal Elections Commissions against a new special interest group that plans to promote Hillary Clinton in the Buckeye State.

Chandra charges that the group, the American Leadership Project, is violating campaign finance and reporting laws because it plans to exclusively run "sham issue ads" promoting Clinton, violating elections law that prohibits independent groups from directly promoting a candidate.

The California-based group, made up of a handful of consultants and ad makers, has said it does not violate the law will comply with FEC reporting requirements.

Chandra, citing the looming March 4 primary, has asked FEC to investigate immediately.
 

 http://blog.cleveland.com/openers/2008/02/complaint_filed_against_procli.html 
 
 
This is interesting -- laying out the Clinton campaign stumbles:

 http://seattletimes.nwsource.com/html/politics/2004196837_clinton23.html 

This is the crux of it:

 
"There was never any concept of how South Carolina should be addressed in terms of identifying voters and getting them out. The skill set of people in the Clinton campaign was pretty low, and there was no central guidance or direction. They had plenty of resources; money wasn't a problem. They just didn't execute."
 

As I've said before, I think some extrapolation is fair. One more that made me think in those terms ("How would it translate to a presidency?"):

 
"It does seem odd to have someone at the top of the organization who has no campaign experience," one strategist said. "Bill Clinton had people who had run campaigns. Patti and Maggie were there by virtue of their personal loyalty, not their campaign experience."
 
 
 
It's impossible to know of course (I'd love to see some sort of poll of the audience), but I really think the Clinton campaign is misreading the standing ovation at the debate. Among other things, there was obviously a large pro-Obama crowd, given the booing for Clinton's "Xerox" comment and the applause for Obama at many points. Yet as far as I can tell, everyone was standing and applauding at the end. Why would these Obama supporters be applauding? It really seems to me like there was a response to the valedictory/ concession aspect of it, even if that's not what Hillary intended. That she was "honored, absolutely honored" to be on stage with him, and that "no matter what happens, we're going to be fine." And I'm not the only one who took it that way, to the point where she had to give an official denial on Friday that those words amounted to a concession.

At any rate, the Clinton campaign is taking sections out of that last part of the debate for a campaign ad because they seem to think that those are the sections that got the big response. More details (about the ad and background) here:

 http://thecaucus.blogs.nytimes.com/2008/02/23/the-moment-interrupted/#more-4334 
 
 
I've seen links to this a few places and I think one of them might have been here on A2K so apologies if I'm being repetitive. There is one quote in here particularly that I want to be able to come back to though. (Article is generally about the mood within the Clinton campaign plus some pre-postmortem):

 http://www.nytimes.com/2008/02/24/us/politics/24mood.html 
 
 
 http://www.nytimes.com/2008/02/23/nyregion/23owe.html?_r=1&ref=politics&oref=slogin 

 
Mr. Semetis catered a Clinton event, a rally she did not attend, at the offices of District Council 37, the public employees' union, on Dec. 15, charging the campaign $2,300, plus $192.63 in tax. Officials promised him that his business, Sale & Pepe Fine Foods, would be paid by check or credit card in a couple of weeks. After a few weeks passed, he started calling to see about the holdup.

...

Mr. Semetis, however, is not the only one who has been having trouble lately collecting money from the Clinton campaign. The Hotel Ottumwa, a family-owned hotel in Ottumwa, Iowa, played host to an event attended by former President Bill Clinton on New Year's Eve for several hundred people and had been trying for almost a month and a half to get paid.

The hotel had initially asked for payment of the $9,125 bill up front but kept being put off. But the owners figured that if any political campaign was good for it, Mrs. Clinton's would be.

"People were a little more comfortable with Clinton because they've got money," said Kay Whittington, one of the hotel owners.

Last week, the owners heard about an item on the local news about a Des Moines cleaning company, Top Job Services Cleaning, which had been trying unsuccessfully to recoup $7,500 from the Clinton campaign.

 

The small business vendors were finally paid after they took their story to the local news and it spread across the media.

I wonder why it took so long for Clinton's people to give up a catered party and work the night shift to ensure these small business people finally got paid.
 
 
Thought I'd dump some funny comments here.. The Plank, or The Stump, I dont remember, posted this news tidbit:

 
Legitimately Huge Turnout in Hawaii

As previously noted, Hawaii caucus turnout has never been above 5,000. The Obama camp's pie-in-the-sky prediction was 18,000.

Final tally? 37,247.
 

A poster called Rhubarbs commented:

 
Yeah, but this just goes to show that Obama only wins in states that hold contested elections. Sure, he wins big in caucus states, he wins big in primary states, he wins big when turnout is low, and he wins big with record-high turnout. But what the Obama-worshipping media is overlooking is that in each of the 25 state contests Obama has won so far, his name appeared on the ballot. It's time to stop giving Obama a pass on this critical issue.

Remember, if Hillary Clinton wins the Democratic nomination, Barack Obama's name will not be on the ballot in November. And only Hillary Clinton has demonstrated that she can win when Obama's name is not on the ballot. In fact, she's undefeated in contests where Obama is not on the ballot, making her clearly the more electable general-election candidate.
 
 
 
The Plank recently posted this item:

 
Wins, Not Spins

Jason's post points to what I think is an underlying irony of the whole "work, not words" narrative that Hillary Clinton is trying to impose on her campaign--namely, that Obama seems to have steadily outworked her on the ground (especially in the post-Super-Tuesday states), while her campaign has devoted an awful lot of its energies to a series of (not very successful) spins: that first Super Tuesday and now March 4 would be "decisive"; that she could win by taking superdelegates, or flipping pledged delegates, or getting Michigan and Florida delegates seated; that red states and small states and states where black people live and states that hold caucuses or open primaries are "second-class" or "insignificant" and shouldn't really count. And on and on.

There's definitely a campaign in this race that seems more about doing the hard work than merely talking a good line. It's just not Clinton's.

--Christopher Orr
 

Commenter kgrant1054 responded:

 
The Obama campaign management success should become a part of the story, a part of the narrative of the campaign itself. How can Hillary continue to beat on Obama's lack of experience and preparedness when he has now thrashed her in 10 straight contests? How can she make the argument when the proof is against her?

He simply has produced a better managed campaign, with deeper organization, better tactics, and a good sense of timing. Are these not the very qualities that we should look for in a President? Is this not far more revealing than Obama's messy desk?
 

To which rhubarbs, again, replied:

 
Hey, now, kgrant, Hillary will be ready from Day One. She never promised to be ready to lead or manage _before_ Day One. So the fact that she's running a shambling, decomposing zombie of a campaign in no way undermines her candidacy or her argument -- nor does it have any bearing on her attacks on Obama's flimsy executive chops. Sure, he's a good chief executive now. But this isn't Day One. This is Day One-Minus-Three-Hundred-Thirty-Six.
 

Heh :wink:
 
 
Dang funny stuff
 
 
Frank Rich synthesizes all of this into one humdinger of an Op-Ed today. I think I'll be quoting from a lot of it.

"The Audacity of Hopelessness"
 http://www.nytimes.com/2008/02/24/opinion/24rich.html?hp 

So much to choose from. I'll start with this:

 
The Clinton camp was certain that its moneyed arsenal of political shock-and-awe would take out Barack Hussein Obama in a flash. The race would "be over by Feb. 5," Mrs. Clinton assured George Stephanopoulos just before New Year's. But once the Obama forces outwitted her, leaving her mission unaccomplished on Super Tuesday, there was no contingency plan. She had neither the boots on the ground nor the money to recoup.

That's why she has been losing battle after battle by double digits in every corner of the country ever since. And no matter how much bad stuff happened, she kept to the Bush playbook, stubbornly clinging to her own Rumsfeld, her chief strategist, Mark Penn. Like his prototype, Mr. Penn is bigger on loyalty and arrogance than strategic brilliance.

[...]

Clinton fans don't see their standard-bearer's troubles this way. In their view, their highly substantive candidate was unfairly undone by a lightweight showboat who got a free ride from an often misogynist press and from naïve young people who lap up messianic language as if it were Jim Jones's Kool-Aid. Or as Mrs. Clinton frames it, Senator Obama is all about empty words while she is all about action and hard work.

But it's the Clinton strategists, not the Obama voters, who drank the Kool-Aid. The Obama campaign is not a vaporous cult; it's a lean and mean political machine that gets the job done. The Clinton camp has been the slacker in this race, more words than action, and its candidate's message, for all its purported high-mindedness, was and is self-immolating.
 

 
 

Ooh, I keep wanting to add. Will leave it there for now, and expect to come back to it.

I've been really impressed with Rich's last several Sunday Op-Eds, but this one takes the cake.
 
 
If I quoted just one paragraph it'd be this one:

 
But it's the Clinton strategists, not the Obama voters, who drank the Kool-Aid. The Obama campaign is not a vaporous cult; it's a lean and mean political machine that gets the job done. The Clinton camp has been the slacker in this race, more words than action, and its candidate's message, for all its purported high-mindedness, was and is self-immolating.
 

A little long for a sig line.
 
 
Jonathan Alter: "Hillary Should Get Out Now"

 http://www.newsweek.com/id/114725 

Excerpts:

 
 

 
But in her beautiful closing answer in the Austin debate, I glimpsed a different, more genuine, almost valedictory Hillary Clinton. She talked about the real suffering of Americans and, echoing John Edwards, said, "Whatever happens, we'll be fine." She described what "an honor" it was to be in a campaign with Barack Obama, and seemed to mean it. The choice before her is to go down ugly with a serious risk of humiliation at the polls, or to go down classy, with a real chance of redemption. Why not the latter? Besides, it would wreck the spring of all her critics in the press. If she thinks of it that way, maybe it's not such an outlandish idea after all.
 
 
 
Andrew Sullivan on McCain declaring victory in Iraq:

 http://andrewsullivan.theatlantic.com/the_daily_dish/2008/02/mccain-the-war.html 
 
 
 http://tpmcafe.talkingpointsmemo.com/talk/2008/02/open-letter-to-hillary-and-her.php 
 
 
Thanks for pointing to that one, Butrflynet. I'd say "amen" but it seems dangerous... ;-)

This is a plonk, one I've wanted to come back to before:

 http://www.nytimes.com/2007/11/04/magazine/04obama-t.html 

It's an (old) article from the NYT magazine about Obama and foreign policy; who's supporting him and why.
 
 
Got any questions I (actually mumpad) can put to the American ambassador to Australia?
 
 
Tempting! Let me think on it. (I'm a girl so my most pressing question is WHAT IS SHE GOING TO WEAR?! ;-))
 
 
Sozobe, have you seen this story and video yet? It is absolutely incredible and sure shoots down Ferraro's opinion of low, disinterested voter turn out for primaries and caucuses....

 http://www.chron.com/disp/story.mpl/headline/metro/5552259.html 

 
 

Read more at the link and watch a video of the march here.

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xvDAiWWuvRg&eurl=http://www.dailykos.com/story/2008/2/24/225151/235/285/463485 
 
 
 http://www.tnr.com/politics/story.html?id=4d40a39e-8f57-4054-bd99-94bc9d19be1a 

Excerpts:

 
The New Republic

The Audacity of Data
by Noam Scheiber
Barack Obama's surprisingly non-ideological policy shop.
Post Date Wednesday, March 12, 2008

...

As it happens, Thaler is revered by the leading wonks on Barack Obama's presidential campaign. Though he has no formal role, Thaler presides as a kind of in-house intellectual guru, consulting regularly with Obama's top economic adviser, a fellow University of Chicago professor named Austan Goolsbee. "My main role has been to harass Austan, who has an office down the hall from mine, " Thaler recently told me. "I give him as much grief as possible." You can find subtle evidence of this influence across numerous Obama proposals. For example, one key behavioral finding is that people often fail to set aside money for retirement even when their employers offer generous 401(k) plans. If, on the other hand, you automatically enroll workers in 401(k)s but allow them to opt out, most stick with it. Obama's savings plan exploits this so-called "status quo" bias.

And, yet, it's not just the details of Obama's policies that suggest a behavioral approach. In some respects, the sensibility behind the behaviorist critique of economics is one shared by all the Obama wonks, whether they're domestic policy nerds or grizzled foreign policy hands. Despite Obama's reputation for grandiose rhetoric and utopian hope-mongering, the Obamanauts aren't radicals--far from it. They're pragmatists--people who, when an existing paradigm clashes with reality, opt to tweak that paradigm rather than replace it wholesale. As Thaler puts it, "Physics with friction is not as beautiful. But you need it to get rockets off the ground." It might as well be the motto for Obama's entire policy shop.

...
You'd be hard-pressed to find a political philosopher in Obama's inner wonk-dom. His is dominated by a group of first-rate economists, beginning with Goolsbee, one of the profession's most respected tax experts. A Harvard economist named Jeff Liebman has been influential in helping Obama think through budget and retirement issues; another, David Cutler, helped shape his views on health care. Goolsbee, in particular, is an almost unprecedented figure in Democratic politics: an academic economist with a top campaign position and the candidate's ear.

One major reason for these differences is the candidate himself. Cutler told me Obama is adamant about consulting bona fide experts. "The staff kept saying, 'What he wants to know is that he's really talking to experts in the field. When you go see him, you know, make it clear that you're an expert.'" When it comes to economics, it's very difficult to achieve expertise without an academic background. It's a field that prizes rigorous results, supported by reams of painstakingly sifted data.

...

For their part, the Obama wonks tend to be inductive--working piecemeal from a series of real-world observations. One typical Goolsbee brainchild is something called an automatic tax return. The idea is that, if you had no tax deductions or freelance income the previous year, the IRS would send you a tax return that was already filled out. As long as you accepted the government's accounting, you could just sign it and mail it back. Goolsbee estimates this small innovation could save hundreds of millions of man-hours spent filling out tax forms, and billions of dollars in tax-preparation fees.

...

Like their intellectual godfather Thaler, the Obama wonks aren't particularly interested in tearing down existing paradigms, just adjusting and extending them when they become outdated. (Thaler urges his students to master the same traditional, mathematical models their colleagues do if they want to be taken seriously.) For example, a central tenet of the economic thinking favored by Bill Clinton and his Treasury secretary, Robert Rubin, was that cutting the deficit lowers long-term interest rates, which in turn stimulates the economy. The Obamanauts are perfectly willing to accept the relationship between long-term rates and economic growth. But recent evidence suggests that low rates weren't quite as central to the success of the Clinton years as they appeared, and that investments in infrastructure and R&D might be as important as deficit reduction. Not surprisingly, Obama plans to focus less on the deficit than Clinton did.

...

The Clintonites were moderates, but they were also ideological. They explicitly rejected the liberalism of the 1970s and '80s. The Obamanauts are decidedly non-ideological. They occasionally reach out to progressive think tanks like the Economic Policy Institute, but they also come from a world-- academic economics--whose inhabitants generally lean right. (And economists at the University of Chicago lean righter than most.) As a result, they tend to be just as comfortable with ideological diversity as the candidate they advise. Just before the Iowa caucus, I saw Goolsbee approach New York Times columnist David Brooks in Des Moines and gush when the quirky conservative agreed to pose for a picture.

And yet, just because the Obamanauts are intellectually modest and relatively free of ideology, that doesn't mean their policy goals lack ambition. In many cases, the opposite is true. Obama's plan to reduce global warming involves an ambitious cap-and-trade arrangement that would lower carbon emissions 80 percent below 1990 levels by 2050. But cap-and-trade--in which the government limits the overall level of emissions and allows companies to buy and sell pollution permits--is itself a market-oriented approach. The companies most efficient at cutting emissions will sell permits to less efficient companies, achieving the desired reductions with minimal drag on the economy.
 

There is a whole lot more at the link...
 
 
 
 http://www.tnr.com/politics/story.html?id=4d40a39e-8f57-4054-bd99-94bc9d19be1a 

 

Nice link, thanks.
 
 
Just started reading it -- there was an article on Thaler's theories in the New Yorker recently, so that's familiar. Not surprised that Obama is a fan. I'm pausing to highlight this section, though:

 
Despite Obama's reputation for grandiose rhetoric and utopian hope-mongering, the Obamanauts aren't radicals--far from it. They're pragmatists--people who, when an existing paradigm clashes with reality, opt to tweak that paradigm rather than replace it wholesale. As Thaler puts it, "Physics with friction is not as beautiful. But you need it to get rockets off the ground." It might as well be the motto for Obama's entire policy shop.
 

Yep. This is what I've liked from the beginning, and what has been in evidence from "Dreams from my Father." This is very much in line with my own thinking.
 
 
And again, in a different way:

 
Think of the contrast here as the difference between science-fiction writers and engineers. Reich and Galston [Clinton guys] are the kinds of people who'd sketch out the idea for time travel in a moment of inspiration. Goolsbee et al. [Obama guys] could rig up the DeLorean that would actually get you back to 1955.
 

I heart engineers.
 
 
<waves at Ralph>
 
 
Just one more:

 
The second difference is that the Obama hands tend to feel less hemmed in by establishment opinion. As one Obama adviser puts it, "Democrats want to be just a little bit different from Republicans, but not so different that they get attacked for being weak." Like Hamilton, the Obamanauts generally reject this calculus--not because they favor some radical alternative, but because clinging to received foreign policy wisdom can preclude highly practical courses of action.
 

Music to my ears.

Really liked that one, thanks Butrflynet!

I did know about the Texas A & M thing but when I last clicked on it the server was down (too much traffic?), I'll try again.
 
 
 
Tempting! Let me think on it. (I'm a girl so my most pressing question is WHAT IS SHE GOING TO WEAR?! ;-))
 

I'm a man so... clothes I guess. Anything she wears will look fine. Really! she'll look great.
 
 
I'm sure she will. :-)

This is one to take with a grain of salt. A wowie graph though.

 http://thememlingindex.com/hillary_clinton_net_worth-wealth.html 
 
 
Ickes is just... icky. This is what set me off:

 
Ickes also "likened Barack Obama to George McGovern's 1972 failed candidacy Monday, telling a breakfast group of reporters that if there had been Democratic superdelegates that year, they might well have voted for someone else for fear McGovern couldn't win against Richard Nixon."
 

 http://firstread.msnbc.msn.com/archive/2008/02/26/701953.aspx 

Oh come ON. Obama is the one who is clearly doing better in polls vs. McCain. Hillary is the one who has boxes of oppo just waiting to be rolled out against her.
 
 
 
Thanks for pointing to that one, Butrflynet. I'd say "amen" but it seems dangerous... ;-)

This is a plonk, one I've wanted to come back to before:

 http://www.nytimes.com/2007/11/04/magazine/04obama-t.html 

It's an (old) article from the NYT magazine about Obama and foreign policy; who's supporting him and why.
 

This was an excellent read, the more so for the passing of time. My favorite bit:

 
Obama finally leaned back to nap, and I went across the aisle. I was telling Gibbs my theory that Americans might be looking for a president whose protection they can huddle under when Obama opened an eye. And as he resumed the conversation, the frustration of months of pedaling hard and getting nowhere began to show. He wanted to know what kind of experience Clinton supposedly had that he didn't, and what kind of crisis she was supposedly better suited to than he, and why "toughness" had become a stand-in for experience, and how Clinton could get credit for it when she failed to stand up to Bush on the Iraq vote. We batted all this around. Finally he said, "Ask Nye why Hillary's paint-by-the-numbers foreign policy makes her more qualified to handle a crisis when for most of our history our crises have come from using force when we shouldn't, not by failing to use force." I promised that I would.

And I did. Nye is writing a book about leadership, and he said he had learned that at moments of crisis a leader's key attribute was the "tacit knowledge," usually acquired from prior experience, that allows him (or her) to "shape the crisis by asking the right questions." I said that Obama wanted to know how Clinton had acquired this experience. "By osmosis of going through this," Nye said, though he conceded that he wasn't sure tacit knowledge could in fact be acquired osmotically. And he added that he had great respect for Obama. "It is," he said, "a 51-49 type of distinction."
 
 
 
Yep, I liked that too.

More info on McCain and the FEC/ public financing thing:

 http://tpmmuckraker.talkingpointsmemo.com/2008/02/todays_must_read_284.php 

(Lots of links within.)
 
 
A belated thanks for this TNR link, butrflynet -
 http://www.tnr.com/politics/story.html?id=4d40a39e-8f57-4054-bd99-94bc9d19be1a. 
 
 
 
It's been a running joke on several blogs I read how the Clinton campaign spins various races that she is about to lose or has already lost as "not counting." This one's a bit of a gobsmacker:

 
"I'd love to carry Texas, but it's usually not in the electoral calculation for the Democratic nominee. Florida and Michigan are,"  Hillary Clinton , laying the groundwork for why Texas doesn't count.
 

 http://andrewsullivan.theatlantic.com/the_daily_dish/2008/02/quote-for-th-10.html 
 

And now:

 
After weeks of finding reasons to discount every Obama victory, the Clinton campaign seems to be laying the groundwork to argue that Texas -- the state that they have been pointing to as more meaningful and representative than other states -- doesn't count, either. Why would they be discounting Texas? Oh, I don't know,  this  might have something to do with it.

Bill Clinton's argument is that Texas is unfair because it has a caucus in addition to a primary, and, as the Clintons have been arguing, caucuses are less democratic than primaries. It's certainly true, caucuses give disproportionate weight to well-organized party activists over ordinary voters. But you know what gives even more weight to well-organized party activists over ordinary voters than the caucus system? Superdelegates. And the Clintons obviously have no objection to that.

(h/t Mike.)

--Jonathan Chait
 

 http://blogs.tnr.com/tnr/blogs/the_plank/archive/2008/02/25/texas-doesn-t-count.aspx 

More links in original.
 
 
Ohio debate transcript

 http://select.nytimes.com/mem/tnt.html?tntget=2008/02/26/us/politics/26text-debate.html&tntemail1=y&_r=3&emc=tnt&pagewanted=all 
 
 
Ooooh, thanks, I was looking for that. Missed the debate but managed to find some video clips on MSNBC's site. He may have screwed up elsewhere, but in the clips I saw I thought he did very very well. One point in particularly about getting the American people to pay attention to their government I thought was excellent.
 
 
Found the part I was looking for, but then re-read it and realized that the whole answer was good -- one of his most effective, I think.

 
Well, I think what is absolutely true is, is that when Senator Clinton continually talks about her experience, she is including the eight years that she served as first lady, and you know, often says, you know, "Here's what I did."

"Here's what we did." "Here's what we accomplished" -- which is fine.

And I have not -- I have not in any way said that that experience is not relevant, and I don't begrudge her claiming that as experience. What I've said, and what I would continue to maintain, is you can't take credit for all the good things that happened but then, when it comes to issues like NAFTA, you say, well, I -- behind the scenes, I was disagreeing. That doesn't work. So you have to, I think, take both responsibility as well as credit.

Now there are several points that I think Senator Clinton made that I -- we need to discuss here. First of all, she talked about me objecting to caps on credit cards. Keep in mind, I objected to the entire bill -- a bill that Senator Clinton, in its previous version, in 2001 had voted for. And in one of the debates with you guys said, well, I voted for it, but I hoped it wouldn't pass -- which, as a general rule, doesn't work. If you don't want it to pass, you vote against it. (Laughter.)

You know, she mentioned that she is a fighter on health care. And look -- I do not in any way doubt that Senator Clinton genuinely wants to provide health care to all Americans.

What I have said is that the way she approached it back in '93, I think, was wrong in part because she had the view that what's required is simply to fight. And Senator Clinton ended up fighting not just the insurance companies and the drug companies, but also members of her own party. And as a consequence, there were a number of people, like Jim Cooper of Tennessee and Bill Bradley and Pat Moynihan, who were not included in the negotiations. And we had the potential of bringing people together to actually get something done.

I am absolutely clear that hope is not enough. And it is not going to be easy to pass health care. If it was, it would have already gotten done. It's not going to be easy to have a sensible energy policy in this country. ExxonMobil made $11 billion last quarter. They are not going to give up those profits easily.

But what I also believe is that the only way we are going to actually get this stuff done is, number one, we're going to have to mobilize and inspire the American people so that they're paying attention to what their government is doing. And that's what I've been doing in this campaign, and that's what I will do as president.

And there's nothing romantic or silly about that. If the American people are activated, that's how change is going to happen.

The second thing we've going to have to do is we're actually going to have to go after the special interests.

Senator Clinton in one of these speeches -- it may have been the same speech where you showed the clip -- said you can't just wave a magic wand and expect special interests to go away. That is absolutely true, but it doesn't help if you're taking millions of dollars in contributions from those special interests. They are less likely to go away.
 
 
 
Just got back from the rally!
 
 
 
Just got back from the rally!
 

AND????!?!?!

Tell us about it!

Cycloptichorn
 
 
(Wanted to get to a fresh, un-stretched page...)

OK so Obama was late. Quite late. Sozlet was extremely good -- I'd brought a magazine and she read happily and chatted with people. She'd made an Obama t-shirt and a lot of people commented on it and then chatted with her about why she supports Obama. (Yesterday E.G. asked her what she knew about him and she rattled off all this stuff and he said "how do you know that?" and she replied, "I read the paper...!") (She does, she's been reading the NYT lately, especially election stuff.)

Anyway, it dragged on, and on, and I pitied the poor interpreter who had gotten there really early. Flight delays or something, I didn't really catch what happened. I know he came here from Cleveland.

Then finally Eddie George (OSU Heisman Trophy winner) took the stage, then Mayor Coleman, then Obama!

Good speech. I know so much of it already. The interpreter was really struck by a lot of it as she was interpreting (yes, I think I convinced her to vote Obama when we were chatting before he showed up -- she had been leaning Hillary but was put off by how things have been going lately and was pretty easy to nudge off the fence). She'd give me little "whoa!" expressions in the applause pauses. There was some new stuff about McCain that was very good! "Pay attention, Senator McCain" is one thing I remember. I'll have to see if I can find it back.

We had prime seats (after some hassle -- there wasn't really a section per se as there had been at the previous Obama rally and at the Michelle Obama event), and we both got to say hi and shake hands with him when he made the rounds. He chatted with sozlet for a while -- loved her shirt. :-D I said that I'd seen him in October and things were a bit different these days! Big grin from him.

Sozlet wasn't really suitably impressed that he probably spent more time with her than any other single person in the several-thousand-strong audience. She seemed to think that was just to be expected. She was certainly happy about it though!
 
 
 
(Wanted to get to a fresh, un-stretched page...)

OK so Obama was late. Quite late. Sozlet was extremely good -- I'd brought a magazine and she read happily and chatted with people. She'd made an Obama t-shirt and a lot of people commented on it and then chatted with her about why she supports Obama. (Yesterday E.G. asked her what she knew about him and she rattled off all this stuff and he said "how do you know that?" and she replied, "I read the paper...!") (She does, she's been reading the NYT lately, especially election stuff.)

Anyway, it dragged on, and on, and I pitied the poor interpreter who had gotten there really early. Flight delays or something, I didn't really catch what happened. I know he came here from Cleveland.

Then finally Eddie George (OSU Heisman Trophy winner) took the stage, then Mayor Coleman, then Obama!

Good speech. I know so much of it already. The interpreter was really struck by a lot of it as she was interpreting (yes, I think I convinced her to vote Obama when we were chatting before he showed up -- she had been leaning Hillary but was put off by how things have been going lately and was pretty easy to nudge off the fence). She'd give me little "whoa!" expressions in the applause pauses. There was some new stuff about McCain that was very good! "Pay attention, Senator McCain" is one thing I remember. I'll have to see if I can find it back.

We had prime seats (after some hassle -- there wasn't really a section per se as there had been at the previous Obama rally and at the Michelle Obama event), and we both got to say hi and shake hands with him when he made the rounds. He chatted with sozlet for a while -- loved her shirt. :-D I said that I'd seen him in October and things were a bit different these days! Big grin from him.

Sozlet wasn't really suitably impressed that he probably spent more time with her than any other single person in the several-thousand-strong audience. She seemed to think that was just to be expected. She was certainly happy about it though!
 

Wow, awesome, a once in a lifetime opportunity. Wish I could have been there.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
Thanks for the details! I was looking forward to hearing how it went. Sounds like sozlet had a great time.
 
 
Pictures, this time!

Lousy pictures -- the industrial-strength lights were on the other side of the stage and it was hard to get a good shot. Plus sozlet's digital camera is a cheapie. But something!

This photo was actually taken last -- we sat down for a bit (after standing for about 3 hours!) before leaving. I include it to show where we were standing, though. See the big speakers in the foreground? Then the white fence to the left of that? That's where we were (right at the fence, with lots of people behind us).

 

Generic crowd photo, while we were waiting (haven't seen any estimates yet. Lotsa people though):

 

Obama mid-speech:

 

Obama starting to make his way towards us:

 

 

Didn't take any pics when he was right there -- preferred to talk to him. :-) Took a pic of sozlet right after he passed us though (that I won't post). Happy girl!
 
 
Found the McCain part (or at least some of it). The first line got a HUGE response:

 
"I've got some news for John McCain, that is there was no such thing Al Qaeda in Iraq until George Bush and John McCain decided to invade.

"I've got some news for John McCain. I've got some news for John McCain. He took us into a war, along with George Bush that should have never been authorized, never been waged. They took their eye off the people who were responsible for 9/11 and that would be Al Qaeda in Afghanistan, that is stronger now than at any time since 2001. I've been paying attention John McCain!

"John McCain may like to say that he wants to follow Osama bin Laden to the gates of Hell. But so far all he's done is follow George Bush into a misguided war in Iraq that's cost us thousands of lives and billions of dollars and that I intend to bring to an end so that we can actually start going after Al Qaeda in Afghanistan and in the hills of Pakistan, like we should have been doing in the first place. That's the news John McCain!

"I respect John McCain, but he's tied to the politics of the past; we're about the policies of the future. He's the party of yesterday. We want to be the party of tomorrow. That's why I'm running for President of the United States of America."
 

 http://firstread.msnbc.msn.com/archive/2008/02/27/709357.aspx 
 
 
 
we both got to say hi and shake hands with him when he made the rounds. He chatted with sozlet for a while -- loved her shirt. :-D I said that I'd seen him in October and things were a bit different these days! Big grin from him.

Sozlet wasn't really suitably impressed that he probably spent more time with her than any other single person in the several-thousand-strong audience. She seemed to think that was just to be expected. She was certainly happy about it though!
 

Aww! That's just great   Something she'll recount in many years from now!
 
 
This is cool (pledged delegate calculator):

 http://www.slate.com/id/2185278/ 
 
 
This is cool!

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=0fd-MVU4vtU 

(Not so much the video itself -- though it's fun! -- as much as what it represents.)
 
 
Viva Obama!

Cycloptichorn
 
 
 Here's  an account of the rally yesterday with video.

(We're not in it.)
 
 
A no-comment plonk for now:

 http://www.politico.com/news/stories/0208/8751_Page2.html 

(Ben Stein on all the apologizing to Obama that's happened over the course of the campaign; Shaheen, Cunningham, etc., etc.)
 
 
Note to the Sozlet:

Hey Sozlet! You are so lucky to have gone to the Obama rally with your mom. I hear you even got to meet Mr. Obama personally and you showed him the T-shirt you made.

Give us a report. How was the rally? Did you have to wait very long? What did Mr. Obama say when you met him? Did you like his speech?

Hi Sozobe,

Sounds like the two of you had a memorable day.
 
 
Good idea! I'll have her share her impressions later (she's finishing up a playdate now).

Meanwhile, I was very impressed by this:

"Obama's Open Letter To Gay Americans"

 http://andrewsullivan.theatlantic.com/the_daily_dish/2008/02/obamas-open-let.html 
 
 
Too cool Sozobe!

Though this guy looked like he might like Obama a little too much.

Looks like security thought so too.
 
 
96 photos from the Ohio State event. Are you in any of them, Soz?

 http://www.flickr.com/photos/barackobamadotcom/sets/72157603994955210/ 

From your description, it sounded like you were sitting behind the podium so there may be a good chance of catching a glimpse of you.
 
 
Heh, we're in this one!

 

Cropped to show us:

 

:-D

(sozlet's head is barely peeking out over the gate.)
 
 
 
Cropped to show us:

 

:-D

(sozlet's head is barely peeking out over the gate.)
 

You are much shorter than I had envisioned!  
 
 
That was quite a crowd there. I'm still waiting for the slideshow to finish loading so I can look at all the photos. If I spot you in any other shots, I'll link to them.

Where was your interpreter standing? I kept looking for someone with their back to the podium and facing the crowd as a way to find you.
 
 
I went through the whole thing! I'm in lots of other shots (10-15?) but am just as teeny in each one.

I can tell I'm grinning in one because of the shape of my face though.

Thanks for the link, that was fun!
 
 
 
Heh, we're in this one!
 

:-D

(sozlet's head is barely peeking out over the gate.)
 
I recognized you straight away, but didn't want to out you. :wink:
 
 
 http://www.dailykos.com/story/2008/2/28/202659/980/800/465997 

 
From Texas: Why I Voted For Obama Today
by EmperorHadrian
Thu Feb 28, 2008 at 07:23:44 PM PST
I have spent most of this campaign season supporting Hillary, and critizing Obama. If you don't believe me, read some of my past diaries here, here, here, here, here, here, here, here and here. Today I voted in the Texas primary, and I voted for Obama.

EmperorHadrian's diary :: ::
A lot of people here decided to vote for Obama because of an event that occurred. Maybe it was Hillary's Iraq or Iran vote. Maybe it was Obama's 2002 speech, where he publically opposed the invasion. Maybe it was Bill's comparison of Obama to Jesse Jackson. Maybe it was Hillary's suggestions that she may attempt to override the will of the voters, and steal the nomination with the superdelegates.

This was not how I decided to vote for Obama. I am very deliberative, and rarely (if ever) make big decisions based off of a single reason or outrage.

...

I then saw two additional occurrences. First, Obama actually tied Hillary in delegates, despite the fact that his focus was on states with a very small number of delegates. Second, Hillary's campaign collapsed and staggered into the post-February 5 states without any plan. In contrast, Obama was now in the middle of a post-February 5 plan that had been long ago decided on.

And then, he started polling much better against McCain than Hillary.

Instead of deciding to vote for Obama then and there, I decided that I was no longer decided. Instead, I was going to wait to see how the other February races went.

And then Hillary continued belittling states (like mine) that are either small, red, caucus states, states with open primaries, or states with high numbers of blacks, affluent voters, or young voters. This wasn't enough to push me to Obama yet.

Then she started losing state after state, making the bizarre excuse that she was losing them because she wasn't competing. The reality was that she wasn't competing because she didn't think she could win. Being broke and without a plan didn't help much either.

She even said that Texas doesn't matter. I assume, therefore, that she won't miss my vote.

...

In the end, everything built up, and finally reached critical mass. I realized that it isn't experience that makes a good president. Compare Nixon with Lincoln. It isn't an understanding of senate procedure that will break a republican filibuster on a national healthcare bill. 60 votes is 60 votes. What can break such a filibuster is having a movement on your side. When Hillary said that it was LBJ, not Martin Luther King, who passed the Civil Rights Act, I agreed with her because she was factually correct. But then I realized that the reality was actually much more complex. There would have been no political desire to pass a Civil Rights Act, if it weren't for Martin Luther King and the Civil Rights movement.

Hillary has more "experience" than Obama, as does John McCain. The fact that this is her big selling point, means that she could do no more than nullify McCain's advantage on this. She doesn't have any selling point that he doesn't have. Maybe that would be enough for 270 electoral votes. Maybe it wouldn't be.

What neither she nor McCain have, which Obama has repeatedly demonstrated that he does have, is judgment. And I don't just mean with regards to his early opposition to the Iraq invasion. The experience of McCain and Hillary amounts to little more than voting "aye" or "nay". Hillary also does have the experience of being a yes-woman for Bill. But no experience prepares you for the presidency. If it did, Nixon would have been a great success, and Lincoln would have been a failure. George W. Bush should have been a good president, because he had some of the most experienced people in Washington working for him (such as Cheney and Rumsfeld).

No job, other than president, prepares you to be president. And even this isn't completely the case, because second presidential terms are usually much less successful than are first terms. Hillary's claim that we need someone with a lot of experience to defeat McCain doesn't make logical sense, when you consider the outcome of the 1960 and 2000 elections.

Experience isn't what makes a good president. If it was, Joe Biden would be on his way to being elected in November. No matter how experienced you are, you are still ignorant of almost everything. A "foreign policy expert" may know a lot about Iraq, but very little about Russia or South Africa or Tunisia. An "economic policy expert" may know a lot about taxes and the stock market, but very little about mortgage securitization or the bond markets. This is why it takes so much more to be a good president. You have to have judgment, insight, a good learning curve, and a decision making process that does not presume that you are always right.

Hillary and McCain claim to be more experienced than Obama. And yet, only Obama hasn't had a collapse of his campaign at some point. The other two became so hubristic with their own inevitability that they lost touch with reality, and paid for it. Hillary, for example, didn't bother competiting in the caucus states, which is probably what will end up costing her the nomination. After the collapse of his campaign, McCain used federal matching funds as collateral for a loan, which will at least be an albatross of hypocrisy that will hang around his neck.

While Obama has less experience, he has shown the traits that actually make a good president. This is why he is beating Hillary, and why he will beat John McCain.

 
 
 
Interesting, Butrflynet, thanks.

Nimh posted these on the Hillary thread, they're both good and I want to put them here too:

"Bill Clinton: The Bitter Half"

 http://www.time.com/time/nation/article/0,8599,1717925-1,00.html 

Excerpt:

 
 

and

"The Other Marriage"

 http://blogs.tnr.com/tnr/blogs/the_plank/archive/2008/02/28/the-other-marriage.aspx 
 
 
More on McCain/ FEC:

 http://www.boston.com/news/nation/articles/2008/02/29/to_some_mccains_financial_tangle_ironic/?page=2 

excerpt:

 
The McCain campaign dismissed the complaint, but some legal scholars say the issues are not as clear-cut as the Arizona senator says. Although his campaign has not received any government checks, McCain last year used his qualification for matching funds to automatically get on the primary ballots in Ohio and Delaware, instead of taking the time - and expense - of gathering signatures. And in December, when his campaign took out a $1 million bank loan, it cited its eligibility to apply for public matching funds as potential collateral.
 
 
 
 
 Here's  an account of the rally yesterday with video.

(We're not in it.)
 

You goofed up the link.  Here it is .
 
 
Thanks!
 
 
First Read:

 
The Texas papers are reporting today that the Clinton campaign is apparently raising the specter of a lawsuit to challenge the Dem-sanctioned caucuses in the state that will occur on top of the regular primary voting. The motivation here by the Clinton camp is to discount the delegates Obama potentially wins during the caucus portion. Obviously, they are worried that narrow victories in Ohio and Texas will get overshadowed if Obama ends up with more delegates for the night, which is very possible because of his likely landslide win in Vermont and the caucus portion of the Texas prima-caucus. Is the state's delegate-selection process screwy? Definitely. But how does Team Clinton overturn a process that had been approved for quite some time? This would be the third time -- the Nevada caucus sites on the Vegas strip, and Michigan/Florida being the others -- that the campaign has questioned rules that had already been established.
 

 http://firstread.msnbc.msn.com/archive/2008/02/29/715557.aspx 

Also in that entry, a fear-mongering Hillary ad (which I also have some doubts about as to accuracy. How many "world leaders" are still around since she was First Lady?)
 
 
My response to the ad:

Who would I want in the White House waiting up nights for that "Red Phone" to ring?

Someone with the intuitive skills of Obama who would already be listening to others in anticipation of a crisis, and who would be working on preventions and responses to those problems before they arise. We've already had too many decades of presidents who wait for the Red Phone to ring before they become aware of and react to problems with outdated plans.
 
 
Plouffe on the ad (First Read again):

 
Obama campaign manager David Plouffe said, "She had her red-phone moment; she had it in 2002," when she and President Bush voted for the war.

The red phone reference is to an ad run by Walter Mondale in the Democratic primary against Gary Hart.

"We don't think the ad's going to be effective at all," Plouffe also said, continuing, "she's already had her red-phone moment she answered affirmatively" on her vote to authorize the use of force in Iraq. "She did not read the NIE, so she did not do her homework either."

When asked repeatedly about the ad on the call, Plouffe focused on "judgment."

"Sen. Clinton's red-phone moment in her career was in 2002," he said again. "And she supported the Iraq war, supported president Bush.... Ultimately an ad like this is going to make people focus on judgment."
 
 
 
Naomi Wolf:  "Why Barack Obama Got My Vote" 

The end of it:

 
Remember: when activists started to push hard to raise awareness of the dangers of torture and indefinite detention, many on the Hill were scared to join the fight because it was then politically unpopular. But to me, if you are not really against torture -- always and under every political change in climate, and let us note that former torture victim and prisoner of war John McCain shamefully dropped his fight against the torture loopholes in the law as well -- then you are not really, in my view, fit to be an American President.

Gender has nothing to do with it. Race has nothing to do with it.

Integrity has something to do with it.

That is why Barack Obama has my vote. Of all the leading candidates, he is the only one on these issues who has consistently acted like a true American.

And if I hear -- as I am likely to -- from legions of US feminists outraged at me for choosing this man over that woman, I will gladly sit down and explain why I am certain that these issues are so urgent that they overshadow absolutely everything else.

Anyway, the man is a feminist; he has a woman-friendly policy vision. And while it would be a thrill to see the first woman elected President, in the last analysis, a real feminist need not define people or support on the basis of gender. Certainly not when our house -- with the precious Constitution held without representation within it -- is burning down.
 
 
 
Someone asked the obvious question re: that 3 AM ad:

 
Pregnant Pause

It was, in this reporter's opinion, the most interesting moment in today's Clinton campaign phoner with reporters. Responding to the release of HRC's new TX TV ad, which asserts in no subtle terms that only she has the experience to deal with a major world crisis, and, relatedly, to keep your children safe, Slate's John Dickerson asked the obvious question:

"What foreign policy moment would you point to in Hillary's career where she's been tested by crisis?" he said.

Silence on the call. You could've knit a sweater in the time it took the usually verbose team of Mark Penn, Howard Wolfson and Lee Feinstein, Clinton's national security director, to find a cogent answer. And what they came up with was weak -- that she's been endorsed by many high ranking members of the uniformed military.

Take a listen...
 

(There is audio at the link:)

 http://hotlineblog.nationaljournal.com/archives/2008/02/pregnant_pause.html 
 
 
This is cool:

"We are Jewish. We Support Barack Obama!"

 http://jews4obama2008.wordpress.com/ 
 
 
 Obama vs. Clinton on Education 

Some distinctions, not many. Informative though. (In all the horse race stuff I can still be brought up short by how often I thoroughly I agree with Obama on policy stuff.)
 
 
Looks like our doubts about Hillary, the feminist crusader are well-placed.

 http://firstread.msnbc.msn.com/archive/2008/02/29/718538.aspx 

 
CLINTON DONATIONS FROM TROUBLED FIRM

Posted: Friday, February 29, 2008 5:47 PM
From NBC's Lisa Myers and Jim Popkin

Sen. Hillary Clinton has declined to return $170,000 in campaign contributions from individuals at a company accused of widespread sexual harassment, and whose CEO is a disbarred lawyer with a criminal record, federal campaign records show.

The federal government has accused the Illinois management consulting firm, International Profit Associates, or IPA, of a brazen pattern of sexual harassment including "sexual assaults," "degrading anti-female language" and "obscene suggestions."

In a 2001 lawsuit full of lurid details, the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission claims that 103 women employees at IPA were victimized for years. The civil case is ongoing, and IPA vigorously denies the allegations.

"This is by far, hands down, the worst case I've ever experienced," said Diane Smason, one of the EEOC lawyers handling the lawsuit. "Every woman there experienced sex harassment, they were part of a hostile work environment of sex harassment. And this occurred from the top down."

Sen. Clinton's spokesman, Howard Wolfson, told NBC News in a statement that the senator decided to keep the funds because the lawsuit is "ongoing" and because none of the sexual harassment allegations has been proven in court.

"With regard to the pending harassment suit, as a general matter, the campaign assesses findings of fact in deciding whether to return contributions," Wolfson said.
 

Also looks like another case of double-speak from Hillary.

You'll note in the above article that her campaign spokesperson says Hillary decided not to return the donations because the case is still pending and none of the sexual harrassment charges have yet been proven in court.

In case you need a refresher, reread the circumstances of her returning the funds to Norman Hsu here:

 http://www.msnbc.msn.com/id/20713395/ 

 
updated 5:28 p.m. PT, Mon., Sept. 10, 2007

WASHINGTON - Sen. Hillary Rodham Clinton's presidential campaign said Monday it will return $850,000 in donations raised by Democratic fundraiser Norman Hsu, who is under federal investigation for allegedly violating election laws.

"In light of recent events and allegations that Mr. Norman Hsu engaged in an illegal investment scheme, we have decided out of an abundance of caution to return the money he raised for our campaign," Clinton spokesman Howard Wolfson said in a statement Monday night. "An estimated 260 donors this week will receive refunds totaling approximately $850,000 from the campaign."

Wolfson said the Clinton campaign also will vigorously review its fundraisers, including thorough criminal background checks, in the future. "In any instances where a source of a bundler's income is in question, the campaign will take affirmative steps to verify its origin," he said.
 
 
 
 
Someone asked the obvious question re: that 3 AM ad:

 
Pregnant Pause

<snip>

Take a listen...
 

 

That was hilarious - I wanted to post that link last night, and didnt.. but yeah, I mean - damn.  
 
 
Matt Yglesias:

 
Whatever else is happening, Hillary Clinton seems to have a clear lead in Rhode Island. Crucially, only heavily Catholic northeastern states that hold primaries count, so she's in good shape.
 
 
 
Just went to an Obama meeting -- so fun! (Not the Town Hall in Westerville, though the meeting was close-ish and it was kind of strange to realize that both Hillary Clinton and Barack Obama were just over that away.)

This was an organizer meeting and just kind of a general get-together. A person who has done a lot of Obama volunteering gave a sort of a presentation. She had a DVD and a bunch of informational materials. She was fabulous, I really liked her. About 60?, a grandma, very warm and sweet but also very articulate. We chatted for a while after the presentation part and it was so fun to meet someone IRL as wonkish as I am -- we kept trading specifics and being happy the other one knew what we were talking about.

Kids were welcome and sozlet had a great time being able to both go to an Obama event and play with kids. We were invited by friends of ours -- the mom of one of sozlet's classmates -- so she played with her friend but also met some new kids. (Aside -- the mom said that sozlet would probably like one of the other girls there as they were a lot alike; "Very mature, intellectual." Me: "Sozlet's intellectual ?" The mom: "Oh, totally!")

Anyway it was cool. One thing we talked about was how all of us in the room were just energized and ready to DO something, to give back, and that if Obama wins the nomination and then the election we won't just suddenly shut down -- that we're going to want to do stuff to help President Obama (if that's what happens), and that there are a lot of people like us out there. And that we think he knows that and is ready to go ahead and make use of all of that energy and desire to DO something, not just in terms of the campaign, but in terms of governing.

*****

I did more yard-sign counting on the way there and the way back (gonna move that stuff here, worried that it's a little too off-topic on nimh's polls thread). So far the tally is:

Obama: A LOT. Not sure of the exact number, didn't start counting until I had already seen a whole lot of them. I'll say 75, but could be significantly more or less.

The rest I've counted exactly:

Ron Paul: 4
Hillary Clinton: 2
Mike Huckabee: 1
John McCain: 0

I asked the volunteer person (I didn't catch her name) what she thought would happen in Ohio, and she said it'd be very close and then kinda winced and I nodded and said "...but he'll lose?" and she said wellllll he MIGHT win. Then we got into a round of "I know!"s about Mark Penn's latest spin... (the whole "buyer's remorse"/ "onus" thing, that if Obama doesn't win all four March 4th primaries, Hillary still has a good chance...)
 
 
Local color:

Why oh why couldn't today's weather be tomorrow? It's incredibly gorgeous right now -- sunny, warm. (High in the 60's.) Tomorrow: 30's, rainy. ALL DAY.
 
 
 
Local color:

Why oh why couldn't today's weather be tomorrow? It's incredibly gorgeous right now -- sunny, warm. (High in the 60's.) Tomorrow: 30's, rainy. ALL DAY.
 

Think that poor weather will help Clinton, with the low turnout it causes?

I worry about early voting in OH.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
 How did the Clinton campaign get here? 

L.A. Times:

 
WASHINGTON -- As they mapped out a campaign schedule for Bill Clinton, top aides to Hillary Rodham Clinton kept his time short in South Carolina. They were probably going to lose the state, they figured, and they wanted their most powerful surrogate to move on to Georgia, Alabama and other Southern states.

But the former president shelved the plan, according to campaign aides. Day after day he stayed in South Carolina, getting into angry confrontations with the press and others. In the end, Hillary Clinton lost the Jan. 26 vote there by a 2-to-1 margin and saw her standing with African Americans nationwide become strained.

Hillary Clinton may be one of the most disciplined figures in national politics, but she has presided over a campaign operation riven by feuding, rival fiefdoms and second-guessing of top staff members.
 

 
Obama, who leads Clinton in delegates, would pose problems for any candidate. But aides to Clinton said the dysfunction within her campaign team made its task that much tougher.

Joe Trippi, a senior advisor to John Edwards' now-dropped Democratic campaign, said: "At some point the candidate has to step in and bust heads and say 'Enough!'

"If there's fighting internally, the candidate has to step up and make it clear what direction she wants to go and stop this stuff dead in its tracks. Otherwise there's going to be a struggle for power and control right until the end. It's crippling."
 

 
The campaign also had trouble settling on a way to confront Obama. Top aides could not agree on whether, or how, to attack him.

"Why aren't we attacking him?" Bill Clinton asked at a high-level staff meeting Dec. 1 at the Clintons' Washington home, according to people familiar with events. With aides sitting around the dining room table, Bill Clinton said it was time to get more aggressive with Obama.
 

 
The dispute flared anew after Clinton's defeat in South Carolina. At a meeting in the Arlington, Va., headquarters, Penn and others gave a PowerPoint presentation on what was billed as a new message: Clinton would be championing "Solutions for America."

[Mike] Henry, then the deputy campaign manager, objected, according to people at the meeting. He said it sounded like a repackaging of the old message that Clinton was a strong leader rather than a warm person. Indeed, a top item in the PowerPoint was "strength and experience" -- a theme Clinton had been stressing for months.

Henry asked: "Is this what we're doing, or is it up for discussion?"

Penn said Clinton had already approved the new message.

At that point, Henry asked if the campaign had learned anything from its defeats. It should be clear, he said, that voters want to see a more human side of her.

"This is not bringing out the humanity in her," Henry said, according to people present.

Penn countered that the reason for many of her defeats, particularly in smaller states, had been a lack of organization, not the message -- a swipe at Henry and others in field work.

In the end, Clinton backed Penn. Henry left the campaign.
 
 
 
 
Think that poor weather will help Clinton, with the low turnout it causes?

I worry about early voting in OH.

Cycloptichorn
 

Right, that's my concern.

I don't know which way early voting will go. There was, for example, a "March to vote" here in Columbus on Saturday -- a breakfast and then a march (with Mayor Coleman) to the polls to vote for Obama. (Well, to vote, but this was an Obama event.)

I had a (fun, actually!) argument with an Obama volunteer at the Michelle Obama event -- at the rally last week I found out (when she took the stage) that she's the regional co-ordinator for the Obama campaign. She was awesome, I really liked her. Anyway she was pushing hard for early voting, and I think that's been a major Obama campaign tactic.

I'm still nervous though. Plus I don't think that what I'm seeing in my immediate surroundings (heavily Obama-leading) is necessarily indicative of Ohio in general.
 
 
One good thing about early voting -- it was supposed to be from 8 to 5 today, but it's been extended until 9 PM, "due to high demand." If people check the weather, they might go today instead. (I might. I'm not sure.)
 
 
(There is a video about the "March to Vote" on this page:)

 http://my.barackobama.com/page/invite/ohearlyvote 
 
 
This is interesting slash weird: McCain on autism and thimerosal:

 http://blogs.abcnews.com/politicalpunch/2008/02/john-mccain-ent.html 
 
 
 
This is interesting slash weird: McCain on autism and thimerosal:

 http://blogs.abcnews.com/politicalpunch/2008/02/john-mccain-ent.html 
 

I'm guessing that he's just insufficiently knowledgeable on the matter. It's pretty esoteric given everything else the poor buggers have to try and shove into their noggins for campaigning.

Unless, of course, there's some strand of classically  paranoid  notions floating about in the rightwing universe right now on thimerosal a la "the new math" and "communist plot to put fluoride in our water".
 
 
I read this yesterday and enjoyed it -- keeps coming up today:

"An Unscripted Barack Obama Preaches Personal Responsibility in Texas":

 http://www.huffingtonpost.com/mayhill-fowler/an-unscripted-barack-obam_b_89127.html 

Sullivan posted the video:

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=l0L2GEBhd2w 

Excerpt:

 
"But can I make this one last point? And I hope I'm not offending anybody," Obama says. His audience--the women anyway--know where he is going, and they begin to call out. " Come on now --" Behind me, a lady with a voice that can be heard as far as Dallas offers encouragement.

"It doesn't matter how much money we put in--"

" Come on now --"

"--if parents don't parent."

Shrieks and trills from every corner again interrupt.

"It's not good enough to say to yourself, it's the school, and you don't turn off the TV, you don't help with the homework, there's not a book in the house--"

"COME ON NOW--" In my ear, she's stentorian, bossy and encouraging, like a rancher birthing a calf. Will Obama be able to utter the truth? To get it out? She's sure he has it in him.

"You got a video player on--"

"Come on, Obama! Come on, Obama! Come on!"

He is drowned by the roar, loud as falling water, and now the traveling press, realizing that something is actually happening, snap to. They sit up, swivel and stare. Unfortunately, the standing cameras are trained in the wrong direction, on Barack. One photographer hoists a big hand camera that he turns on the crowd, out of their seats and gesticulating, leaning forwards and back in a kind of a dance.

"So turn off the TV set, give the video game away, buy a little desk, or clear the kitchen table, from September help with homework--if they don't know how to do it, give them help. If you don't know how to do it, call the teacher. Make them go to bed at a reasonable time. Give them some breakfast.... If your child misbehaves at school, don't cuss out the teacher. Don't cuss out the teacher."

"OBAMA! OBAMA! OBAMA!" These 750 in Beaumont are louder than the 20,000 in Houston's Toyota Center last week. The din stuns. Stupefies. Really, there aren't words to describe it.
 
 
 
Such a hysterical outburst over what's basically the most cliched, cookie-cutter Oprah-type admonishment? Weird.  
 
 
I think context is all, here. It's the kind of thing that politicians are nervous about saying -- most especially to black audiences. It's about the breakdown of the black family -- how the buck is being passed and black fathers, especially, are not living up to their responsibilities. This isn't something that is said TO the black community often. Bill Cosby caused a pretty big commotion when he tried it.
 
 
Here's another version of what he had to say in Beaumont:

 http://www.latimes.com/news/politics/la-na-trailwow29feb29,1,3963431.story 

 
Obama cracks a ruler, and the crowd goes wild

By Mark Z. Barabak, Los Angeles Times Staff Writer
February 29, 2008

They came to cheer. They got a lecture. The crowd went wild.

During a Barack Obama town-hall meeting on the economy, the topic turned to education, which, the Illinois senator said, could not be remedied by spending alone. "It doesn't matter how much money we put in if parents don't parent," he scolded.

The line is one the Democrat delivers often, but on Thursday in Beaumont, Texas, he struck a remarkable chord with his mostly African American audience.

"It's not good enough for you to say to your child, 'Do good in school,' and then when that child comes home, you've got the TV set on," Obama lectured. "You've got the radio on. You don't check their homework. There's not a book in the house. You've got the video game playing."

Each line was punctuated by a roar, and Obama began to shout, falling into a preacher's rhythm. "Am I right?"

"So turn off the TV set. Put the video game away. Buy a little desk. Or put that child at the kitchen table. Watch them do their homework. If they don't know how to do it, give 'em help. If you don't know how to do it, call the teacher."

By now, the crowd of nearly 2,000 was lifted from the red velveteen seats of the Julie Rogers Theatre, hands raised to the gilded ceiling. "Make 'em go to bed at a reasonable time! Keep 'em off the streets! Give 'em some breakfast! Come on! Can I get an amen here?"

Whooooooooooooooooo, went the crowd. "You know I'm right," Obama laughed. "And, since I'm on a roll, if your child misbehaves in school, don't cuss out the teacher! You know I'm right about that! Don't cuss out the teacher! Do something with your child!"

Pandemonium.

"All right, all right," he finished, "settle down. We're having too much fun here.... I'm speaking the truth!"

 
 
 
Ow, my neck hurts from nodding:

 http://obsidianwings.blogs.com/obsidian_wings/2008/03/misogyny-day--1.html 

As usual with hilzoy it's both a) long and b) hard to excerpt because I like pretty much the whole thing, but for a flavor:

 
I am, as I said, a feminist. By that I mean first, that I think that women should be given the same rights and opportunities as men, and should be treated with the same respect; and second, that this is not just something I affirm in the abstract, but that I am committed to trying to work to achieve. This is completely different from "forming a political movement directed at taking power." I do not want women to exercise power over men per se, or for men to exercise power over women, or anything of that kind. I want everyone to have as rich a set of opportunities as they can possibly have, and for everyone to be treated with equal respect. That is a very, very different thing.
 

(First I suspected she might be fishin, now I'm thinking FreeDuck. Very FreeDuckian voice, doncha think?)
 
 
I'm incredibly flattered but would be hard pressed to think something through that carefully these days. Loved it, though.
 
 
John McCain just received the below resume from someone hoping for an executive position in his future administration. He will be available after January 2009.

>
> GEORGE W. BUSH
> 1600 Pennsylvania Avenue
> Washington, DC 20520
>
>
>
> EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE:
>
> Law Enforcement:
>
> I was arrested in Kennebunkport, Maine, in 1976 for
> driving under the influence of alcohol. I pled
> guilty, paid a fine, and had my driver's license
> suspended for 30 days. My Texas driving record has
> been "lost" and is not available.
>
>
> Military:
>
> I joined the Texas Air National Guard and went AWOL.
> I refused to take a drug test or answer any
> questions about my drug use. By joining the Texas
> Air National Guard, I was able to avoid combat duty
> in Vietnam.
>
>
> College:
>
> I graduated from Yale University with a low C
> average. I was a cheerleader.
>
>
>
>
> PAST WORK EXPERIENCE :
>
> I ran for U.S. Congress and lost.
>
> I began my career in the oil business in
> Midland,Texas in 1975. I bought an oil company, but
> couldn't find any oil in Texas. The company went
> bankrupt shortly after I sold all my stock.
>
> I bought the Texas Rangers baseball team in a
> sweetheart deal that took land using taxpayer money.
>
>
> With the help of my father and our friends in the
> oil industry (including Enron CEO Ken Lay), I was
> elected governor of Texas.
>
>
>
> ACCOMPLISHMENTS AS GOVERNOR OF TEXAS:
>
> I changed Texas pollution laws to favor power and
> oil companies, making Texas the most polluted state
> in the Union. During my tenure, Houston replaced Los
> Angeles as the most smog-ridden city in America.
>
> I cut taxes and bankrupted the Texas treasury to the
> tune of billions in borrowed money.
>
> I set the record for the most executions by any
> governor in American history.
>
> With the help of my brother, the governor of Florida
>, and my father's appointments to the Supreme Court,
> I became President of the United States, after
> losing by over 500,000 votes.
>
>
>
> ACCOMPLISHMENTS AS PRESIDENT:
>
> I am the first President in U.S. history to enter
> office with a criminal record.
>
> I invaded and occupied two countries at a continuing
> cost of over one billion dollars per week.
>
> I spent the U.S. surplus and effectively bankrupted
> the U.S. Treasury.
>
> I shattered the record for the largest annual
> deficit in U.S. history.
>
> I set an economic record for most private
> bankruptcies filed in any 12-month period.
>
> I set the all-time record for most foreclosures in a
> 12-month period.
>
> I set the all-time record for the biggest drop in
> the history of the U.S. stock market. In my first
> year in office, over 2 million Americans lost their
> jobs and that trend continues.
>
> I'm proud that the members of my cabinet are the
> richest of any administration in U.S. history. My
> "poorest millionaire," Condoleezza Rice, has a
> Chevron oil tanker named after her.
>
> I set the record for most campaign fund-raising
> trips by a U.S. President.
>
> I am the all- time U.S. and world record -holder for
> receiving the most corporate campaign donations.
>
> My largest lifetime campaign contributor, and one of
> my best friends, Kenneth Lay, presided over the
> largest corporate bankruptcy fraud in U.S. history,
> Enron.
>
> My political party used Enron private jets and
> corporate attorneys to assure my success with the
> U.S. Supreme Court during my election decision.
>
> I have protected my friends at Enron and Halliburton
> against investigation or prosecution. More time and
> money was spent investigating the Monica Lewinsky
> affair than has been spent investigating one of the
> biggest corporate rip-offs in history. I presided
> over the biggest energy crisis in U.S. history and
> refused to intervene when corruption involving the
> oil industry was revealed.
>
> I presided over the highest gasoline prices in U.S.
> history.
>
> I changed the U.S. policy to allow convicted
> criminals to be awarded government contracts.
>
> I appointed more convicted criminals to my
> administration than any President in U.S. history.
>
> I created the Ministry of Homeland Security, the
> largest bureaucracy in the history of the United
> States Government.
>
> I've broken more international treaties than any
> President in U.S. history.
>
> I am the first President in U.S. history to have the
> United Nations remove the U.S. from the Human Rights
> Commission.
>
> I withdrew the U.S. from the World Court of Law.
>
> I refused to allow inspector's access to U.S.
> "prisoners of war" detainees and thereby have
> refused to abide by the Geneva Convention.
>
> I am the first President in history to refuse United
> Nations election inspectors (during the 2002 US
> election).
>
> I set the record for fewest numbers of press
> conferences of any President since the advent of
> television.
>
> I set the all-time record for most days on vacation
> in any one- year period. After taking off the entire
> month of August, I presided over the worst security
> failure in U.S. history.
>
> I garnered the most sympathy ever for the U.S. after
> the World Trade Center attacks and less than a year
> later made the U.S. the most hated country in the
> world, the largest failure of diplomacy in world
> history.
>
> I have set the all-time record for most people
> worldwide to simultaneously protest me in public
> venues (15 million people), shattering the record
> for protests against any person in the history of
> mankind.
>
> I am the first President in U.S. history to order an
> unprovoked, pre-emptive attack and the military
> occupation of a sovereign nation. I did so against
> the will of the United Nations, the majority of
> U.S. Citizens and the world community.
>
> I have cut health care benefits for war veterans and
> support a cut in duty benefits for active duty
> troops and their families in wartime.
>
> In my State of the Union Address, I lied about our
> reasons for attacking Iraq and then blamed the lies
> on our British friends.
>
> I am the first President in history to have a
> majority of Europeans (71%) view my presidency as
> the biggest threat to world peace and security.
>
> I am supporting development of a nuclear "Tactical
> Bunker Buster," a WMD.
>
> I have so far failed to fulfill my pledge to bring
> Osama Bin Ladento justice.
>
>
>
> RECORDS AND REFERENCES:
>
> All records of my tenure as governor of Texas are
> now in my father's library, sealed and unavailable
> for public view.
>
> All records of SEC investigations into my insider
> trading and my bankrupt companies are sealed in
> secrecy and unavailable for public view.
>
> All records or minutes from meetings that I, or my
> Vice-President, attended regarding public energy
> policy are sealed in secrecy and unavailable for
> public review. I specified that my sealed documents
> will not be available for 50 years.
 
 
I wonder if the foul weather will hurt Hillary's chances in the rural areas - the urban parts have a lot shorter way to go to get to the polls.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
If her constituency is the 50+ crowd, arthritis may kick in with the colder, wet weather and keep them home. But, most of them probably already vote by mail so it may not have any effect.
 
 
 
It's about the breakdown of the black family -- how the buck is being passed and black fathers, especially, are not living up to their responsibilities. This isn't something that is said TO the black community often. Bill Cosby caused a pretty big commotion when he tried it.
 

Eh, really? Didnt Cosby go on some whole national tour or something bringing that message? Hasnt Oprah gone on about this xx number of times now?

Hell, even in hip-hop youve had any number of righteous brothers bringing this message over and over again. Spike Lee did it in Get on the Bus. It's not exactly some ground-breaking brave thing to say, especially not for a black politician.
 
 
<shrug>

I have the impression it is. It definitely got a huge response -- why do you think it did?
 
 
...I do think it's rare for a) a politician to b) say it directly TO the audience in question. When Oprah says stuff, who is she saying it to?

I think the fact that the women responded especially strongly was telling -- that they liked the idea of a respected, powerful black man was saying that to an audience that included, presumably, some of the very black men who have been shirking their responsibilities.

I'm not sure though, I'm guessing. It definitely got a strong response, just musing on why.
 
 
Meanwhile, local color:

Went to Obama HQ today. Really hard not to be optimistic there. Lots of people, lots going on. No yard signs left -- huge demand. Sozlet chatted with several staffers for a while and generally had fun. I'm going to be bringing lunch food to them tomorrow.

So I'm pretty optimistic about Columbus, but I know it's kind of a bubble in terms of Ohio in general. As in, what I see here is not that representative.
 
 
 
<shrug>

I have the impression it is. It definitely got a huge response -- why do you think it did?
 

If anything, I think the fact that it was apparently such an easy crowdpleaser shows that it was not a particularly brave or groundbreaking thing to say.
 
 
Matt Yglesias on the bias question:

 
The Clinton campaign is pushing hard on the idea that the press has been kinder to Barack Obama than it's been to her, and I know a lot of her supporters are totally up in arms about this. I'd say it's definitely true that, on balance, Obama has gotten better press than Clinton. Still, I think Clinton fans are going more than a little overboard with this monocausal account of the campaign. For one thing, one important exception to this is that if Obama had lost eleven contests in a row, there's no way he'd still be treated as a viable candidate. Similarly, if Obama had reached a situation where nobody can mathematically see a way for Clinton to catch his lead without altering DNC rules, I seriously doubt the race would continue to be covered as a serious competition.

From another direction, even though the press has often been unfair to Clinton about petty stuff, they have been very willing to go along with the idea that she has a vast experience edge over Obama even though it's always been unclear what exactly that edge consisted of. On top of that, the country's most prominent liberal columnist has been pretty consistently attacking Obama for months now. Now, yes, I do think there's been more BS thrown in her direction and there's obviously been an "Obama swoon" factor that there's no equal of on the other side (even Krugman, for example, writes only about his loathing of Obama and his supporters and never says anything good about Clinton) and that's been a factor in the race. Still, on the central argument of her campaign, Clinton's been treated reasonably well and the press has actually bent over backwards to keep her in the race under circumstances when almost anyone else would have been written off.
 

 http://matthewyglesias.theatlantic.com/archives/2008/03/the_race_and_the_media.php 
 
 
 
Meanwhile, local color:

Went to Obama HQ today. Really hard not to be optimistic there. Lots of people, lots going on. No yard signs left -- huge demand. Sozlet chatted with several staffers for a while and generally had fun. I'm going to be bringing lunch food to them tomorrow.

So I'm pretty optimistic about Columbus, but I know it's kind of a bubble in terms of Ohio in general. As in, what I see here is not that representative.
 

Does this mean you got the job?
 
 
 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bill_Cosby 

 
...

Cosby has been critical of what he sees as the African-American community's acceptance of fatherless single parent households, high crime rates, and high illiteracy rates. He encouraged a more proactive effort from African-Americans to reduce those problems. He expanded upon his remarks in San Jose, California during an event to promote the Read-2-Lead Classic. The way his speeches were portrayed by popular media provoked a great deal of anger from some African Americans.
Cosby was the impetus for the formation of ARISE Detroit! when, in a 13 January 2005, speech at Wayne County Community College he challenged black Detroiters to stop blaming white people for problems they could solve themselves. "It's not what they're doing to us. It's what we're not doing", the entertainer told the audience of nearly 2,000 people. A little more than a year later, ARISE Detroit! was formed to address this issue.

...

In May 2004 after receiving an award at the celebration of the 50th Anniversary commemoration of the Brown v. Board of Education ruling, the U.S. Supreme Court's decision that outlawed school segregation (Wu, Frank H.), Cosby made public remarks critical of those blacks who put higher priorities on sports, fashion, and "acting hard" than on education, self-respect, and self-improvement. He has made a plea for African American families to educate their children on the many different aspects of American culture (Baker). According to the Washington Times, he has had a long history of endeavors to advance African Americans (DeBose, Brian).

In "Pound Cake", Cosby, whose doctorate degree is in education, asked that African American parents begin teaching their children better morals at a younger age. He directed this address to the leaders in the lower and middle economic classes of the African-American community (see main article). Cosby told reporters of the Washington Times, "Parenting needs to come to the forefront. If you need help and you don't know how to parent, we want to be able to reach out and touch" (DeBose, Brian). Richard Leiby of the Washington Post reported, "Bill Cosby was anything but politically correct in his remarks Monday night at a Constitution Hall bash commemorating the 50th anniversary of the Brown vs. Board of Education decision."

Cosby again came under sharp criticism, and again he was largely unapologetic for his stance when he made similar remarks during a speech in a July 1 Rainbow Coalition meeting commemorating the anniversary of Brown v. Board of Education. During that speech, he admonished blacks for not assisting or concerning themselves with the individuals who are involved with crime or have counter-productive aspirations. He further described those who needed attention as "blacks [who] had forgotten the sacrifices of those in the Civil Rights Movement." The talk was interrupted several times by applause and received praise from leaders such as Jesse Jackson.
 
 
 
I didn't, no. I've been volunteering in various ways but didn't get the paid job I applied for.

So, election day dawns, and it's uhhhhhh- gly. Heavy cloud cover, a steady rain. At least it's not an absolute downpour. And at least the rain isn't freezing yet. There's a flood watch on, though.

OK, some good news. Just checked the weather and the temperature isn't supposed to get below freezing all day. Still, it IS supposed to rain all day.
 
 
 
Meanwhile, local color:

Went to Obama HQ today. Really hard not to be optimistic there. Lots of people, lots going on. No yard signs left -- huge demand. Sozlet chatted with several staffers for a while and generally had fun. I'm going to be bringing lunch food to them tomorrow.

So I'm pretty optimistic about Columbus, but I know it's kind of a bubble in terms of Ohio in general. As in, what I see here is not that representative.
 

That's interesting to hear. From where I am, it looks like Clinton has stalled Obama's momentum and has the press staring at their navels to see if they are biased. I guess the proof comes tonight.
 
 
Yep. I'm not expecting an Ohio win, certainly.

I think that a potent combination for Hillary has been having her back against the wall in one way or another and having the press declare her candidacy over. I kept wincing at the post-mortems, and there have been a lot of them. The first several had lot of disclaimers included, but they've gotten more brazen.

All of that seems to have been taken down several notches yesterday and today -- that could go either way, though. It could make for an atmosphere more conducive to those undecideds voting for Obama, or it could make them want to be part of the "comeback."

The part that annoys me most -- and I don't know if it is to Clinton's credit, or if it's Obama's problem, or if it happened independent of either of their attempts to shape the narrative -- is that Ohio and Texas were picked to be the Clinton firewall because they were so friendly towards her. She was long supposed to not only win but win big. If Obama steals Texas and/ or comes close in either one (OH, TX), that already represents a huge leap from where things were supposed to be.

But the leap was looking very promising late last week or so, so things started going even further than that -- wow, he might win BOTH of them!! How amazing would that be!

I think that got a bit out of hand, and that expectations are too high now. It should be amazing enough if he just stays close in OH and TX. Now a loss will be seen as a Problem.
 
 
 
OK, some good news. Just checked the weather and the temperature isn't supposed to get below freezing all day.
 

That's for Columbus -- evidently things are not good elsewhere.

Northern Ohio (including Cleveland):

 
... Winter Weather Advisory remains in effect until midnight EST
tonight...

A Winter Weather Advisory remains in effect until midnight for
Northern Ohio and northwest Pennsylvania.

A little rain and snow and freezing rain is expected this
morning. Freezing rain is expected to redevelop this afternoon and
continue into tonight... then change to snow. A glaze of ice is
expected. Snow accumulations later tonight should be about an
inch.

Monitor the latest forecast for updates. There is still some
doubt as to the amount of freezing rain that will occur. If the
freezing rain becomes heavy... an ice storm is possible.

Be careful... even a light coating of ice can make driving and
walking dangerous. It is sometimes difficult to recognize an icy
surface... it may look wet.
 
 
 
What is your feeling for whom that most hurts?

Way back, like, when Iowa voted, the common wisdom was that low turnout = good for Hillary, cause she depended on the hardcore party folk, who'd vote for any election, whereas his candidacy depended on lots of new voters with no experience and no habit of primary voting etc.

But now, I dont know anymore what the CW is? All of that is still true, but on the other hand it's the Obama supporters who seem more fired up, more passionate, and thus perhaps more likely to brave the weather, while the Hillary camp appears to include a lot more cynical seen-it-all folk, who might not want to bother if there's an unexpected obstacle... I have no idea anymore how that weighs up anymore, to be honest. What's your feeling about it?
 
 
I was just thinking about that too. Not sure.

Two different elements:

1.) Early voting. I know firsthand that Obama campaign workers were really, really pushing it. I don't have a basis for comparison with what the Hillary campaign was doing. But I just read this (First Read):

 
The absentee factor : Yesterday, NBC/NJ's Mike Memoli reported that there are signs Obama might have the early-voting edge in Ohio. Indeed, these contests could very well be the first ones in which early/absentee voting actually benefits Obama, because that voting will have started after Obama went on his post-Feb. 5 run. Factor in some bad weather -- lots of rain -- expected in Ohio, and does that cut into Clinton's lead there?
 

2.) Fired up, ready to go. I do tend to think that it's Obama supporters who would be more willing to just VOTE no matter what. The bubble comes into play there again, though. (I simply haven't met many Hillary supporters, and the ones I've met haven't been that passionate.)
 
 
From the article that was pointed to:

 
Some said that the Obama campaign in particular seems to have generated the most activity. In Montgomery County, Harsman said that the day after the Obama campaign did a massive phone push to get people to vote, more than 1,000 people came in person to vote, doubling or tripling the usual day-to-day traffic. " From our experience, it's Obama that's having the impact here, " said Summit County's Williams, who added that some voters have been mistakenly putting "Obama" in the part of the form where they are supposed to indicate their party.

Clinton's campaign has been active as well in encouraging early votes. On the first day of balloting, Gov. Ted Strickland led events all over the state to draw attention to early voting as he cast his ballot in Franklin County. This weekend, it held events in all 88 counties in which early voting was a focal point.

But it appears that Obama's campaign has been more deliberate about encouraging these votes, even at events for campaign surrogates. At an event in Akron for Michelle Obama last week, a field organizer asked for a show of hands of how many people had already voted. More than a third of the crowd raised their hands. And the next day, at an event in Canton, the campaign had vans waiting outside the event waiting to bring people to vote at the Stark County Board of Elections.
 

 http://firstread.msnbc.msn.com/archive/2008/03/03/725905.aspx 

I am well and truly stumped. I can see a lot of different scenarios, and I don't have any particular gut feelings. (Or I do, but then I immediately second-guess them because what I'm seeing around here doesn't really seem to be representative.)
 
 
OK, thanks. Good to have a voice from 'on the spot'.
 
 
 
The part that annoys me most -- and I don't know if it is to Clinton's credit, or if it's Obama's problem, or if it happened independent of either of their attempts to shape the narrative -- is that Ohio and Texas were picked to be the Clinton firewall because they were so friendly towards her. She was long supposed to not only win but win big. If Obama steals Texas and/ or comes close in either one (OH, TX), that already represents a huge leap from where things were supposed to be.

But the leap was looking very promising late last week or so, so things started going even further than that -- wow, he might win BOTH of them!! How amazing would that be!

I think that got a bit out of hand, and that expectations are too high now. It should be amazing enough if he just stays close in OH and TX. Now a loss will be seen as a Problem.
 

That is a credit to Clinton. She said earlier this week that being outspent 3-1 meant that Obama would be in trouble if he didn't take all four states. I had to roll my eyes, but the press reported it. The Clinton camp has routinely painted themselves as underdogs and that cheered their performance as beatinig expectations. It's not a bad strategy.
 
 
Just think, since the Dems have taken control of congress, we are winning in Iraq.
 
 
 http://weblogs.chicagotribune.com/news/politics/blog/2008/03/did_i_say_osama_i_meant_obama.html 

 http://www.pbs.org/now/shows/401/political-smears.html 
 
 
Gah... we are just not going to get closure tonight.

 
 

 http://cnnwire.blogs.cnn.com/2008/03/04/flooding-prompts-ohio-to-extend-primary-voting-in-one-county/ 
 
 
Stopped raining.

It's cold, it's damp, it's unpleasant... but it's not raining.
 
 
 
Stopped raining.

It's cold, it's damp, it's unpleasant... but it's not raining.
 

Are they still going to extend voting?

I have a very positive feeling about tonight!!!

Cycloptichorn
 
 
What's going on in Ohio?

 http://www.politico.com/blogs/bensmith/0308/Ohio_official_rejects_Obama_pollwatcher_letter.html 

 
March 04, 2008
Read More: Barack Obama

Ohio official rejects Obama poll-watcher letter

An official in the office of the Ohio Secretary of State has written local election officials instructing them not to accept an Obama campaign letter (.pdf) as sufficient documentation for poll-watchers to polling places.

The state's rules require a formal certification process for poll monitors. The Obama campaign, however, has distributed a letter signed by its state director, Paul Tewes, which states that the letter's bearer is "hereby authorized to serve as a legal poll monitor."

Deputy Assistant Secretary of State David Farrell wrote that Obama supporters have been presenting the letter to officials at polling sites, and attached the letter to his email, which appears to have been sent to election officials around the state.

"Our office's legal interpretation is that this letter is not legally sufficient on its own to allow someone to gain access to polling places," Farrell writes. "To be allowed access to a polling location an observer must be duly appointed as an official observer and have an official observer certificate.... Someone who wants to observe may present the attached letter in addition to the official observer certificate, but they must have the official observer certificate to legally gain entry."

Full email after the jump.
 
 
 
I read about that -- dunno. Seems like it could be the Obama campaign's fault. I don't really get it yet.

It just stopped raining here, Cycloptichorn, and I think the weather is still bad elsewhere.

I DON'T have a very positive feeling about tonight. I'm very, very gloomy in fact. Heh.

I'm a little worried that everything is breaking in the same direction -- towards Clinton -- and that it's going to be worse than we expect.

I dunno though.

Voted.

Voted!

After all this, I finally get to do the one thing that definite has a bearing on the results -- get to DO something.

No lines, not many people. I chose a time where there were likely to be fewer people, though. I might drive by the polling place later, see what it looks like.

Voting itself went super-smoothly though.
 
 
 
I read about that -- dunno. Seems like it could be the Obama campaign's fault. I don't really get it yet.

It just stopped raining here, Cycloptichorn, and I think the weather is still bad elsewhere.

I DON'T have a very positive feeling about tonight. I'm very, very gloomy in fact. Heh.

I'm a little worried that everything is breaking in the same direction -- towards Clinton -- and that it's going to be worse than we expect.

I dunno though.

Voted.

Voted!

After all this, I finally get to do the one thing that definite has a bearing on the results -- get to DO something.

No lines, not many people. I chose a time where there were likely to be fewer people, though. I might drive by the polling place later, see what it looks like.

Voting itself went super-smoothly though.
 

Look at it this way: the WORST that will happen is Clinton winning TX and OH and catching up about 20 delegates. That's the absolute worst. Obama will still have a large lead.

So to me, even the bad situations aren't all that bad. Super Tuesday was way, way more stressful then this. Now, I know, Obama needs to seal the deal and put Clinton away for good; can't let the higher-rank team hang in there or they will find a way to come back. A win in TX or OH tonight would go a long way towards making that happen, and I bet we see one of those happening.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
True. Thanks for the perspective.

I guess what I'm worried about is that Hillary will win bigger than we've been thinking in Ohio -- by 10-15 pts, say -- and that she'll win the popular vote in TX, and that the resulting media narrative will muddle things up. (Even if the delegate lead isn't shrunk by much and even if Obama eventually wins the TX caucuses.) I so want this to get wrapped up -- for Obama to emerge as the nominee and go from there.
 
 
 
True. Thanks for the perspective.

I guess what I'm worried about is that Hillary will win bigger than we've been thinking in Ohio -- by 10-15 pts, say -- and that she'll win the popular vote in TX, and that the resulting media narrative will muddle things up. (Even if the delegate lead isn't shrunk by much and even if Obama eventually wins the TX caucuses.) I so want this to get wrapped up -- for Obama to emerge as the nominee and go from there.
 
Clinton by 10-15 in Ohio sounds pretty realistic to me, sorry to say... and Texas will be tight. Vermont will be a landslide, but so will Rhode Island. I don't see Obama coming out a winner, on this, saddest of all days.
 
 
Some possible good news from Texas, anyway:

 
An Obama campaign source, meanwhile, said internal tracking at voting locations in Texas through midday shows strong turnout, especially in African-American precincts.

The source said turnout is lower than projected in heavily Latino precincts and slightly higher than expected in areas heavy with students. Austin and Dallas are reportedly seeing some of the state's strongest turnout.

Speaking from the aisle of his campaign plane, Obama tried to lower expectations and looked toward nominating contests that come within the next week.
 

Grains of salt and all that...

 http://www.swamppolitics.com/news/politics/blog/2008/03/obama_says_he_will_campaign_as.html 
 
 
I'm looking forward to the "Hammer" dropping tommorrow when we hear who the new 50 super delegates are. If Richardson is one of them, I wonder if he'll stall for more time if it looks like Hillary wins one or more states but is still behind in delegate count.
 
 
 
Gah... we are just not going to get closure tonight.

 
 

 

Hrmngr.

Then again, if it is in Eastern Ohio, near the PA border, that's Hillary country no? So you could say that any fewer votes from there appearing right away in the tallies on TV tonight offers Obama a perception advantage, making the gap by which - I assume - he loses look smaller.

OK, lemme look this up.

Allright,  here's that great map  I've now been looking for for half an hour. I remember it was posted here already, but couldnt find it back no matter what keywords I punched in - not on A2K, not in my history or bookmarks. Anyhow, there it is. Part of a great analysis too. (DIdnt Butrflynet post it?)

So, Jefferson County is in CD-6 - which is Strickland's old district. Expected to be a strong Hillary district. But on the other hand, Jefferson county looks small - just one out of twelve counties in that CD, and the whole CD is worth no more than 5 delegates. So probably wont make much of a difference either way.

(Though 5 = uneven number, which means that even if the race is very close, the winner will take that 5th delegate. In a district with an even number of delegates a candidate needs a blowout to get more than half of the delegates, considering there's rarely more than 6 in a district.)
 
 
Just went to the grocery store (clouds opened while I was out but now it's back to light drizzle) and saw this front-page headline -- haven't read it yet but looks like things could be messy :

 
OHIO PRIMARY
State of confusion

A projected record turnout Tuesday and voters' option to use paper ballots rather than touch-screens could delay results deep into the night and deepen mistrust of Ohio elections around the country.
 

 Columbus Dispatch 
 
 
I've been skeptical of the "Hillary campaign makes Obama look blacker" thing I've been seeing for the past couple of days, but this doesn't look too good:

 http://www.dailykos.com/storyonly/2008/3/5/131156/5021/187/469677 
 
 
Good analysis of what went right and what went wrong in both camps:

 http://208.122.14.138/thefield/?p=838 
 
 
A good read from salon.  http://www.salon.com/news/feature/2008/03/06/commander_in_chief/ 

I'd like to see the Obama campaign use some of these concepts in an ad for him. The idea that he's a "steady eddie" I think would be a good answer to Hillary's 3 am ad.
 
 
 
I've been skeptical of the "Hillary campaign makes Obama look blacker" thing I've been seeing for the past couple of days, but this doesn't look too good:

 http://www.dailykos.com/storyonly/2008/3/5/131156/5021/187/469677 
 
  Her people probably figured it would reflect a little badly on her, but at the end of the day; he's still black, and they succeeded at making people talk about it. The word "scumbag" is getting ever closer to the tip of my tongue. I wonder what Blatham thinks about this
 
 
That was a good read, FreeDuck, thanks.

Chicago Tribune, "Clinton's experience claim under scrutiny":

 http://www.chicagotribune.com/news/chi-experiencemar07,0,51719.story?page=1 

Good examination of her claims to foreign policy experience.
 
 
 
 
I've been skeptical of the "Hillary campaign makes Obama look blacker" thing I've been seeing for the past couple of days, but this doesn't look too good:

 http://www.dailykos.com/storyonly/2008/3/5/131156/5021/187/469677 
 
  Her people probably figured it would reflect a little badly on her, but at the end of the day; he's still black, and they succeeded at making people talk about it. The word "scumbag" is getting ever closer to the tip of my tongue. I wonder what Blatham thinks about this 
 

Once again, I'm a little alarmed at how much our biases or fears effect our emotions, perceptions and thoughts (and on how modern political campaigns, via modern media, operate in the realm of emotions far, far moreso than the realm of rationalism). This election is shaking the foundation of a bunch of my assumptions/certainties on self and on others. And this issue is a wonderful example.

About three weeks ago, the three main cable news networks (cnn, msnbc, fox) were carrying an Obama speech and each were using their own separate camera feed and broadcast system. As I flipped back and forth, it was immediately evident that the Fox image was considerably darker. It made his face darker along with the faces of everyone cheering behind him. Do I have to tell you what I suspected? I seriously considered mentioning it here. I didn't. I hope I didn't because of an awareness of the tenuousness of such a claim but I'm not even sure if that was the reason.

Internal links to the piece available at source site.

 
Thursday, March 6, 2008 15:59 EST
Was Obama's skin darkened for Clinton ad?
Perhaps the most potentially incendiary discussion in the blogosphere this week has been over the question of whether Hillary Clinton's campaign deliberately doctored an image of Barack Obama for use in an attack ad, taking debate footage and making Obama's face darker and wider.

In the Daily Kos diary that started it all, diarist Troutnut wrote, "In case you needed yet another reason to despise Hillary Clinton and her vermin strategists, she's now running an ad blatantly lying about Obama's subcommittee. Her ad includes debate footage heavily doctored to make Obama blacker... I'm not accusing Hillary of technically being a racist. But she is cynically exploiting racism to further her personal ambition, and it's part of a pattern. She's doing it to a fellow Democrat who's virtually certain to be the nominee."

Markos Moulitsas, the man behind Daily Kos, has endorsed the allegations, writing, "There was a concerted effort by Clinton's ad people to make Obama look darker, more sinister, and with a wider nose. The evidence is indisputable."

Personally, I'd avoided discussing the issue because, in my amateur opinion based on limited graphics experience at various publications, this looked to me pretty innocent, but I wanted someone with more expertise to weigh in. That's what the people at Factcheck.org did Wednesday. In their judgment, the Clinton campaign is not guilty of the charges. Here's the bulleted list of conclusions they prepared:

The Obama frames from the ad do appear darker than other video of Obama from the same event.
However, the YouTube copy of the ad, on which the bloggers base their conclusions, is darker overall than other copies of the ad. We obtained a digital recording of the ad as it actually appeared on a Texas TV station, and it is lighter.
Furthermore, our analysis of the Obama frames, using Photoshop, shows a fairly uniform darkening of the entire image including the backdrop. It is not just Obama's skin color that's affected.
Also, nearly all the images in the ad are dark, including those of Hillary Clinton. And dark images are a common technique used in attack ads.

Factcheck also writes, "Others will speculate about the Clinton campaign's intentions and motives, as they already have. But without further evidence to the contrary, we see no reason to conclude that this is anything more than a standard attempt to make an attack ad appear sinister, rather than a special effort to exploit racial bias as some Obama supporters are saying... We're not mind-readers, so we can't say whether or not the makers of this ad intended to engage in 'race-baiting' or were 'using racism to win' as some Obama partisans are claiming. Based on evidence at hand, we find those claims to be unsubstantiated. And the many potential differences between source footage, encoding manipulations, and other variables only make it less likely that any such attempt could be proven."

(The Factcheck piece goes into much more depth than this and contains multiple video and image comparisons that need to be seen to be fully understood. If you're interested in the subject, I recommend reading the whole thing.)

In an interview, Moulitsas stood by the allegations. "It's clear that it hasn't been debunked, clear that it's true that they darkened his skin and widened his face," Moulitsas said. He alleged that Factcheck was not working off a good copy of the video. "All you have to do is look at the text... It's washed out and blurry in the Factcheck one," Moulitsas said. "Either they've been duped or they've changed it."

Moulitsas e-mailed Salon a link to a post at Democratic Underground that compares frames of a video posted by Factcheck and the video available on the Clinton campaign Web site and alleges Factcheck used a doctored video. In the post, blogger berni_mccoy writes, "It is clear that Fact Check is COMPLETELY WRONG on this issue and they have either BEEN DUPED or are DIRECTLY FALSIFYING the 'facts'."

Contacted by Salon, Factcheck.org director Brooks Jackson denied that the video his site posted was in any way altered, and charged that the Democratic Underground post was comparing apples to oranges. Factcheck had posted several different versions of the video taken from various sources -- YouTube, the Clinton Web site and a high-quality version recorded by the Campaign Media Analysis Group. It's Jackson's contention (one supported by the wording of the DU post) that the DU poster compared the high-quality CMAG version with the version available on the Clinton site, explaining the difference. "This guy who's falsely accusing us of doctoring the video just didn't pay attention," Jackson said. "His mistake was that the video on our site that he thought was the Clinton video isn't. He never asked us, he never called us, he made an assumption that was simply wrong. And this is a mistake a lot of hothead partisans make when they're trying to substantiate their own biases and beliefs."

Update: Factcheck director Jackson e-mailed to let me know that the site has updated its original post on the matter. In the update, Factcheck says it has corresponded with two of the DailyKos bloggers who kicked the allegations off, including Troutnut. Factcheck writes:

The two Kos bloggers who originally posted the story contacted us separately with thoughtful e-mails arguing generally that the matter deserves serious discussion but not challenging the substance of our article. Both said they found no fault with our conclusions about the charges of racism. Troutnut said he didn't "contest [our] assertion that the netroots' accusation of race-baiting is 'unsubstantiated.'"

In its update, Factcheck also says that the video comparison at DU "is actually evidence that supports what we said in the first place: Versions of the Clinton ad from different sources show different shadings, and the YouTube version on which the 'racism' claim rests is the darkest of the lot."
 
 http://www.salon.com/politics/war_room/ 
 
 
I'm not staking much on it. I just assumed it was untrue -- that no darkening or broadening happened -- and then the Kos post made me go "hmm." That's about it.

Plenty of other things of greater concern.
 
 
Jon Landau speaks my mind on the Huffington Post.

 http://www.huffingtonpost.com/jon-landau/the-ad_b_90207.html 

This is actually the kind of thing I want Obama to say. I think it's a very effective argument against these tactics. Basically, you can't beat the Republicans by joining them.
 
 
Does anyone not love Larry David?

 
On the Red Phone
Posted March 6, 2008 | 09:00 PM (EST)

Here's an idea for an Obama ad: a montage of Clinton's Sybillish personalities that have surfaced during the campaign with a solemn voiceover at the end saying, "Does anyone want this nut answering the phone?"

How is it that she became the one who's perceived as more equipped to answer that 3 a.m. call than the unflappable Obama? He, with the ice in his veins, who doesn't panic when he's losing or get too giddy when he's winning, who's as comfortable in his own skin as she's uncomfortable in hers. There have been times in this campaign when she seemed so unhinged that I worried she'd actually kill herself if she lost. Every day, she reminds me more and more of Adele H., who also had an obsession that drove her insane.

A few weeks ago, I started to feel sorry for her. Oh Christ, let her win already...Who cares...It's not worth it. There's not that much difference between them. She can have it. Anything to avoid watching her descend into madness. So I switched. I started rooting for her. It wasn't that hard. Compromise comes easy to me. I was on board.

And then I saw the ad.

I watched, transfixed, as she took the 3 a.m. call...and I was afraid...very afraid. Suddenly, I realized the last thing this country needs is that woman anywhere near a phone. I don't care if it's 3 a.m. or 10 p.m. or any other time. I don't want her talking to Putin, I don't want her talking to Kim Jong Il, I don't want her talking to my nephew. She needs a long rest. She needs to put on a sarong and some sun block and get away from things for a while, a nice beach somewhere -- somewhere far away, where there are...no phones.
 
 http://www.huffingtonpost.com/larry-david/on-the-red-phone_b_90338.html 
 
 
Heh...!

I liked FreeDuck's, too.
 
 
While we're on a Huffingtonpost kick, I thought this was interesting, from Susan Rice:

 http://www.huffingtonpost.com/susan-rice/cmon-senators-clinton-a_b_90336.html 

 
In this election we have two candidates who will manipulate the truth and one, Senator Obama, who will tell it.

Last night on Tucker Carlson's show, I said that Senator Clinton, Senator Obama, and Senator McCain have never had to answer that proverbial 3 a.m. crisis phone call; only a commander in chief has shouldered that unique burden.

You can watch what I actually said. The full transcript of this portion of my interview is below.

Rather than acknowledge this indisputable truth, Senator Clinton's campaign chose to edit selectively and thus grossly distort my words in a video it sent to reporters and posted on Youtube. Senator McCain's campaign also misrepresented and manipulated my statement.
 

Links in original.
 
 
One more... I keep saying this!!

 
The Clinton Campaign's post March 4th message is to forget about the delegate count and nominate Hillary because she can win the big states Democrats need in November. That argument simply doesn't hold up to scrutiny. Here's why:

1) Most of the "Big States" she has won are not battleground states in the fall. New York, New Jersey, Massachusetts and California are solid blue states where Obama would do as well or better than Clinton in a general election against McCain.

2) Of the states she's won so far, the big exception to this rule is Ohio. Ohio is in fact a critical battleground state where Hillary has demonstrated that she has a leg up among lower income whites and older voters. But the polling also shows that in a general election, Barack offsets this advantage in Ohio among young voters and college-educated independents. In a McCain-Clinton match up the later group could gravitate heavily to McCain in Ohio.

In an Ohio general election, Obama's ability to attract independents and mobilize young and minority voters will trump Clinton's advantages among non-college whites -- a group that will break heavily for either Barack or Hillary against the "free trade" McCain.
 

 http://www.huffingtonpost.com/robert-creamer/clintons-big-state-myt_b_90115.html 

(That's just the beginning, he gives 4 more reasons, too.)
 
 
 http://www.donnabrazile.com/viewNews.cfm?id=256 

 
...Unless the Democrats have a strong nominee who can demonstrate that he or she won fair and respected the rules, what happens then will be nothing short of a civil war within the Democratic Party. And steps must be taken now to avoid that type of internal bloodletting.

In 2004, the District of Columbia City Council, daring the Democratic Party to further disenfranchise tax-paying residents who lack voting rights in the U.S. Congress, voted to hold the first primary election in the country. What happened then is relevant to what's happening now.

...

Talk about drama. The Rev. Al Sharpton was on the ballot, along with first black woman to ever serve in the U.S. Senate, Carol Moseley Braun. Here I am, a black woman, taking on two black candidates who would have greatly benefited from the District of Columbia's being first in the nation. Yes, I took some hits that left scars, but rules are rules. It's more important to protect the integrity of the process than to be blinded by loyalty to one's own.

I believe the DNC had no choice in 2004 but to enforce its rules. Therefore, regarding Florida and Michigan, I believe that in spite of the risk of alienating millions of voters in states that could ultimately decide the election this fall, Howard Dean and party officials must also stick to the rules.

With two-thirds of the primary contests already completed, the DNC cannot allow the Florida and Michigan delegates to decide the nomination. It would be wrong. And it would be dangerous.

The democratic process is the product of years of evolution to produce a fair and open system. Allowing two electorally vibrant states to disregard the rules without penalty will jeopardize the integrity of the process and the ability of both major parties to put in place nominating rules that are fair, inclusive and consistent with precedent. It will open the door to disregarding rules governing equal division, an open process and representation goals. Besides, if this were about a state party's disregarding the equal division rule, there would be no debate. So why treat the timing rule differently?

...

The bottom line is that we need to think this through and talk with officials from those two states who are willing to come up with a workable alternative that does not ask the DNC or the nominee to act as if nothing happened. This issue is bigger than who we select to lead our party. It's about whether rules should govern us through the process or be ignored to manipulate the process.

Laws and rules are not suggestions. When we decide to break the laws and rules governing our society, we do so knowing that we risk paying the price for it. Florida and Michigan elected officials as well as party leaders knew the price for breaking the rules. If they don't pay it, there will be no rules governing the 2012 election process. There will only be suggestions and chaos.
 
 
 
I know this is a place for blogs; but I am interested; do you think Hillary succeeded in stemming back Obama's streak of winning and would that hurt him in the final primary election?

[I hope not; the more Hillary campaigns the less I like her; I just never knew she had all that negative manipulative stuff in her; guess I never seen her from the other side; still like Bill though; can't help myself; realize these little comments are kind of fluffy and silly; nevertheless; its what I feel and people do bring their feelings into the election booth.]
 
 
Of course.

And this isn't just for posting links or whatever, personal musings (another purpose of blogs) are welcome too.

I can't quite get a grip on things yet. I'm very, very annoyed that whatever happened in Texas is being uncritically called a "win" for Hillary. That seems to be an open question until the caucuses are decided. She won the primary, yes. However, Obama seems to have won the caucus, and he may have won it by enough that he's won Texas. I just don't know how that's determined, though. Just delegates don't seem to be enough -- Hillary "won" NH and NV but Obama got more delegates out of those races. It seems to have to do with percentage of the vote -- even so, if you add the primary and caucus percentages and then average them, it seems like Obama won Texas.

Upshot -- I think that if this gets settled in a reasonable time frame and if it can be said "hey wait, she didn't win Texas!", that could help.

But I don't know if that will happen. I don't think it needs to, though it would be nice.

I really trust Obama to get things back on track. This is part of what I like about him. I think he'll survey the landscape, figure out the best thing to do, and do it. I know he's doing a bunch of little town hall type things -- that's a good decision, I think. He's got substance, good to push it for a while. He did a lot of that in the time leading up to Iowa.

And I think that Hillary is now locked in to an aggressive, kitchen-sink approach because it seemed to work -- but a) I'm not sure that it worked, and b) I think it's a good thing for Obama to pivot off of. Snipe, snipe, snipe -- people get sick of that.

And re: "I'm not sure it worked," a lot of things were going on. I think the SNL thing really, really helped Hillary. I think that it did a bunch of things at once, but one thing I think it did was legitimize her claims of unfairness which resulted in a media "correction" and much harder/ tougher coverage of Obama at exactly the wrong moment for him. The NAFTA thing was a gift.

In short -- I think it's very possible that everything worked out to give her a lift in Ohio and Texas exactly when she most needed it, but won't be a long-term benefit. (To take NAFTA as an example, it now looks like her campaign was at least as culpable if not more culpable than Obama's, with some possibility of Obama's campaign not having done anything.)

I'm a little worried about Wyoming -- it seems like it's assumed it will be an easy Obama win but I'm not sure about that. But things should be back on track with Mississippi I think, and Obama has a lot of room for inroads and Hillary has a lot of room for self-sabotage. There is still a lot of discord within her campaign and I think that's going to keep coming out and causing problems.

We'll see!
 
 
Thanks sozobe. I have a feeling that even if it turns out Obama won Texas because of the caucuses; it won't help because first headlines seem to be hard to overcome. Like when a newspaper makes a mistake, they make a correction way in the back kind of thing.

But I hope your right that Obama will figure out how to turn things back around.

His aides calling Hillary a "monster" might not have helped; but then again; it might have. One thing for sure; it reenforces the image of Hillary being an aggressive meanie. (don't like to use the other word)
 
 
I think it could be a net positive -- it was just the one person, and Obama jumped on it pretty quickly, "That's not the kind of campaign we're running here," and she apologized. (Plus she's a she. Seriously. I think it'd be much more dangerous if it was a guy who made the comment.)

Reinforcements of the kind of campaign Obama wants to run -- vs. the kind Hillary is running -- are good, I think.
 
 
 
"That's not the kind of campaign we're running here,"
 

That was a paraphrase, thought I'd get the actual  statement  :

 
Obama spokesman Bill Burton said, "Sen. Obama decries such characterizations, which have no place in this campaign."
 
 
 
 
Does anyone not love Larry David?

 
On the Red Phone
Posted March 6, 2008 | 09:00 PM (EST)
 

 

You do realise that there's all kinds of dubiously gendered characterisations in there, right? :wink:

(As in, I dont mind, it's a column - but if I'd posted it I'd be wary of your unavoidable response   )
 
 
What I'd like to know is where are all those panels of authoritative experts that were trotted out all over Iowa early last year as each of Obama's major issue positions were rolled out? Why aren't any of them making the rounds of the news shows on behalf of Obama? He has a long list of advisors. Where are their voices? Why aren't there more of those panels of advisors making the rounds on the campaign trail with him in a continuing series of town meetings or holding press conferences to highlight various aspects of their advisories?

Axelrod is running a great campaign but he needs some strong specialists to knock down the nastiness and avoid the need for Obama himself to go negative either in person or through ads.
 
 
Samantha Power resigns. Damn.

Probably the best decision but it  appears  that she was a really valuable member of the team.
 
 
Hopefully it will free her up to speak out more about Hillary without the baggage of protecting the Obama campaign.

If you aren't familiar with it, this article helps explain Samatha's disdane for the Clintons.

 http://www.theatlantic.com/doc/200109/power-genocide 
 
 
Here's a direct link to the TPM article:

 http://tpmelectioncentral.talkingpointsmemo.com/2008/03/power_resigns_over_hillaryismo.php 
 
 
 
 
 
I've been skeptical of the "Hillary campaign makes Obama look blacker" thing I've been seeing for the past couple of days, but this doesn't look too good:

 http://www.dailykos.com/storyonly/2008/3/5/131156/5021/187/469677 
 
  Her people probably figured it would reflect a little badly on her, but at the end of the day; he's still black, and they succeeded at making people talk about it. The word "scumbag" is getting ever closer to the tip of my tongue. I wonder what Blatham thinks about this 
 

Once again, I'm a little alarmed at how much our biases or fears effect our emotions, perceptions and thoughts (and on how modern political campaigns, via modern media, operate in the realm of emotions far, far moreso than the realm of rationalism). This election is shaking the foundation of a bunch of my assumptions/certainties on self and on others. And this issue is a wonderful example.

About three weeks ago, the three main cable news networks (cnn, msnbc, fox) were carrying an Obama speech and each were using their own separate camera feed and broadcast system. As I flipped back and forth, it was immediately evident that the Fox image was considerably darker. It made his face darker along with the faces of everyone cheering behind him. Do I have to tell you what I suspected? I seriously considered mentioning it here. I didn't. I hope I didn't because of an awareness of the tenuousness of such a claim but I'm not even sure if that was the reason.

Internal links to the piece available at source site.
 
That's not much of an answer, Blatham. Frankly; it makes me question the Fact Check site's integrity. I do screenshots all the time, and guess what? Not only does a screenshot record the color identically, but it absolutely requires an extra step to distort the shape of the image. (Try it yourself by clicking the "Print Screen" button on your keyboard and then pasting the image into your Paint program. If you have trouble; ask any 10 year old to help you. My point? If a 10 year old can do it right, effortlessly, doesn't that mean a professional would have to do it wrong intentionally ?

It made Republicans look bad to smear a well decorated Vet 3 year's ago... but said Vet was just as smeared wasn't he? Who sustained more damage from the dirty trick? This is text-book Blatham-alarm material. Pull your antennae out of your hind end.
 
 
 
Of course.

I can't quite get a grip on things yet. I'm very, very annoyed that whatever happened in Texas is being uncritically called a "win" for Hillary.
 

Just for you, Sozobe!

 
 
 
Heh.

It seems possible that the delegate swing from California (+8 Obama) could wipe out Hillary gains on March 4th. As in, not even that one little coin.

There's the media narrative though, of course.

 This , from Jonathan Chait, got my neck sore from nodding again. Another one that I recommend the whole thing, but for a flavor:

 
Still, there are a few flaws in Clinton's trial-by-smear method. The first is that her attacks on Obama are not a fair proxy for what he'd endure in the general election, because attacks are harder to refute when they come from within one's own party. Indeed, Clinton is saying almost exactly the same things about Obama that McCain is: He's inexperienced, lacking in substance, unequipped to handle foreign policy. As The Washington Monthly's Christina Larson has pointed out, in recent weeks the nightly newscasts have consisted of Clinton attacking Obama, McCain attacking Obama, and then Obama trying to defend himself and still get out his own message. If Obama's the nominee, he won't have a high-profile Democrat validating McCain's message every day.
 
 
 
Heh - Jonathan Chaits grumbles about Hillary, McCain and spin:

 
 Weekend Spin Patrol 

A couple campaign statements caught my eye, and I wanted to point them out before the weekend. First, John McCain  says  of his supporter, John Hagee, "I repudiate any comments that are made, including Pastor Hagee's, if they are anti-Catholic or offensive to Catholics." If they were anti-Catholic? Hagee called the Catholic Church "the great whore" and a "false cult system." So, yeah, that would seem to be pretty anti-Catholic. McCain construction is the classic non-apology apology -- I apologize if anybody was offended. Hey, some people might like being called "the great whore." Prostitutes, for example. But if others disagree, McCain feels their pain, too.

Second, Hillary Clinton's campaign  says  Barack Obama is "unable to make an affirmative case for his candidacy beyond ad hominem attacks." Meanwhile, her campaign is sending out a fundraising email saying "Stand Up to Attack Politics." Riiight... because if anybody is going to end attack politics, it's Hillary Clinton. If Clinton wins the nomination, the one lesson politicians everywhere will take from it is that attack politics don't work.

How do they say these things? All politicians, including Obama, spin. But the way the Clinton campaign says night is day is just especially audacious. It's as if they have internalized the attacks they suffered in the 1990s to such a degree that they believe to their core that the only way to win is to imitate their worst tormentors. I think Obama and his staff say things they at least believe to be essentially true. Working for Clinton has to be a soul-deadening experience.
 
 
 
My little head's spinning.

Love it.
 
 
More random snark:

 
I highly recommend Dana's comments on Samantha Power's regrettable departure from the Obama campaign. For one thing, this makes it less likely that a future administration will hire Power and Anne-Marie Slaughter at the same time, and I was really looking forward to writing about Secretaries Slaughter and Power. So that's a bummer.
 

(  Ezra  )

I can just see President Obama, the very icon of an American newly conciliatory, principled, and open for dialogue, entering a meeting hall to negotiate with the head of state of a distant and suspicious country: "Hello - I am President Obama, and these are my advisors, Secretaries Slaughter and Power"...

(Ok, you gotta get yer smiles from something if you're stuck reading blogs)
 
 
Actually nimh; it won 't be power as Obama accepted her resignation yesterday.

 Obama aide quits over Clinton "monster" comment 

Seriously though; (that is true but there is a more important comment I want to make) why don't Obama answer these charges of Hillary's of "sound bite" and "rhetoric." If anything it is the other way around with Hillary using conservative "sound bites" to attack Obama with, sound bites which don't even have any validity to them but have somehow stuck kind of like the silly "flip flop" did for Kerry in 2004. The Obama campaign might think answering them gives it more validity but not answering them just leaves it out there with no rebuttal. He needs to find a way to say that Hillary is only attacking him with negative comments because she can't win on her own merits. It wasn't until she turned really ugly that her votes started to turn in her favor which says a lot about American voters. It really shouldn't be that big of a surprise given the last few elections. He should stress how Hillary supported NAFTA until it politically unpopular and she supported the Iraq until it became politically unpopular. He needs to stress how she goes by the polls to form her political views on some thing. He needs to stress about how her health care will end up costing the working poor the most with this mandatory health coverage. They may have more money than the threshold but other factors might make it a hardship to have the health coverage which by law they have to have under her plan. There are a lot of areas which Obama can attack her on and he needs to get to it rather than just talking about change with veiled subtle references to Hillary which really do not resonate to the voting too well. He needs to get a little negative in order to win; that is simply reality.
 
 
I'm not sure it necessarily follows that Power wouldn't have a place in his administration just because she's quit advising him for his campaign. At least I hope it doesn't.
 
 
Sure would like to verify this with another source....

 the truth about Hillary speaking for woman's rights in China 

 
I have noticed with great interest that Sen. Clinton speaks glowingly of her foreign policy experience and to prove it she brings up how she spoke for womens rights in China. She never pushes that too loudly possibly assuming that no one will remember exactly what happened at that time or has any connection to China that will expose her ridiculous story.

Let me fill you in.

I assume Mrs. Clinton is talking about the Beijing Woman's Conference in September of 1995.

My husband and had a company in Guangzhou China and we were involved in exposing the traficking of women and children for sexual exploitation.

Our group had been personally invited to talk to that conference by people in Beijing,,most especially one of the Vice Premiers of China, Wu Yi. Wu Yi was considered the second most powerful WOMAN in the world.

So my husband and I worked with women who had been in prostitution since the age of 8 to get them to talk on stage about what the situation was like.

Then in the June before the conference an Activist named Harry Wu was arrested entering China. Wu had videos of forced organ harvesting of Chinese prisoners.

The Clintons immediately jumped on the bandwagon to say that Mrs. Clinton would not be attending the conference until Harry Wu was released.

Well Harry Wu was surprisingly released and deported just in time for Mrs. Ckinton to change her mind.

It was all very sudden no one outside China knew why Wu had been released. Someday I will explain what happened but I do not want to stray from my point.

Mrs. Clinton rushed to speak and a big deal was made by the Clintons about woman's rights in China. We were bumped from the program to make room for her. Our women whom we had promised protection for speaking out, vanished into their under world.

And Hillary blathered about an issue from an AMERICAN perspective.

It changed nothing that would not have changed on it's own.

Today China has mobile execution vans.

You can be arrested and executed for being a member of the Falun Gong or because you are an orphan or a bicycle thief. China has a thriving black market organ trade You can order organs in advance.

Woman's Rights cannot be separated from human rights.

Why did Hillary say nothing about Harry Wu's charges? Was she afraid to insult the Chinese? What about today the Falun Gong? Where does she stand on them?

We know she can answer a phone at 3AM when it is choreographed and orchestrated but can she stand up to those who would violate human rights in the most hideous of ways-the black market- sex traders, human traffickers, the drug and armament dealers ?

She didn't when she had the chance and she covered her tap dance in the name of woman's rights!
 
 
 
 Nobel winner: Hillary Clinton's 'silly' Irish peace claims 

 
Hillary Clinton had no direct role in bringing peace to Northern Ireland and is a "wee bit silly" for exaggerating the part she played, according to Lord Trimble of Lisnagarvey, the Nobel Peace Prize winner and former First Minister of the province.

"I don't know there was much she did apart from accompanying Bill [Clinton] going around," he said. Her recent statements about being deeply involved were merely "the sort of thing people put in their canvassing leaflets" during elections. "She visited when things were happening, saw what was going on, she can certainly say it was part of her experience. I don't want to rain on the thing for her but being a cheerleader for something is slightly different from being a principal player."

Mrs Clinton has made Northern Ireland key to her claims of having extensive foreign policy experience, which helped her defeat Barack Obama in Ohio and Texas on Tuesday after she presented herself as being ready to tackle foreign policy crises at 3am.

"I helped to bring peace to Northern Ireland," she told CNN on Wednesday. But negotiators from the parties that helped broker the Good Friday Agreement in 1998 told The Daily Telegraph that her role was peripheral and that she played no part in the gruelling political talks over the years.

 

More at the link...
 
 
Butrflynet
Butrflynet, I found several sources for the Hillary Clinton-Harry Wu issue on this google page.---BBB

 http://www.google.com/search?hl=en&ie=ISO-8859-1&q=Hillary+Clinton+protest+about+Harry+Wu+in+China&btnG=Google+Search 
 
 
nimh quotes Chait
 
It's as if they have internalized the attacks they suffered in the 1990s to such a degree that they believe to their core that the only way to win is to imitate their worst tormentors. I think Obama and his staff say things they at least believe to be essentially true. Working for Clinton has to be a soul-deadening experience.
 

Less poetically (if that's the right word...it isn't, but it's the best I can come up with) this seems to be just what Larry David was voicing in the piece I quoted here yesterday.

I'm seriously mixed on this. I honestly do not know if power and control can be wrested away from this lot who presently hold it by means much less 'pragmatic' than jugular-piercing.

Is Hillary experienced or is she more correctly understood as being traumatized? Tough one.

On right wing radio this morning, the compelling argument was forwarded that Obama IS a Muslim - absolutely no question about it - because his father was a Muslim and by Sharia law that makes Barack a Muslim. And if Barack were to say, "No, I'm not a Muslim" then he will be in violation of Sharia law, eligible for the death sentence under that code and therefore how could he possibly talk with or deal with Muslim leaders and nations? And millions will swallow this or something else like it said by some other rightwing lunatic today.
 
 
Re: Butrflynet

 
Butrflynet, I found several sources for the Hillary Clinton-Harry Wu issue on this google page.---BBB

 http://www.google.com/search?hl=en&ie=ISO-8859-1&q=Hillary+Clinton+protest+about+Harry+Wu+in+China&btnG=Google+Search 
 

This is the part I am wanting to verify with another source:

 
Our group had been personally invited to talk to that conference by people in Beijing,,most especially one of the Vice Premiers of China, Wu Yi. Wu Yi was considered the second most powerful WOMAN in the world.

So my husband and I worked with women who had been in prostitution since the age of 8 to get them to talk on stage about what the situation was like.

Then in the June before the conference an Activist named Harry Wu was arrested entering China. Wu had videos of forced organ harvesting of Chinese prisoners.

The Clintons immediately jumped on the bandwagon to say that Mrs. Clinton would not be attending the conference until Harry Wu was released.
 

 
Mrs. Clinton rushed to speak and a big deal was made by the Clintons about woman's rights in China. We were bumped from the program to make room for her. Our women whom we had promised protection for speaking out, vanished into their under world.

 

Is it true that Hillary Clinton did not even mention the issue of forced human organ harvesting in her speech even after insisting the person who had video proof of it happening be released from prison and replacing the pre-scheduled speakers on that very topic?

Is it true that she replaced those scheduled speakers?

Is it true that Wu had video proof of the organ harvesting?

Did she agree to not mention the issue in trade for Wu being released? Did she help China cover up the story by doing so?

I'm looking for a transcript of her speech but haven't found it yet. I think the article I posted is mostly in error but need to see her speech to convince others that the article is wrong.

I recall her speech being mostly about women's rights and human rights but I don't recall a specific mention about forced organ harvesting. It seems a little odd that she'd insist on Wu being released before attending yet never mention the video proof he allegedly had.

It makes some people suspicious of a cover up deal being made to hush talk on the issue in return for him being released so she could speak at the conference.
 
 
Hillary Clinton's "My Lai" Strategy?

 http://blogs.abcnews.com/politicalpunch/2008/03/hillary-clinton.html 

 
She's destroying the party in order to save it.that seems to be the conclusion of a some opinion writers today

 
 
 
Just getting caught up on some things -- gotta grab this one:

 
Please

I guess these things run in cycles. But let's get real and admit that Hillary Clinton is getting the free ride of all free rides on her repeated invocations of foreign policy experience. As part of her foreign policy experience Clinton claims "I helped to bring peace to Northern Ireland."

The whole quote is as follows...

You know, I was involved for 15 years in, you know, foreign policy and security policy. You know, I helped to bring peace to Northern Ireland. I negotiated open borders to let fleeing refugees into safety from Kosovo. I've been standing up against, you know, the Chinese government over women's rights and standing up for human rights in many different places. I've served on the Senate Armed Services Committee. And I was the only senator of either party asked to be on an important task force put together by the Pentagon under this administration to figure out what to do with our military going forward.

Now, the Chicago Tribune reports that the borders in question were opened the day before Clinton arrived in the region. But the Northern Ireland claim is the kicker. George Mitchell, who's obviously a friend, has called Clinton's role 'helpful', according to CNN. But the UK papers today have David Trimble, a key unionist leader and former First Minister and Irish historian Tim Pat Coogan both pooh-poohing her claims. Coogan says her role was "part of the stage effects, the optics."

These are the sorts of puffed up claims that get other candidates held up to mockery and derision. But Clinton is using them as cudgels in her effort to portray Obama as a lightweight with no experience dealing with foreign policy crises. And basically she's getting a pass. I guess it speaks to the advantages of staying on offense, which can never be gainsaid. But she's still getting a big pass on this and a lot else.
 

 http://talkingpointsmemo.com/archives/182351.php 
 
 
 Dean Says Solution for Democrat Dilemma Up to Florida, Michigan 
 
 
Thanks, revel.

Some plonks:

Two from Marc Ambinder, "Hill Raisers Down by One":

 http://marcambinder.theatlantic.com/archives/2008/03/hill_raisers_down_by_one.php 

and

"The Legacy of a Strategic Decision":

 http://marcambinder.theatlantic.com/archives/2008/03/the_legacy_of_a_strategic_deci.php 

(That one's about the Clinton campaign's decision to bypass caucuses and consequences thereof.)

Then this from The Swamp, "How Clinton camp justifies Obama VP but not CinC" ("CinC = Commander in Chief):

 http://www.swamppolitics.com/news/politics/blog/2008/03/how_clinton_camp_justifies_oba.html 
 
 
This article from the Milwaukee Journal Sentinel argues that the ongoing nomination fight carries sharp disadvantages for the Democrats, of course, but also some advantages:

 
 Democratic infighting a mixed blessing for McCain 

By CRAIG GILBERT
Milwaukee Journal Sentinel

Four years ago at this time, GOP nominee George W. Bush was sitting on more than $100 million, launching a huge national ad campaign and building the most sophisticated army of volunteers his party had ever seen.

John McCain is way behind that pace on every count.

So it's with relief and glee that many Republicans are embracing the dramatic standoff between Democrats Barack Obama and Hillary Rodham Clinton, a messy marathon that gives McCain more time to put his own campaign together "without a gun to his head," says Mark Graul, who organized Wisconsin for Bush in 2004.

Even better, the Arizona Republican gets to watch the two Democrats not only beat each other up but use some of McCain's own arguments in doing so, questioning each other's credibility, Senate record and foreign policy experience.

"They'll be making it more believable and more credible when McCain uses (those lines of attack) because they will have been saying it for months," says GOP pollster Bill McInturff, who has worked for McCain.

Political scientist Barry Burden likens it to a football team that gets a bye in the first round of the playoffs and can watch its potential opponents play each other first.

"They have all the film. They can look at all their weaknesses," says Burden, a professor at the University of Wisconsin-Madison.

That doesn't mean it's an unqualified blessing for McCain to have the Democratic race plow on through spring and into summer, no clean end in sight.

"A long Democratic battle doesn't automatically help the Republicans," longtime Bush strategist Karl Rove wrote in Thursday's Wall Street Journal, two days after Clinton's victories in Ohio, Texas and Rhode Island revived her candidacy. "In fact, it hurts the Republicans in certain ways. Mr. McCain becomes less interesting to the media. Stories about him move off page one and grow smaller. TV coverage becomes spotty and short."

Nor is it automatically bad for Democrats for the race to go on. At a minimum, it will mean weeks of intense effort now by the party in the key fall battleground of Pennsylvania (which votes April 22) and possibly the swing states of Florida and Michigan, if those contests are "replayed" after a party rules dispute. It will mean sustained attention for Obama and Clinton, and it could harden and elevate the future winner.

But depending on how long and nasty the race is, it also could embitter key parts of the party's base and scar both Clinton and Obama. The likelihood that neither will have an undisputed claim on the nomination is a formula for resentment [..].

The two Democrats increasingly are using what will be GOP talking points against each other: Clinton raising the specter of a scary foreign policy crisis and suggesting that Obama would not be prepared to handle it; Obama questioning Clinton's own foreign policy experience and offering reminders about Clinton's political baggage.

"I don't think this race has been destructive so far," says GOP pollster McInturff of the Democratic contest. "But I think there's a good chance in the next two or three months that what the rest of this race will produce could effectively diminish both of them. Now she has started with, `He's not ready to be president.'... Imagine if John McCain is running that ad."

Marquette University political scientist John McAdams said that process is especially perilous for Obama.

"Until recently, he's largely gotten away with portraying himself as being somehow above politics," says McAdams. "The more he has to mix it up, the more he looks like just another politician."

Many, though not all, GOP insiders view Obama as a potentially tougher fall opponent. So they welcome not only a protracted Democratic fight, but Clinton's comeback. [..]

And while the Democrats duel, McCain has more time to get his house in order, raise money, assemble a national staff and field teams in the battlegrounds, and flesh out a policy agenda that some believe has major gaps in it. [..]
 
 
 
Sure hope that silver-lining stuff pans out.

Meanwhile, February19th:

 
Hillary spokesperson Phil Singer is adamantly denying a report this morning in The Politico quoting an anonymous campaign official suggesting that the Clinton campaign will pursue Obama's pledged delegates. Singer sends me this:

We have not, are not and will not pursue the pledged delegates of Barack Obama. It's now time for the Obama campaign to be clear about their intentions.
 

 http://tpmelectioncentral.talkingpointsmemo.com/2008/02/clinton_spokesperson_we_will_n.php 

March ? (March 17th issue) (Hillary's speaking):

 
It doesn't look bleak at all. I have a very close race with Senator Obama. There are elected delegates, caucus delegates and superdelegates, all for different reasons, and they're all equal in their ability to cast their vote for whomever they choose. Even elected and caucus delegates are not required to stay with whomever they are pledged to. This is a very carefully constructed process that goes back years, and we're going to follow the process.
 

 http://www.newsweek.com/id/120062/page/1 
 
 
 Mail-in Primary  in Fl and Michigan looks likely.
 
 
Good to see you around Swimpy. How's the snow?
 
 
I think there's still a problem in terms of funding, but it looks like one of the more likely scenarios, yep.

A typically long and thorough post by hilzoy:

 http://obsidianwings.blogs.com/obsidian_wings/2008/03/hilary-clinton.html 

Flavor/ upshot:

 
Bill Clinton claims that Hillary Clinton urged him to intervene militarily in Rwanda:

And then, using a more somber tone, he explained that she had wanted the United States to intervene in Rwanda in 1994, when hundreds of thousands of people died in a genocide that lasted just a few months. Clinton has often said that not acting in Rwanda was one of his biggest regrets. It's a decision, he said, for which he continues to try to make amends. Had he listened to his wife, Clinton said, things might have been different. "I believe if I had moved we might have saved at least a third of those lives," he said. "I think she clearly would have done that."

When Hillary Clinton was asked whether this was true, she said "It is."

[...]

So: Clinton didn't mention that she advocated military intervention in Rwanda in her memoirs. Neither did Madeleine Albright. Neither, as far as I can tell, did anyone else. Military intervention was not considered as an option, "never even debated", which means that any advocacy she did engage in must have been pretty ineffective.

[...]

Of course, I think it's a lot more likely that she either didn't advocate action on Rwanda at all, or did so only in passing. If so, this would have to be the definitive example of her attempt to claim responsibility for everything good that happened during her husband's presidency, while disavowing all responsibility for his mistakes. This was, in my opinion, the most shameful moment of the Clinton administration. It ought, by rights, to have a place in Hillary Clinton's "thirty five years of experience working for change." Or perhaps she might claim that she wasn't that interested in foreign policy at the time, or that for whatever reason she just didn't pick up on the genocide in Rwanda until it was too late to act. That would at least be honest.

But if, in fact, Clinton missed the chance to urge her husband to help stop the Rwandan genocide, then she should not pretend that she was, in fact, right there on the side of the angels all along. That's just grotesque.
 
 
 
Did you read about Al Sharpton and his efforts to gather signatures from people in Florida who did not vote the first time around because they believed the vote would not count?

It is a great counter-measure to the argument about seating the delegates as is for the first version of the vote.
 
 
Yep! Commented over thisaway:

 http://www.able2know.org/forums/viewtopic.php?p=3138081#3138081 
 
 
Thought you might be interested in this if you haven't already seen it. Will crosspost it on Nimh's numbers thread.

 http://www.cleveland.com/printer/printer.ssf?/base/news/120505162549970.xml&coll=2 

Excerpt:

 
A staggering 16,000-plus Republicans in Cuyahoga County switched parties when they voted in last week's primary.

That includes 931 in Rocky River, 1,027 in Westlake and 1,142 in Strongsville. More than a third of the Republicans in Solon and Bay Village switched. Pepper Pike had the most dramatic change: just under half its Republicans became Democrats. And some of those who changed - it's difficult to say how many - could be in trouble with the law.

At least one member of the Cuyahoga County Board of Elections wants to investigate some Republicans who may have crossed party lines only to influence which Democrat would face presumed Republican nominee John McCain in November.

Those who crossed lines were supposed to sign a pledge card vowing allegiance to their new party.

In Cuyahoga County, dozens and dozens of Republicans scribbled addendums onto their pledges as new Democrats:

"For one day only."

"I don't believe in abortion."

A Plain Dealer review of thousands of records showed few of those who switched were challenged by poll workers.

Sandy McNair, a Democratic member of the Cuyahoga County Board of Elections, said Friday that the manipulation of the system was troublesome.

"It's something that concerns me, that I think needs to be looked at further," McNair said. "This is not a structural thing by the Republican Party. If it's a problem at all, it's on an individual level."

Lying on the pledge is a felony, punishable by six to 12 months in jail and a $2,500 fine.

 
 
 
<waves at Buttrflynet> Snows trying to melt. At least the big storm over the weekend missed us. Got soz, though.
 
 
16,000 x $2,500 = 40 million smackers. They could let them off the tank.

They are bang to rights I presume.
 
 
 
Thought you might be interested in this if you haven't already seen it. Will crosspost it on Nimh's numbers thread.

 http://www.cleveland.com/printer/printer.ssf?/base/news/120505162549970.xml&coll=2 

Excerpt:

 
"For one day only."
 

 

 

I hadn't already seen that, no.

By the way that was another reason I thought of for why Obama did better in caucuses than the primary, but just Texas-specific -- that the "keep her in it so she can win it" people weren't going to do that at the caucus, too.

But I'd believe that a segment of those 16,000 were actual Obamacans; people who either really will vote for him if he becomes the nominee, or who think McCain and Obama are the two best candidates and have to think more about which one they'll vote for.

The "one day only" thing is pretty damning, though...!

On a possibly related subject, Bill Clinton evidently went on Limbaugh on the day of the TX primary.

 http://tpmcafe.talkingpointsmemo.com/talk/2008/03/wtf-bill-clinton-on-rush-limba.php 
 
 
 
On a possibly related subject, Bill Clinton evidently went on Limbaugh on the day of the TX primary.

 http://tpmcafe.talkingpointsmemo.com/talk/2008/03/wtf-bill-clinton-on-rush-limba.php 
 

These are the people Okie and crew describe as socialist liberals...  
 
 
 
Got soz, though.
 

Sure did! 20+ inches. Now it's 44 and the sun is out and it's melting pretty fast, though.
 
 
 
16,000 x $2,500 = 40 million smackers. They could let them off the tank.

They are bang to rights I presume.
 

If that's daft does it means only some of the laws have to be obeyed in the US?
 
 
This looks like it could be a good idea if it appears that the Pennsylvania vote will be a blow out for Clinton.

 Will Obama go on a Foreign Policy Tour? 
 
 
Do you really think bfn that that is of the slightest importance compared to the question I had asked.

If you do you are apolitical to a tee.
 
 
 
Do you really think bfn that that is of the slightest importance compared to the question I had asked.
 

Who's paying attention to your questions? :wink:
 
 
I don't know.

Who's paying attention to yours?

Are some felonies okay and some not is all I asked.

Do you really think that- "Who's paying attention to your questions?" provides a satisfactory riposte to that, wink and all?

It's another variant on "Why can't we talk about Octavia's new hairstyle".
 
 
I still can't figure out what the question is that you're trying to ask...

I got the part about the 16,000 voters times the $2500 fine per person...

the rest of it was a bunch of garbled musings...
 
 
Hardly.

You said earlier that 16,000 Republicans had committed a felony carrying a $2,500 fine in Cuyahoga County.

I was wondering what was going on. Electoral fraud is considered serious here.

Fining them all would bring in $40 million and not fining them opens up the possibility that not all felonies are prosecuted.

Why is it a felony? Would the primaries not work if it isn't? Can you choose which laws to disobey?

It's me who is confused.
 
 
Spendius, while nothing would please me more than to see the Democrats follow-up and try to prosecute the 'crossovers', I think even they realize a) it would not help their party politically, and b) there's a good chance it is unconstitutional. Don't expect to see any real action from the Democrats on this one.
 
 
Thanks.

But I don't understand it. I don't see why there's a felony involved and if there is I don't see why there are no prosecutions.

One could say that if 16,000 had a Public Space "smoke-in" they wouldn't be prosecuted. Or a "goose-a-typist behind the filing cabinets" festival for that matter.

Are felonies when only a small number commit them?

It seems an interesting constitutional confusion to someone who can vote anyway right up to the last moment.

Not that I vote. Perish the thought.
 
 
I think it's mostly just extremely hard to prosecute. It's about what people are thinking.

"Did you REALLY vote for Hillary because you think she's the best Democratic nominee?"

"Yes."

"Um. OK. Next!"
 
 
I still don't know why it's a felony. Where was the riot squad?
 
 
Where's Setanta when you need him?
 
 
Voting fraud.

I personally am against unenforceable rules, but there are probably times when it can be enforced.
 
 
 
Hardly.

You said earlier that 16,000 Republicans had committed a felony carrying a $2,500 fine in Cuyahoga County.

I was wondering what was going on. Electoral fraud is considered serious here.

Fining them all would bring in $40 million and not fining them opens up the possibility that not all felonies are prosecuted.

Why is it a felony? Would the primaries not work if it isn't? Can you choose which laws to disobey?

It's me who is confused.
 

1. I didn't say anything. I posted an article.
2. The article did not say that all 16,000 had committed a felony. That was the number of people who crossed parties to vote. Within that number, the article cited some examples of suspicious activity and quoted someone saying there should be an investigation.

 
At least one member of the Cuyahoga County Board of Elections wants to investigate some Republicans who may have crossed party lines only to influence which Democrat would face presumed Republican nominee John McCain in November.

Those who crossed lines were supposed to sign a pledge card vowing allegiance to their new party.

In Cuyahoga County, dozens and dozens of Republicans scribbled addendums onto their pledges as new Democrats:

"For one day only."

"I don't believe in abortion."

A Plain Dealer review of thousands of records showed few of those who switched were challenged by poll workers.

Sandy McNair, a Democratic member of the Cuyahoga County Board of Elections, said Friday that the manipulation of the system was troublesome.

"It's something that concerns me, that I think needs to be looked at further," McNair said. "This is not a structural thing by the Republican Party. If it's a problem at all, it's on an individual level."

Lying on the pledge is a felony, punishable by six to 12 months in jail and a $2,500 fine.

 

More details on what is raising concerns here:

 http://www.commondreams.org/archive/2008/03/10/7591/ 
 
 
Thanks for the link bfn.

One of the comments is-

 
There's evidence that the same thing happened in parts of Texas. So Hillary may not have legitimately won either Ohio or Texas. I wonder what'll happen now in Pennsylvania. The super delegates need to be kept aware of this. Write lots of letters!

It's hard to believe how screwed up our electoral system is.
 

Maybe European observers are required like in the Pakistan election.

It looks crazy from here.

Our media present it as cut and dried simple but scratch the surface and it looks like a right can of worms.

Who exactly is allowed to vote in primaries? And what % of the electorate are they?
 
 
 
Thanks for the link bfn.

One of the comments is-

 
There's evidence that the same thing happened in parts of Texas. So Hillary may not have legitimately won either Ohio or Texas. I wonder what'll happen now in Pennsylvania. The super delegates need to be kept aware of this. Write lots of letters!

It's hard to believe how screwed up our electoral system is.
 

Maybe European observers are required like in the Pakistan election.

It looks crazy from here.

Our media present it as cut and dried simple but scratch the surface and it looks like a right can of worms.

Who exactly is allowed to vote in primaries? And what % of the electorate are they?
 

I don't believe Texas has the same requirement as Ohio (the pledge signing) so the results there really can't be challenged. Any registered voter is 'allowed' to vote in their state's primary, although the rules vary from state to state on open or closed primaries. So, what's perfectly legal in one state may be considered a felony in another.
 
 
 
Maybe European observers are required like in the Pakistan election.

It looks crazy from here.

Our media present it as cut and dried simple but scratch the surface and it looks like a right can of worms.
 

It's completely insane. Usually a front-runner emerges early and then the rest is a formality and we don't have to examine this stuff up close. This year is different. I'm certainly learning all kinds of minutiae I was never aware of before...

 
Who exactly is allowed to vote in primaries? And what % of the electorate are they?
 

Varies from state to state. Some are closed -- you must be a Democrat (or a Republican) to vote in that party's primary, and must have registered as such by a certain date (Pennsylvania's cut-off is March 24th). Some are open -- anyone can vote for anyone from any party. Independents can be more complicated, I can't tell you that part off the top of my head.
 
 
Another aspect that varies from state to state is that some states allow voters to register/switch parties on election day while others require all registrations/party switches to occur a specific number of days before election day (varies from 15 to 30 in some states).

So, now there is also a third category of primary state, a "modified open" primary. Anyone can register/switch parties but it must be done a number of days before election day.

The sates where it is an open primary and they allow same day registration/party switching on election day is where we are seeing the problems.
 
 
It's not a problem if it's not illegal. Well, maybe to the Democrats it's a problem (Butrflynet and 'crew').
 
 
So, if a voter registration card has a pledge a person atests to in regard to their alliegence to a party before signing and that person modifies that pledge with phrases such as "only for one day" is that illegal?

If, according to the election board's rules, a poll worker is supposed to challenge such evident modified phrases to the pledge and did not do so, is that illegal?

Wasn't a college professor recently in the news because she was fired for modifying a pledge of nationalism on an application by editing the part about defending the constitution so it was in accordance with her religion's non-violent beliefs?
 
 
The whole pledge thing sounds pretty silly. Either have your primaries only open for Democrats, or open them up, for Independents or for Indies and Republicans alike. All of those are options state parties have. Inserting a pledge thing on top of that just seems like a useless - and lets be honest, meaningless - complication to throw in the mix, that'll only lead to arguments and shitstirring.
 
 
Agreed.
 
 
It's another irreducible complexity. There were very few of them when I was a kid. A pheasant laying fourteen eggs baffled me though.

I think all those straight-line state boundaries are a big problem. Our electoral map looks like a ball of wool a kitten has been playing with for half an hour. And they change it all the time, not without some heated discussions I might add, to preserve balance I suppose. They don't get tired like the kittens do.

My love of cats led me to back the Champion Hurdle winner today at 10- to 1. I wonder if I'm the only A2Ker to have done that today.

It got me thinking though. Are their any building restrictions near those lines? Some of the lines here go straight through some folks's houses.

We occasionally get one of those "make the time more easy passing" programmes where the piss-pot has one foot in one county and one in another while he rabbits on about something pointless and the camera crew show off their latest kit. The zoom lens say.

I've heard of the Boundary Club. It's a version of the 8 Mile High Club.

They might be myths though.

I can see you might have something like our Boundaries Commission within your states. But those state lines are set in stone. Here Lancashire County Cricket Club plays on a ground that hasn't been within Lancashire for donkey's years. And nobody care two hoots.

"Something there is that doesn't love a wall" Robert Frost.

Look at me quoting American poets to Americans.

Forgive me--we are feeling a little expansive tonight. We are all cat lovers.
 
 
spendius, There are several towns that exist on state lines, half in one state half in another. I think there is one city government but taxes are paid to the state in which your house is located. As far as voting districts is concerned, and for that matter congressional districts, they change all the time here, too. The process is called Gerrymandering for congressional redistricting.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Gerrymandering 
 
 
Swimpy wrote-

 
Gerrymandering for congressional redistricting.
 

What a great title. Americans are great with names.

Who does it?

Are you related to that guy who got down in the tunnels with all those intensly Green girls to protest a new runway at Manchester Airport. They were down there a good long time.

But thanks anyway.
 
 
"Gerrymander" has something to do with the salamander shape of a weird new district and "Gerry" -- the politician who made that new district? I forget. We learn these things in elementary school though.

Yep, Gov. Elbridge Gerry:

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Gerrymandering 

Meanwhile, came here to plonk this:

 http://politics.nytimes.com/election-guide/2008/results/superdelegates/index.html? 

Looks cool -- lists of superdelegates, with quotes.
 
 
Gerrymandering soz is rigging the boundaries to make sure nothing untoward happens. They probably didn't tell you that in school so you could retain your respect for adults a little longer.
 
 
BTW-

As a result of this thread I'm now the expert in the pub about American elections. I'm the expert on a few other things as well but that's by-the-bye. They don't know anything about them so it's easy. I can make stuff up and they wouldn't know. "What's a caucus?" they would say. I said it was like the Eton Wall Game with the candidates as the ball done with taste and decorum by right thinking hard working families up and down the land and from sea to shining sea and NAFTA being a long way off and "what about these ears eh?"
 
 
I'm happy for you, spendius:

Sinbad pokes more holes in Hillary's claims of foreign policy experience -- yes, THAT Sinbad:

 http://blog.washingtonpost.com/sleuth/2008/03/sinbad_unloads_on_hillary_clin.html 

Excerpt:

 
Finally, the Barack Obama campaign has found a big gun to help shoot down Hillary Rodham Clinton's self-proclaimed foreign policy experience. And he may be the wackiest gun of all: Sinbad, the actor, who has come out from under a rock to defend Obama in the war over foreign policy credentials.

Sinbad, along with singer Sheryl Crow, was on that 1996 trip to Bosnia that Clinton has described as a harrowing international experience that makes her tested and ready to answer a 3 a.m. phone call at the White House on day one, a claim for which she's taking much grief on the campaign trail.

Harrowing? Not that Sinbad recalls. He just remembers it being a USO tour to buck up the troops amid a much worse situation than he had imagined between the Bosnians and Serbs.

In an interview with the Sleuth Monday, he said the "scariest" part of the trip was wondering where he'd eat next. "I think the only 'red-phone' moment was: 'Do we eat here or at the next place.'
 
 
 
 http://news.yahoo.com/s/ucgg/20080310/cm_ucgg/leadershipisobamasbestquality 

 
As for Hillary's other big foreign policy question -- should an American president speak to undesirable foreign leaders? -- that one, too, is grossly unfair to Obama. He has said that, yes, he would personally negotiate, but so did Richard Nixon (and that Metternich of Metternichs, Henry Kissinger) with China, with extraordinary success.

The question in foreign policy is not to have a president who sets rigid parameters, but one who is a "universalist," who understands the mentalities at work in the peoples and leaders of the world, realistically, and who thus knows what will work and what will not. Obama has that crucial capacity, one that escaped even the great FDR and Churchill in World War II: Their problems with Joseph Stalin began, historians have told me, when they misdiagnosed him as a malleable interlocutor instead of a vicious paranoid, when they began to call him "Uncle Joe."

As the man I would choose as having these capacities above all others, former Secretary of State James Baker III, said, "There's no such thing as presidential experience outside of the office itself." The quality we ought to seek, he went on, "is leadership."

That is a quality that Obama has, and one that he embellishes with his sometimes aloof style, but also with his refusal to get down and dirty with some of his less discerning opponents. Leadership is not fighting whatever gets in your precious way at any moment. It is exemplifying and embodying an entire set of profound American principles and beliefs and giving such expression to them on the international stage that other peoples will want to be more, and not less, like us.

 
 
 
 
I'm happy for you, spendius:

Sinbad pokes more holes in Hillary's claims of foreign policy experience -- yes, THAT Sinbad:

 http://blog.washingtonpost.com/sleuth/2008/03/sinbad_unloads_on_hillary_clin.html 

Excerpt:

 
Finally, the Barack Obama campaign has found a big gun to help shoot down Hillary Rodham Clinton's self-proclaimed foreign policy experience. And he may be the wackiest gun of all: Sinbad, the actor, who has come out from under a rock to defend Obama in the war over foreign policy credentials.

Sinbad, along with singer Sheryl Crow, was on that 1996 trip to Bosnia that Clinton has described as a harrowing international experience that makes her tested and ready to answer a 3 a.m. phone call at the White House on day one, a claim for which she's taking much grief on the campaign trail.

Harrowing? Not that Sinbad recalls. He just remembers it being a USO tour to buck up the troops amid a much worse situation than he had imagined between the Bosnians and Serbs.

In an interview with the Sleuth Monday, he said the "scariest" part of the trip was wondering where he'd eat next. "I think the only 'red-phone' moment was: 'Do we eat here or at the next place.'
 

 

How on earth does Clinton think claiming a USO tour as foreign policy experience will help win the nomination or in November? McCain will crush her with this stuff. Obama might not come out and call her a liar to her face in a debate, but McCain will (and should).
 
 
 
McCain will crush her with this stuff.
 

I agree.

Good article on "The Primary vs. General Election Fallacy":

 http://www.msnbc.msn.com/id/23591347/ 

Excerpt:

 
 
 
 
This is interesting! Very long (13 pages!) and I don't expect everyone to read all of it. But interesting, for me, in a few different ways. Reassuring, too.

 http://www.chicagotribune.com/news/politics/chi-obamafullwebmar16,0,7569169.story?page=1 

A quick summary of the Rezko parts (my own words):

The Obamas decided to buy a house and put their condo on the market. Michelle looked at several houses and narrowed things down to 4-6 to look at with Barack. They found the house they currently live in, and liked it. They entered into a standard negotiation with the house's owners.

The Obamas' real estate agent was concerned that the asking price was too high -- there was evidently some concern about how much higher they wanted to go in their offers. At this point, Barack though of Tony Rezko, as an old friend and real estate developer who knew his stuff. At the time his problems hadn't really broken yet. There were evidently some rumblings but Rezko denied it and, based on their previous ~15 relationship, which had been straightforward and relaxed, without Rezko asking Obama for favors or anything, Obama believed him. He accepts responsibility for that.

At this point, Rezko became interested in the empty lot next door. This was for sale, but separately; was not tied to the sale of the house in any way. Obama would have bought the house whether Rezko bought the neighboring lot or not.

Rezko, who is a developer after all, went ahead and purchased the neighboring lot, as a completely independent transaction. Obama was fine with that. The neighboring lot is evidently at the intersection of a fairly busy street -- Obama's lot/ house is one over from that. He liked the idea of more of a buffer from that intersection, more privacy.

Once these independent real estate deals took place -- Obama bought his house + lot, Rezko bought the empty lot, in separate deals (which the sellers confirm*, along with the fact that Obama didn't get a special or favorable price on the house) -- there was an issue with space for a playset/ swingset. Obama apparently pretty casually brought up the idea of buying a small swath from Rezko so there would be room for the playset. What happened then was a lot of t-crossing and i-dotting; lawyers were involved, blah blah blah, to make sure it was all fine and above-board.

As in, no special favors from Rezko, just a plain old above-board real-estate procedure with lots of oversight.

Obama does acknowledge that while it was above-board, the fact that he had any kind of a relationship with Rezko meant he should have been more careful. That's the "boneheaded" part, which he's said often.

*That was an interesting side-note -- the Trib seemed a little annoyed that he didn't just trot out the sellers earlier to put a lot of things to rest, and Obama pointed out that they valued their privacy and

 
I'm just saying that, if you're not running for president, dealing with the national press is not something that people really look forward to. For me, it's great.
 

:-) (I'd love to see the facial expression that went along with that.)

That quote came at the end of explaining the various things the sellers have had to deal with since they did come forward (their 10-year-old being called by the media on her cell phone, a reporter showing up at their house at 9:30 PM, etc.)

******

Anyway, that's a summary, one more thing I want to quote from the end (the interview didn't stick solely with Rezko stuff) :

 
 
 
 
Did I say "quick"?   At least it wasn't 13 pages...
 
 
 
Earlier today, the Clinton campaign demanded that Barack Obama release all the documents pertaining to the purchase of his home in 2005 on a piece of land adjacent to land owned by Tony Rezko.

The Obama campaign's response: We already have!

Says Obama spokesman Tommy Vietor, "It's the height of hypocrisy for Senator Clinton to demand the release of documents that are already on our campaign website while she steadfastly refuses to release her full tax returns and earmark requests from her time in the Senate, as well as her White House records and Clinton library donors. Democrats across the country should be very concerned about Senator Clinton's refusal to offer a full and complete accounting of what could be lurking in this financial information and what that would mean for our party when we run against Senator McCain in November."
 

 http://www.swamppolitics.com/news/politics/blog/2008/03/obama_camp_we_did_that_already.html 

(Link to the docs in question there, too.)
 
 
This was an enjoyable read from Cass R. Sunstein, one of Obama's University of Chicago law school colleagues.

 http://www.chicagotribune.com/news/chi-oped0314obamamar14,0,7185898.story 

Excerpt:

 
This was a pretty amazing conversation, not only because of Obama's mastery of the legal details, but also because many prominent Democratic leaders had already blasted the Bush initiative as blatantly illegal. He did not want to take a public position until he had listened to, and explored, what might be said on the other side.

This is the Barack Obama I have known for nearly 15 years -- a careful and evenhanded analyst of law and policy, unusually attentive to multiple points of view.

[...]

Those of us who have long known Obama are impressed and not a little amazed by his rhetorical skills. Who could have expected that our colleague, a teacher of law, is able to inspire large crowds?

The Obama we know is no rhetorician; he shines not because he can move people, but because of his problem-solving abilities, creativity and attention to detail.

In recent weeks, his speaking talents, and the cultlike atmosphere that occasionally surrounds him, have led people to wonder whether there is substance behind the plea for "change" -- whether the soaring phrases might disguise emptiness and vagueness. But nothing could be further from the truth. He is most comfortable in the domain of policy and detail.
 
 
 
A photo to go with the Chi Trib transcript:

 
 
 
The impression I have -- and it's not a strong impression, don't quote me on it or anything -- is that the ChiTrib interview was conducted to assuage several people but especially John Kass. I keep reading stuff from him that is dismissive/ suspicious of Obama, and Obama mentioned him specifically in the interview. So I was curious about what Kass took away from it. Here 'tis:

 http://www.chicagotribune.com/news/columnists/chi-kass_bd16mar16,0,5052229.column 

There is a certain amount of snark, and it's irresponsible of him I think to repeat the "$300,000 less than the asking price" thing when the sellers have confirmed that no favors were done, that's just the price that was settled on after standard negotiations. (We also paid less than the asking price for our house, obviously we had a shady guy doing us a favor...) But overall it seems to concede that questions were answered.
 
 
Not really anything new here, but good overview (of the Rezko story) with lots of links:

 http://obsidianwings.blogs.com/obsidian_wings/2008/03/politics-quick.html 
 
 
 http://www.newsweek.com/id/123604/page/1 

 
 
 
 
This is a minor point, but...

In the editorial after the big meeting with Obama, the Chi Trib says,

 
Obama should have had Friday's discussion 16 months ago. Asked why he didn't, he spoke of learning, uncomfortably, what it's like to live in a fishbowl. That made him perhaps too eager to protect personal information -- too eager to "control the narrative."
 

 http://www.chicagotribune.com/news/opinion/editorials/chi-0316edit1mar16,0,745313.story 

That's not what I got out of the exchange. The new information is mostly that the sellers confirm Obama's story. That the "$300,000 under the asking price" part had nothing to do with Rezko, that Rezko bought the adjoining lot completely independently, etc. What I saw with the "fishbowl" stuff is that he was trying to be respectful of the sellers and not demand that they corroborate what he was saying. Then they recently came forward.

That section:

 
Tribune: I ask because again, the overriding question about all this and the one that you've been trying to address since the very beginning, but the one that's still lingering, is whether or not you and Tony coordinated the purchase of the home.

Obama: And I guess what I'm saying is, if we've got confirmation from the seller that the two transactions weren't related, that we in fact paid the best price, or gave them the best offer for the home, then why the thought that I coordinated would be relevant? Look, the overarching suspicion that has been raised by a number of reporters in this room is that there was some sort of subsidy of my house. If that is in fact not the case, then that should allay whatever concerns you have. Unless there is something that I'm missing.

Tribune: No sir, we have never communicated with the sellers and your transmissions of their e-mails to us is the first we've ever had of them.

Obama: I recognize that, and I should probably make mention of this: Part of the... difficulty that we've had on some of these responses has to do with the fact that the sellers are very private people and were not interested in being drawn into a media circus.

And just to give you some indication of what might prompt their concerns: One reporter got a hold of their 11-year-old daughter's cell phone and asked for them; one reporter showed up at their house at 9:30 at night; another somehow got through security at John Hopkins and started asking questions of the woman doctor who was on rounds there. And so, not surprisingly then, this was not something that they were eager to get involved with.

They are the ones, though, that did originally indicate to us when they first read the reports that this is just not accurate, and after some prodding, then we were able to get them to at least respond to a set of points that my lawyer laid out, my campaign lawyer laid out, so that they could confirm this. And again, this is subject to confirmation.

Tribune: I appreciate that, and I'm also.. our contact with them has been entirely respectful of their privacy.

Obama: No, this was not in any way suggesting that you guys hadn't been respectful. I'm just saying that, if you're not running for president, dealing with the national press is not something that people really look forward to. For me, it's great.
 

It seems far less to me like he was trying to "control the narrative" than that he was trying to be respectful. It was far more in his interest -- in terms of controlling the narrative and put this thing to rest -- to trot them out earlier.
 
 
 
This is a minor point, but...

In the editorial after the big meeting with Obama, the Chi Trib says,

 
Obama should have had Friday's discussion 16 months ago. Asked why he didn't, he spoke of learning, uncomfortably, what it's like to live in a fishbowl. That made him perhaps too eager to protect personal information -- too eager to "control the narrative."
 

 http://www.chicagotribune.com/news/opinion/editorials/chi-0316edit1mar16,0,745313.story 

That's not what I got out of the exchange.
 

No, me either. I got that he thought they HAD had the conversation and that he didn't think there was much of anything new about it except to convince the Tribune that they had had the conversation. And after reading the whole transcript, I have to agree with him. I kept coming to the conclusion that the facts that were given in this interview could have been tracked down by an investigative journalist.
 
 
This exchange might be the one they were (mis?)characterizing.

 
And the fact is my answers really haven't changed much, and so, so to that extent I think a part of the reason we didn't have this conversation was, the feeling was maybe we had the conversation. What had changed was not so much my answers but that it looked like now I was really a viable presidential candidate and Tony Rezko had been indicted.

So that it was the circumstances of the individuals had changed instead of the story. So having said that, as I said before, part of our difficulty was that the sellers were very reticent to come forward, and so I think, clearly disputing the implications or the appearances and other stuff, other than simply telling things that had gone on, and it wasn't clear that we had no new information to provide.

You know, [Tribune editor] Anne Marie [Lipinski] asked what it is that I've learned. Learning the relationship with the press in a national campaign is a challenge. I mean, I mean, I will say this, that there's no experience similar to this in terms of living in the fish bowl. And there are times where very legitimate and fair questions are raised about my inconsistencies, contradictions or foibles.

There are times where, you know, folks are just picking at you, you know, because they need some copy. And so what it can induce is a mentality of let's be very protective of information for interviews and access so we can control the narrative a little more. That's something we have to be careful of, not just as a candidate but presumably even more so as a president because what you want to do is balance, not responding to every reporter out there, maintaining a sense of openness and accessibility and a willingness to engage the criticisms that are made. And that's something that we're still learning as a team.

 
 
 
Right, that's another important point. He'd already released important stuff (did you see the thing where Hillary demanded that he release something and he said "we already have -- it's been on our website for a while now!" [paraphrase]), had already explained important things, had already given all the important pieces of the puzzle. The only thing remaining was confirmation from the sellers, and he was reluctant to force them. That makes sense to me, and isn't some "why didn't you just set this straight 16 months ago" case.
 
 
I have been trying to find a poll for Obama after the speech, the best i could find is  this live MSNBC poll 

It would be interesting to see if the public bought it.
 
 
Good collection of links -- basically a greatest-hits tally of the Clinton campaign thus far:

 http://www.dailykos.com/storyonly/2008/3/26/104555/955/7/484087 
 
 
Sozobe! You're back! (but you probably already knew that   )

Man, they've been stinking it up over on your 'Obama 08' thread. Hopefully out of deference to you, they'll ease up on the muckracking now that you're back...

or, not...
 
 
 
Sozobe! You're back! (but you probably already knew that   )
 

  In truth, I'm only back-ish -- lots of catching up to do after my trip (with work, etc.) and probably will be scarce for a while.

 
Man, they've been stinking it up over on your 'Obama 08' thread. Hopefully out of deference to you, they'll ease up on the muckracking now that you're back...

or, not...
 

Yeah, I'm thinking of saying something general there, not sure. Not so bad right now.
 
 
Good to have you back, Soz. Glad your house was dry. I worried about your house during the worst of the floods in the region.

How was Florida? What's the word on the ground there? Is there as much Democratic disfranchisement as Hillary wants people to believe? Do Floridians accept any responsibility for the problem themselves or blame it all on the DNC?
 
 
Yeah Soz, we've been missing you! I'd noticed you werent here for a coupla days, hoped you were taking a well-deserved break somewhere nice ;-)

And yeah, the Obama thread's gone to hell.

Meanwhile, no comment on this anecdote    

 
Read this story posted earlier by pstalmer on a different page:

Favorite campaign story so far: On an NPR talk show a couple of days ago, a nursing-home chaplain called to report her political conversation with an elderly white gentleman. He asked, "Who's that n----- that's running?"

The chaplain said on the air, "Well, we're chaplains; we're not supposed to correct our people." So she said to the man, "That's Barack Obama, the black man who's running for president."

"Right," said the old guy. "That's who I'm voting for."
 
 
 
This is a very good column...
 http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2008/03/27/AR2008032702614.html?hpid=opinionsbox1 
 
 
Whoa, nimh.

Dropping by with this -- I've seen it come up a few times.

 
Statement Regarding Barack Obama

The Law School has received many media requests about Barack Obama, especially about his status as "Senior Lecturer."

From 1992 until his election to the U.S. Senate in 2004, Barack Obama served as a professor in the Law School. He was a Lecturer from 1992 to 1996. He was a Senior Lecturer from 1996 to 2004, during which time he taught three courses per year. Senior Lecturers are considered to be members of the Law School faculty and are regarded as professors, although not full-time or tenure-track. The title of Senior Lecturer is distinct from the title of Lecturer, which signifies adjunct status. Like Obama, each of the Law School's Senior Lecturers have high-demand careers in politics or public service, which prevent full-time teaching. Several times during his 12 years as a professor in the Law School, Obama was invited to join the faculty in a full-time tenure-track position, but he declined.
 

 http://www.law.uchicago.edu/media/index.html 

Butrflynet, this is what I wrote on the Obama thread when I first got back (Wednesday):

 
Briefly -- I was way, WAY out of the loop for about a week and had conversations with relatives that had me spooked about Obama's chances. One (F) leans Hillary but was considering Obama; one (M) leans McCain but was also considering Obama. Both 60-ish. Both were spouting all this stuff about Obama and Wright and Farrakhan and blah blah blah that had me really worried. (The good news -- my cousin the Obama supporter and I took the opportunity to disabuse these relatives of several false notions. Plus, I talked about the "sniper fire in Bosnia" thing and they didn't quite believe me and then like the next day it was big news everywhere... finally.)

Anyway, I was relieved that when I came up for air (and internet access) things didn't actually seem so bad. Way better than I feared, and some room for optimism.
 

Also, I talked about the "Hillary making speeches in favor of NAFTA" thing, which was also news shortly thereafter (or at least I saw more about it after than before).

I really only talked to them, though, (plus my already-strong-Obama-supporter cousin) so don't have much of a feel for Florida in general. Main thing I noticed about local Florida newspapers (when I scanned headlines) was that there wasn't much political stuff, at all. My cousin gets the NYT and that's all the political info I got when I was there, pretty much.

I also hadn't talked to the FL relatives (except cuz) about any of this beforehand, and don't know what they were thinking previously/ how much of a change their concern represented. Nor how lasting it will be. I might follow up.

This isn't Florida but on the general subject, my F-I-L is interested in Obama -- now -- which I see as a really good sign. He's voted Republican for as long as I've known him but says he thinks Obama is a good guy. (Hated Gore, hated Kerry.)
 
 
 
This isn't Florida but on the general subject, my F-I-L is interested in Obama -- now -- which I see as a really good sign. He's voted Republican for as long as I've known him but says he thinks Obama is a good guy. (Hated Gore, hated Kerry.)
 

Mom, the former John Bircher, changed her registration in PA so that she could vote for Obama. She's a bit of a nut, but she was taken by the fact that he seemed to be talking to her like an adult and telling the truth.
 
 
 
talking to her like an adult and telling the truth.

 

dangerous thinking, truth is not the american way, it's not patriotic.
 
 
Also, I meant to say this earlier, sorry about your thread, soz. I saw it tanking and was torn between trying to stop it and letting it burn out without fuel. Unfortunately, there is always plenty of fuel.
 
 
New York Magazine  seems to have  some inside source about what happened with Obama's attempt to win John Edwards' endorsement: apparently, he blew it.

 
 
 
 
 
 
 http://www.nybooks.com/articles/21231 
 
 
I cried when I read this letter from Alice Walker... I wish it could get some national exposure.

 http://www.theroot.com/id/45469 
 
 
Thanks, Blatham and Butryflynet: I appreciated the NYTimes review and have always loved Elizabeth Drew. Alice Walker brought me also to tears.
 
 
Very nice piece by Alice Walker.
 
 
I read that, too!! Very touching...
 
 
 
Mom was taken by the fact that he seemed to be talking to her like an adult and telling the truth.
 

Except when he said he didn't know his pastor preached those things publicly from the pulpit for 20 years.

Except when he said that his pastor 'acknowledged' that his remarks were 'offensive'.
 
 
What, in your way of thinking is productive about repeating this over and over in any thread Obama is mentioned?
 
 
 
 
Mom was taken by the fact that he seemed to be talking to her like an adult and telling the truth.
 

Except when he said he didn't know his pastor preached those things publicly from the pulpit for 20 years.

Except when he said that his pastor 'acknowledged' that his remarks were 'offensive'.
 

I mentioned that mom is a bit of a nut, so it should come as no surprise that she actually agrees with Rev. Wright -- even his more outrageous statements. She is of the same generation. So no, this pathetic attempt at catching him in a lie goes nowhere with her.
 
 
Brutal, but some good points:

 
The Tall Tale of Tuzla
Hillary Clinton's Bosnian misadventure should disqualify her from the presidency, but the airport landing is the least of it.
By Christopher Hitchens
 

 http://www.slate.com/id/2187780 
 
 
Hi Craven!
 
 
(That was in reference to April Fool's silliness -- all the avatars had just changed.)

"Cash-strapped Clinton fails to pay bills"

 http://www.politico.com/news/stories/0308/9259.html 

Excerpts:

 
If she had paid off the $8.7 million in unpaid bills she reported as debt and had not loaned her campaign $5 million, she would have been nearly $3 million in the red at the end of February.

By contrast, if you subtract Obama's $625,000 in debts and his general-election-only money from his total cash on hand at the end of last month, he'd still be left with $31 million.
 
 
 
It's not like I needed further convincing but Obama's Disability Policy Statement is just lovely:

 http://www.barackobama.com/pdf/DisabilityPlanFactSheet.pdf 
 
 
Found that  here  ; funny slash scary.

Excerpt:

 
Come with us now to Jimmy's Quick Lunch, where folks are talking to Ms. Talev about what's on their minds:

Of Obama, Duser said: "I'm not crazy about voting for a colored guy, but that's not why I don't support Obama. I'm not prejudiced. I just like Hillary." A couple tables over, Jean Fetterman, a foster grandparent, said of Clinton: "Oh, I love her. She's a very intelligent person, and she has her husband who went through this." She scoffs at the idea of voting for Obama: "I don't want to be a Muslim!" She looks dubious when told Obama is Christian. "Then why did he go see what's-his-name over in Iraq, that Lama?"

Well, this is really just a horrible mashup. First of all, despite the remarks of some of his more enthusiastic surrogates, Obama has not actually said that he will convert all Americans to Islam. And he didn't go to Iraq, either. Let's get this straight once and for all: that one time when he went to visit the llama, he wore the traditional garb of Suriname. He did it only because llamas, like illegal Mexicans, are from South America. Any politician, colored or regular, would have done the same.

Sigh. But there you have it- this is now Clinton's base. This is why the Clinton campaign has been making such strange and credibility-destroying arguments in the past couple of weeks: because those arguments are "credibility-destroying" only among high-information voters.
 
 
 
 
It's not like I needed further convincing but Obama's Disability Policy Statement is just lovely:

 http://www.barackobama.com/pdf/DisabilityPlanFactSheet.pdf 
 

Other than the mandated paid sick leave policy and some inflated numbers it's not bad.
 
 
 
New York Magazine  seems to have  some inside source about what happened with Obama's attempt to win John Edwards' endorsement: apparently, he blew it.
 

Elizabeth denies it (or at least part of it):

 
Elizabeth Edwards Says Endorsement Not Likely Soon

In two television interviews this morning, Elizabeth Edwards denied a recent New York magazine report that claimed she and Sen. Barack Obama argued over his health care plan when he visited her home in North Carolina. She also said Obama was "charming" and not "aloof" as the article claimed.

Edwards also said that it's unlikely either she or her husband will endorse a candidate before the North Carolina primary and will instead probably just "vote privately." She also suggested she and her husband may not vote for the same candidate.

On the contested Democratic primary fight, Edwards also said she does not believe continued fighting is bad for the party.
 

 http://politicalwire.com/archives/2008/04/02/elizabeth_edwards_says_endorsement_not_likely_soon.html 

Doesn't necessarily mean much, would be upping the ante a lot if she confirmed it or did anything but deny.
 
 
Nora Ephron on Hillary:

 http://www.huffingtonpost.com/nora-ephron/hooked-on-hillary_b_94115.html 

 
Don't get me wrong, this primary election has been swell. Like Michelle Obama, I feel proud of my country for the first time in a long time. I loved Dennis Kucinich, and I had a big sneaker for Chris Dodd. But now that we're down to two contenders, it's turned into an unending last episode of Survivor. They're eating rats and they're frying bugs, and they're frying rats and they're eating bugs; no one is ever going to get off the island and I can't take it any more.
 

(Interesting stuff about why she used to love Hillary and doesn't anymore, though.)

(Can you tell my kid's at school for the first time in two weeks? Getting caught up on a lot of stuff. Most of these finds have to do with work.)
 
 
